_	His application procedure stalled because of the requirement that Mozart produce his birth certificate (he had been born in faraway Salzburg, making it harder to do so).
_	In this formalism, the twistor equation is the requirement that a local twistor be parallel under the connection.
_	Rep. Andy Barr (R-KY) testified in favor of the bill because it would "remove the requirement that Valley View Ferry captains be licensed through the Coast Guard, and instead allow the state to implement its own licensing requirement."
_	During the reporting period, at least four religious groups, all of which sought several times to register, continued to be denied legal status; as in previous years, the Government delayed or denied applications, citing technical reasons, including the requirement that the head of the group have "higher education."
_	Moreover, Thomas said if "valuable" was the source of the requirement that the minerals should have commercial worth, that would be inconsistent with "Watt v. Western Nuclear, Inc.", because that decision said that a substance was a mineral when it could be used for commercial purposes.
_	Because of the requirement that the instrument be voluntary, lenders will often not act upon a deed in lieu of foreclosure unless they receive a written offer of such a conveyance from the borrower that specifically states that the offer to enter into negotiations is being made voluntarily.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	However, it violates the requirement that "the philosophers do not speak to each other" (due to the request messages).
_	Wolff argues that consensus is limited by the requirement that participants are generally rational and altruistic, and that the community in question is not too large.
_	(1) The first is the requirement that, in any force-displacement measurement platform, the stiffness of the machine (formula_63) must approximately match the stiffness of the sample (formula_64), at least in order of magnitude.
_	It is an offense to host a pornographic web site in South Africa because of the difficulty of age-verification and the requirement that pornography only be distributed from designated, licensed physical premises.
_	Congress subsequently reinstated the requirement that districts be composed of contiguous territory, be "compact," and have equal populations within each State.
_	The Minister of Immigration, Refugees and Citizenship's Bill C-6 amended or repealed parts of the previous parliament's "Strengthening Canadian Citizenship Act" including the ability to revoke citizenship based on national security, the requirement that applicants for citizenship aged 14 to 18 and 55 to 64 to prove adequate knowledge Canada and of an official language, the residency requirement increase from 3 years to 4 years, the disallowance of time spent as temporary resident as contributing to the residency requirement, and the condition of citizenship that the applicant must intend to reside in Canada.
_	Scott authored legislation that was eventually enacted to require a priority system for funding capital outlay projects, a system that included the requirement that all such projects undergo needs assessment evaluations.
_	He first caddied for Crenshaw in 1976, when Crenshaw finished second, and continued to caddie for Crenshaw at the Masters until 1983 when Augusta National dropped the requirement that players use its caddies.
_	While generous for the company the 1906 franchise specified a fixed rate fare, set at 5 cents, and the requirement that Denver Tramway pay 50% maintenance on any roadway on which it had a two-way line.
_	In economics, successful product differentiation leads to competitive advantage and is inconsistent with the conditions for perfect competition, which include the requirement that the products of competing firms should be perfect substitutes.
_	Prior to the requirement that students complete law school before taking the bar exam, Maud Crawford, who attended UA as an undergraduate for one year from 1911 to 1912, passed the examination first in her class.
_	In 1945, AEA was awarded transatlantic rights, which covered destinations in Northern Europe with the requirement that the shipping company (American Export Lines) divest itself of control and turn the control over to another carrier, so that an airline was not controlled by a surface carrier.
_	(Finite) linear spaces can be seen as a generalization of projective and affine planes, and more broadly, of formula_1 block designs, where the requirement that every block contains the same number of points is dropped and the essential structural characteristic is that 2 points are incident with exactly 1 line.
_	There is an exception to the requirement that a group must have two eyes to be alive, a situation called "seki" (or "mutual life").
_	Barris accepted but resisted the requirement that he wear a tuxedo, only caving when NBC threatened to drop the series altogether.
_	They depicted a lifestyle unbound by the restrictions of clothing, yet this depiction was restricted by the requirement that genitals should not be shown.
_	and in addition that there is no transonic flow, approximately stated by the requirement that the local Mach number not exceed unity.
_	This ability together with the requirement that the Secretary of the Interior approve all gaming compacts worked to ensure federal oversight of any state regulation- which should have softened the blow of tribal state compacts on sovereignty.
_	A mixed Hodge structure on an abelian group formula_1 consists of a finite decreasing filtration "F" on the complex vector space "H" (the complexification of formula_1), called the Hodge filtration and a finite increasing filtration "W" on the rational vector space formula_27 (obtained by extending the scalars to rational numbers), called the weight filtration, subject to the requirement that the "n"-th associated graded quotient of formula_28 with respect to the weight filtration, together with the filtration induced by "F" on its complexification, is a pure Hodge structure of weight "n", for all integer "n".
_	The legislation would delay for one year the imposition of penalties associated with the requirement that most residents of the United States have health insurance coverage beginning in 2014.
_	This property of formula_31 follows directly from the requirement that formula_35 be asymptotically scale invariant; thus, the form of formula_31 only controls the shape and finite extent of the lower tail.
_	At this point, the requirement that the graph be proper comes into effect, as a red area must be made which does not touch the existing one:
_	The Government also announced plans to remove bureaucratic and legalistic hurdles that hindered the return of confiscated properties by eliminating the requirement that religious organizations produce titles and deeds to prove original ownership.
_	A poll through UtahPolicy.com found 62 percent of Utahns are in favor of removing the requirement that new restaurants install "Zion curtains" to hide the preparation of alcoholic beverages from consumers.
_	In "C-156/15 Swedbank", the CJEU enforced the requirement that practical control was that of legal negative control.
_	In 2014, Thibaut voted for the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved, 88-5.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	He was brought into court for having an unsatisfactory license plate, but was able to convince the judge that displaying the broomstick vertically at the back of the car satisfied the requirement that his license number be displayed.
_	As chairman of the Subcommittee on Juvenile Delinquency, Bayh was the author, sponsor and chief architect of the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act, overhauling the youth prison system, including the requirement that juvenile offenders be separated from adults.
_	This eliminated the pause while the modem waited for the ACK to be returned, adding the requirement that the system needed some memory to track whether or not an ACK was received within a given amount of time.
_	In an executive order issued on February 29, 2008, President George W. Bush terminated the IOB's authority to oversee the general counsel and inspector general of each U.S. intelligence agency, and erased the requirement that each inspector general file a report with the IOB every three months.
_	Further, the requirement that an object must be "hidden" means no more than that it must be concealed; it refers to the condition in which the object was found and does not refer back to the intention which the owner of the object may have had in hiding it.
_	Finally, the requirement that there must be no reasonable presumption of former ownership means that it must not be possible to trace the ownership of the object to a person or family currently existing.
_	In NFL Europa, however, the overtime period lasted for 10 minutes with the requirement that each team must have the opportunity of possession at least once.
_	Also important was the requirement that the chosen location be within a single night's march of another camp.
_	The interpolation data in the lookup tables are constrained by the requirement that continuity of line segments must be preserved, while optimizing for smoothness.
_	In abstract algebra, a semiring is an algebraic structure similar to a ring, but without the requirement that each element must have an additive inverse.
_	Apart from the requirement that the number of delegates for each state is at least one, a state's number of representatives is in principle proportional to population, thus assuring reasonably consistent representation to the people regardless of the state boundaries and populations.
_	so that, on repeating this argument for different smooth functions formula_3 such that the corresponding formula_4 span the tangent space at each point the argument is applied at, we see that the requirement for the vanishing Lie derivative along flows of formula_4 corresponding to arbitrary smooth formula_3 is equivalent to the requirement that "ω" should be closed.
_	Equations of motion are generally derived from the requirement that the action is stationary.
_	As the work proceeded, more detailed rules were adopted as to how variant and uncertain readings in the Hebrew and Greek source texts should be indicated, including the requirement that words supplied in English to 'complete the meaning' of the originals should be printed in a different type face.
_	However, the Intelligence Systems Panel, a civilian group advising the USAF and CIA on aerial reconnaissance, had recognized by 1954 that the RB-57D would not meet the requirement that panel member Allen Donovan of Cornell Aeronautical Laboratory believed was necessary for safety.
_	A split amongst the church members in Hartford grew when the current minister at the First Church in Hartford, Samuel Stone, declared that the requirement that stated only parents that had both taken communion should be allowed to have a child baptized would be removed, and non-communicants would be allowed to vote.
_	The bill ultimately was modified; it continued to allow area boards of education to review the NFA budget and hold public hearings and requiring annual auditing, but the requirement that area school boards have representatives on the NFA board was removed.
_	He voted against the requirement that welfare recipients undergo periodic testing for use of narcotics.
_	The seasonal monsoon wind patterns of the Indian Ocean imposed the requirement that India-bound expeditions must leave Lisbon by April at the latest, if they were to have any hope of catching the summer southeasterly winds from Africa to India.
_	It is based on the requirement that for any decision-making process, "it is not merely of some importance, but of fundamental importance that justice should not only be done, but should manifestly and undoubtedly be seen to be done".
_	Act of 1995 added the requirement that a plaintiff must plead facts giving rise to a "strong inference" of "scienter".
_	The following list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	In March 2008, APTN launched a high definition channel known as APTN HD; initially, the HD feed was a straight simulcast of APTN's Eastern cable feed, complying with the requirement that a specialty channel's HD simulcast must be 95% identical in programming and scheduling to its standard-definition feeds.
_	Angle told the "Las Vegas Review-Journal" that, as a state legislator, she had sponsored a bill to remove the requirement that health insurers cover mammograms and colonoscopies.
_	One unusual graduation requirement at Germantown Friends School is the requirement that each junior complete an independent project, known as a "Junior Project."
_	Key elements of the Convention include the requirement that developed countries provide new and additional financial resources and measures to eliminate production and use of intentionally produced POPs, eliminate unintentionally produced POPs where feasible, and manage and dispose of POPs wastes in an environmentally sound manner.
_	On 9 August 2017, the PRI revised its requirements for presidential candidates, eliminating the requirement that candidates must have 10 years of party membership, and allowing "illustrious" non-party figures to lead the party.
_	To address the requirement that statistical classifications exhibit mutual exclusiveness (so events are not counted more than once) and exhaustiveness (so there is a place to tally all events), ICD11 supports the serialization of the Foundation Component into an arbitrary number of linearizations, optimized for use cases.
_	Because of the requirement that time must appear to be monotonically increasing, a leap second is inserted with the sequence 23:59:59, 23:59:60, 00:00:00.
_	Some clauses, particularly the requirement that all MPs hold bachelor's degrees, the constitutional court, and decentralisation provoked strong criticism.
_	Two 2010 reports by the UN Committee against Torture and the UNHCR said that the requirement that asylum seekers “under preventive expulsion” request a hearing within 24 hours was too short.
_	Though at first they made little progress, their children's programme, founded in 1978, in Nariai was particularly successful; in 1985, they began a campaign which resulted in the establishment of a division in the city board of education devoted exclusively to education for ethnic Koreans, and the elimination of the requirement that city employees hold Japanese nationality.
_	However, if selective repeat is to be used, the requirement that "n"+"n" ≤ 8 must be maintained; if "w" is increased to 2, "w" must be decreased to 6.
_	They also won approval of the Senate conferees to remove the requirement that the commission members be approved by the Senate.
_	In a hierarchical organization, "up or out", also known as a tenure or partnership system, is the requirement that each member of the organization must achieve a certain rank within a certain period of time.
_	The Court found that the requirement that candidates run for specific seats enhanced the African-American citizens' lack of access because it prevented a cohesive political group from concentrating on a single candidate.
_	Reasons cited for the bid being $9 million over the state's estimate include the requirement that the shipbuilder complete the ferry within one year (or face stiff daily fines), and changes to the specifications including improved safety, security and quality.
_	However, the requirement that students pass either the Keystone exams in Literature, Biology and Algebra or an equivalent project-based assessment has now been delayed until the 2018-2019 school year.
_	This was attributed to high fees, high interest rates, the need for a reduction in principal on the part of the lender, and the requirement that the federal government receive 50% of any appreciation in value of the house.
_	Lord Selbourne's statement has been heavily criticized, particularly on the requirement that the defaulting fiduciary / trustee has to be dishonest or fraudulent.
_	Perry and the other candidates argued that the chairman of the Virginia Republican Party and members of State Board of Elections violated their rights by enforcing state requirements as to the number of signatures, the qualifications for signers and the requirement that all petition circulators be "an eligible or registered qualified voter in Virginia."
_	The harassment and threats from the military and paramilitaries continued, and the requirement that they patrol with the PACs was enforced until the peace accords were signed and the civilian self-defence patrols were dissolved in 1996.
_	He sponsored a 2008 bill that would repeal the requirement that the Federal Reserve System work to reduce unemployment.
_	Littell obtained French citizenship (while being able to keep the American one) in March 2007 after French officials made use of a clause stating that any French speaker whose "meritorious actions contribute to the glory of France" are allowed to become citizens, despite not fulfilling the requirement that he live in France for more than six months out of the year.
_	Because of the requirement that the composition have its world premiere during the year of its award, the winning work had rarely been recorded and sometimes had received only one performance.
_	A second result of the fire was the requirement that an asbestos fire curtain (or sheet metal screen) be raised before each performance and lowered afterward to separate the audience from the stage.
_	The effect was especially felt on Sigma Mu Sigma because of the requirement that all members be Masons.
_	It is divided into two sequential parts, Honour Moderations, or “Mods,” a study of the ancient Greek and Latin languages, and then courses selected from a variety of classical topics, with the requirement that eight papers be written.
_	Zhu Wen's brutality led many to want to exclude that dynasty from the Mandate of Heaven due to the requirement that the leader work with benevolence.
_	That squadron was redesignated on 1 October 1948 to comply with the requirement that Table of Distribution units be numbered with four digits.
_	The US Supreme Court held that Felker's petitions for habeas corpus did not satisfy "the requirements of the relevant provisions of the Act, let alone the requirement that there be "exceptional circumstances' justifying the issuance of the writ."
_	Having feared of US$600 million compensation or facing international lawsuit, the Indonesia cabinet minister gave a 'green light' for the mill to resume its operation in May 2000 with the requirement that the production of dissolving pulp should be stopped.
_	In response, the federal Parliament passed an amendment to the "Supreme Court Act", which declared that the requirement that an appointee be a member of the Quebec bar also included former members of the Bar.
_	The federal government argued that the requirement that Quebec judges be appointed from among the bar of Quebec included former members of the bar.
_	One consequential factor of this war was Dalhousie’s continuation of the requirement that Sepoys be forced to serve abroad.
_	New additions for the 2012 season included the Zamperla-manufactured Happy Swing (located in the Kiddieland area), a second train for the L. Ruth Express, a redesigned loading area for the Whacky Shack, and the requirement that all in-park transactions must be made with a Wally Card.
_	The reading down of Section 79 of the IT act by the Supreme Court, to include the requirement that a takedown notice must be sanctioned by a court or government authority, has also been interpreted by the Delhi High Court in the case of MySpace v. Super Cassettes, to not apply to cases of copyright infringement under the Indian Copyright Act.
_	On July 28, 1966, a U-2 piloted by USAF Captain Robert Hickman departed from Barksdale Air Force Base to conduct a reconnaissance mission; Hickman's orders included the requirement that he not enter Cuban airspace.
_	There is, however, a limited element of state assessment of private schools, because of the requirement that the state ensure that children receive a certain minimum education; Irish private schools must still work towards the Junior Certificate and the Leaving Certificate, for example.
_	He also warned potential buyers of "Rearmed 2" for the PlayStation 3, referencing the requirement that players must sign into the PlayStation Network before starting the game, a form of digital rights management.
_	Since the sequence elements are defined to start at 1, it was necessary to add the requirement that the LCS is empty when a subscript is zero.
_	[37] "These rules of succession, and the requirement that they be the same as those of Great Britain, are necessary to the proper functioning of our constitutional monarchy and, therefore, the rules are not subject to Charter scrutiny."
_	In Season 2 she allows Boyd to rent a room in her house with the requirement that he stay clear of illegal activities.
_	In fact, it is easy to see that formula_156, contrary to the requirement that formula_157 if formula_41.
_	The law was described as "the most interesting and important primary legislation of the year" by the "American Political Science Review", which identified two particular features as particularly intriguing: firstly, the requirement that voters rank a certain number of candidates, and secondly, the "improvement" of giving lower-preference votes less weight: "Here, then, appears to be something new under the sun—compulsory preferential voting for all who take the trouble to come out to the primary!"
_	The barriers to 2007 passage of a bill were the requirement that a 3/5ths supermajority of the legislators was needed to pass a bill after May 31 to be immediately effective, the Governor had threatened to veto a bill that included a sales tax increase, and many legislators tied a transit bill to a capital plan and a casino bill to fund that capital plan.
_	He supported the requirement that ministers be literate.
_	The Dirac string acts as the solenoid in the Aharonov–Bohm effect, and the requirement that the position of the Dirac string should not be observable implies the Dirac quantization rule: the product of a magnetic charge and an electric charge must always be an integer multiple of formula_1.
_	However the requirement that contract for sale of land must be in writing was continued by section 40 of that Act. Section 40 of the Law of Property Act 1925 was repealed by sections 2(8) and 4 of, and Schedule 2 to, the Law of Property (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1989, however section 2 of that Act requires that contracts for the sale of land be signed and in writing.
_	On the way to his classification of Riemannian holonomy groups, Berger developed two criteria that must be satisfied by the Lie algebra of the holonomy group of a torsion-free affine connection which is not locally symmetric: one of them, known as "Berger's first criterion", is a consequence of the Ambrose–Singer theorem, that the curvature generates the holonomy algebra; the other, known as "Berger's second criterion", comes from the requirement that the connection should not be locally symmetric.
_	Solvability essentially is the requirement that each level "P" has an element in "A" and an element in "X".
_	These include the requirement that the Senate may advise and must consent to some of the President's government appointments; also the Senate must consent to all treaties with foreign governments and it tries all impeachments.
_	The proposal would have also repealed the requirement that State Lottery revenue be used only for education.
_	Volunteers are sampled from throughout the United Kingdom, with the requirement that they have four grandparents who were born in the same rural area.
_	The OWP is calculated by taking the average of the WP's for each of the team's opponents with the requirement that all games against the team in question are removed from the calculation.
_	Laws were also enacted to strengthen the requirement that three days pass between the proposal of a bill, and the vote on that bill.
_	The crew also strongly objected to the requirement that they record every use of drinking water and argued instead that they could simply use the meter on the water hose to gauge the amount consumed.
_	Among the components of the PSD program, the one that primarily applies to GHGs is the requirement that source owners or operators utilize BACT to limit GHG emissions from the source.
_	Implicit in the fundamental right to due process of law is the requirement that no State should deprive any person of life, liberty, or security of person in violation of any right fundamental to accepted principles of global justice.
_	Probability is a way of assigning every "event" a value between zero and one, with the requirement that the event made up of all possible results (in our example, the event {1,2,3,4,5,6}) be assigned a value of one.
_	To qualify as a probability distribution, the assignment of values must satisfy the requirement that if you look at a collection of mutually exclusive events (events that contain no common results, e.g., the events {1,6}, {3}, and {2,4} are all mutually exclusive), the probability that any of these events occurs is given by the sum of the probabilities of the events.
_	Thorne requested information from Rose, and then-Secretary of Defense Ash Carter approved the award upgrade in 2016, and Alabama Representative Mo Brooks and Senator Jeff Sessions wrote Rose's name into the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2017, waiving the requirement that the medal be awarded within five years of the action.
_	The crucial factor in the size and shape of the Shuttle orbiter was the requirement that it be able to accommodate the largest planned commercial and military satellites, and have over 1,000 mile cross-range recovery range to meet the requirement for classified USAF missions for a once-around abort from a launch to a polar orbit.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give public notice of proposed hydraulic fracking.
_	Inevitably, there was a great deal of speculation about the status of stadium construction in the run-up to the 2010 FIFA World Cup, with the requirement that all the FIFA World Cup host stadiums had to be completed by January 2010.
_	However, Federal Reserve officials indicated to Congress that "if the Presidential $1 Coin Program does not stimulate substantial transactional demand for dollar coins, the requirement that the Mint nonetheless produce Sacagawea dollars would result in costs to the taxpayer without any offsetting benefits."
_	One example is the requirement that cigarette commercials and anti-smoking announcements had the same amount of air time.
_	Practical limitations to media neutrality include the inability of journalists to report all available stories and facts, and the requirement that selected facts be linked into a coherent narrative.
_	However, relaxing the requirement that "f" be holomorphic leads to the notion of "modular functions".
_	There are a number of formal variants of Lob, including the standard Two-Cup (one full cup per player), Four-Cup (two full cups per player), Shrub (a triangle of six beers with a "stem" attached to one side), Tree (much like Shrub, except the triangle includes 10 beers), Line (with four half cups per player), Full-Cup Line or Wall (cups in a line across the width of the table), Great Wall (cups lining all sides of the table), Table (cups covering the surface; one must foul out to clear a space on his own side for service), Battleship (or 'Ship, two lines of three cups and one line of five, four and two cups placed strategically, similar to the formations in the board game Battleship), Rotating Randomness (irregular groups of cups placed in irregular pie-shaped sections of the table and played by six or more people who change positions after each point, encouraging shifting ad-hoc team behavior), and Henge (stacked cups or trilithons in irregular pie-shaped zones, with each player having a separate "Tourist" cup whose strategic drinking out of turn imposes the requirement that all others drink theirs, and other ritual elements).
_	Strange agreed, despite the requirement that he abandon his former life.
_	Intended as a replacement for the Junkers Ju 86 in service with the Swedish Air Force, the requirement that led to the Saab 18 called for a three-seat fast reconnaissance aircraft.
_	The episode was intended as a vehicle for Marina Sirtis, however she disliked it due to her fear of heights and the requirement that she be strapped into a flying harness.
_	An "equivalent" definition of IP replaces the condition that the interaction succeeds with high probability on strings in the language with the requirement that it "always" succeeds:
_	In 1993, the requirement that an invention be not obvious was added to the "Patent Act".
_	Amend 23 U.S.C. 131 (the highway statute) to provide that the grant of primary and Interstate funds be conditioned with the requirement that the erection and maintenance of all outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices in all areas within of the outer edge of pavement of the primary system and Interstate system of highway be controlled.
_	In sabre, the inadequacy of existing sensors has made it necessary to dispense with the requirement that a cut must be delivered with either the leading or the reverse edge of the blade and that, once again, it must arrive with sufficient force to have caused an injury had the blade been sharp (but not so forcefully as to injure your opponent with a blunt weapon!)
_	The eigenvalue formula_18 of this Sturm-Liouville differential equation is fixed by the requirement that formula_19 must be finite for formula_20.
_	This is the final round where home field advantage is given, due to the requirement that all semi-final matches must be played at a neutral venue.
_	The consensual nature of payment thus derives from the requirement that both debtor must offer, and creditor must accept, the medium of payment; and secondly from the fact that creditor rejection of procurement, even if his agent is in receipt of the payment, results in a failure to effect payment.
_	Later, A. Shabani and Lidar generalized the DFS framework relaxing the requirement that the initial state needs to be a DF-state and modified some known conditions for DFS.
_	Share-alike imposes the requirement that any freedom that is granted regarding the original work must be granted on exactly the same or compatible terms in any derived work: this implies that any copyleft license is automatically a share-alike license, but not the other way around, as some share-alike licenses include further restrictions, for instance prohibiting commercial use.
_	It also introduced the requirement that importers use "reasonable care" in making entry and providing the initial classification and appraisement, establishing a "shared responsibility" between Customs and importers, thus allowing Customs to rely on the accuracy of the information submitted and streamline entry procedures.
_	It is important to note that the change has created the requirement that sour service, ERW pipe, pass a hydrogen induced cracking (HIC) test per NACE TM0284 in order to be used for sour service.
_	The court determined that those provisions were intended to dispense with the requirement that a challenged law be the result of demonstrable racial animus on the legislator's part, but that they still required that there be some causal connection between discrimination and disparity.
_	In 2014, Armes co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics, but he did not vote on final passage of the bill, which was approved, 88-5.
_	Among the more noteworthy defect reports addressed by C++03 was the library defect report 69, whose resolution added the requirement that elements in a vector are stored contiguously.
_	The HIV Organ Policy Equity Act amends the Public Health Service Act to repeal the requirement that the Organ Procurement and Transplantation Network adopt and use standards of quality for the acquisition and transportation of donated organs that include standards for preventing the acquisition of organs infected with the etiologic agent for acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS).
_	Essentially, the Rome Statute employs the same definition of crimes against humanity that the ICTR Statute does, minus the requirement that the attack was carried out ‘on national, political, ethnic, racial or religious grounds’.
_	The Fairness for American Families Act () is a bill that would "amend the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, to delay until 2015 the requirement that individuals maintain minimal essential health care coverage."
_	Turner with the requirement that they could only be exhibited in January, this to protect them from the ill-effects of sunlight.
_	In 72/71 BC, setting out some standard defences to a charge of obtaining property by 'force' or 'violence' ("uis") in his speech on behalf of his client Marcus Tullius, he referred to the requirement that the dispossessed party's claim to possession not be based upon entry by force, stealth or licence ('cum ille possideret, quod possideret nec ui nec clam nec precario' - 'as long as the other party was in lawful possession and did not gain possession by force, stealth or licence').
_	However, it did not address the requirement that electors must vote for their pledged candidate.
_	He and his staff created two requirements that became fundamental to the structure of the organization, which were the requirement that troop charters be issued to a community organization or established group of citizens (first known as the sponsoring institution and now known as a chartered organization), and secondly, that each Scoutmaster would be under the supervision of a registered troop committee consisting of a chairman and at least two members who were not the Scoutmaster or his assistants.
_	As the requirement that each color class be a clique or independent is weaker than the requirement for coloring (in which each color class must be an independent set) and stronger than for subcoloring (in which each color class must be a disjoint union of cliques), it follows that the cochromatic number of "G" is less than or equal to the chromatic number of "G", and that it is greater than or equal to the subchromatic number of "G".
_	For instance, the parliament did forgo an earlier proposition for a parliamentary in favor for the proposition by Lallemand which included the requirement that the commission operated behind closed doors (in contravention to the regular parliamentary inquiry procedures).
_	When formulated in terms of generalized coordinates, this is equivalent to the requirement that the generalized forces for any virtual displacement are zero, that is "F"=0.
_	The Court believed that Mid Atlantic's claim was one for equitable restitution, because the Sereboffs' possession of the settlement funds satisfied the requirement that was missing in "Knudson".
_	The number of times a message changed hands in the days of the visual telegraph (circa 1800–1850) was determined by the requirement that two stations be connected by line-of-sight.
_	First among the criteria is the requirement that the employee of an approved organization was actively serving on or after 22 September 1998, and has completed at least twenty years of service with one or more approved organizations.
_	Marshall personally supported the treaty's adoption, but recommended several changes, including the requirement that all parties to it acknowledge the Monroe Doctrine and the United States' sphere of influence, and that the tenth article be made non-binding.
_	Just as the quadratic reciprocity law for the Legendre symbol is also true for the Jacobi symbol, the requirement that the numbers be prime is not needed; it suffices that they be odd relatively prime nonunits.
_	Classical methods of stereology were limited by the requirement that the cutting plane be randomly oriented.
_	The "Local Government Act, 1993" removed the requirement that the administrative head of a council be a "Town or Shire Clerk" and specified that the head was to be known as the General Manager.
_	In the Grand Committee, Benjamin Franklin successfully proposed the requirement that revenue bills originate in the house.
_	The symmetry of a crystal is constrained by the requirement that the unit cells stack perfectly with no gaps.
_	Many authors include the requirement that the space be completely regular right in the definition of pseudocompactness.
_	The criteria for OPD in Wales include the requirement that 65% of all subsistence, or 30% of food and 35% of livelihood, come from the land.
_	The all-events test, under U.S. federal income tax law, is the requirement that all the events fixing an accrual-method taxpayer's right to receive income or incur expense must occur before the taxpayer can report an item of income or expense.
_	The clause confers a power separate and distinct from those later enumerated[,] is not restricted in meaning by the grant of them, and Congress consequently has a substantive power to tax and to appropriate, limited only by the requirement that it shall be exercised to provide for the general welfare of the United States. …
_	Morris had in fact scored equal points to Brock but lost the title due to the requirement that only the best six scores counted to the championship totals.
_	With this the requirement that Jews live in the Ghetto came to an end.
_	Following the ceremony, the school removed the requirement that the prayer be nonsectarian and nonproselytizing.
_	A direct result of the changes that were effective from 1 January 2000 was the requirement that most loose goods sold by weight, volume or length (for example, potatoes or tomatoes that were sold loose, or cheese or meat that was cut or weighed in front of the customer) must be priced and measured using metric units.
_	The in humans is 30 μg which led to the requirement that the medicine include an equal dose of an antidote, diprenorphine or naloxone.
_	However, its (anti-)commutation law relative to "c"—i. e., its quantization prescription, which ignores the spin-statistics theorem by giving Fermi–Dirac statistics to a spin-0 particle—will be given by the requirement that the inner product on our Fock space of asymptotic states be singular along directions corresponding to the raising and lowering operators of some combination of non-BRST-closed and BRST-exact fields.
_	The teachers union sued the school district, challenging the requirement that teachers must reapply for their jobs.
_	The "Local Government Act, 1993" removed the requirement that the administrative head of a council be a "Town or Shire Clerk" and specified that the head was to be known as the "General Manager".
_	Regulations governing the required thrust levels for transport aircraft are typically based upon the requirement that an aircraft be able to continue a takeoff if an engine fails after the takeoff decision speed is reached.
_	This government was also remembered as a reforming government, for instance removed the requirement that Irish be passed to obtain a Leaving Certificate; also of reforming the civil service by removing the requirement of knowledge in Irish and the mandatory retirement on marriage that many women faced during their civil service careers.
_	He protested the requirement that readmitted Southern states ratify the Fourteenth Amendment, which guaranteed equal protection of the laws to all Americans.
_	In addition to the requirement that just (cash) compensation be paid for the removal of lawfully erected signs the Act was also amended:
_	It has three essential and related elements: study of the written Torah (the books of Genesis, Exodus, Leviticus, Numbers, and Deuteronomy); the recognition of Israel (defined as the descendants of Abraham through his grandson Jacob) as a people elected by God as recipients of the law at Mount Sinai, his chosen people; and the requirement that Israel live in accordance with God's laws as given in the Torah.
_	These restrictive practices included the London Stock Exchange's rules establishing fixed minimum commissions, the "single capacity" rule (which enforced a separation between brokers acting as agents for their clients on commission and jobbers who made the markets and theoretically provided liquidity by holding lines of stocks and shares on their books), the requirement that both brokers and jobbers should be independent and not part of any wider financial group, and the stock exchange's exclusion of all foreigners from stock exchange membership.
_	In 2014, Barrow co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers to have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; only five House members opposed the measure.
_	Miller's Alaska state court lawsuit essentially repeated his federal suit allegations, but added new charges of voter fraud, claiming that precinct election officials had allowed voting without proper identification, and claiming that identical handwriting was suspiciously found on multiple ballots, which was also a violation of the requirement that a voter must personally pen a write-in ballot.
_	This second point would make Australia II illegal under the requirement that the boat be "designed and constructed in country" as the Deed of Gift that governed the competition stipulated.
_	In January 2012, India approved reforms for single-brand stores welcoming anyone in the world to innovate in Indian retail market with 100% ownership, but imposed the requirement that the single brand retailer source 30 percent of its goods from India.
_	With the requirement that money had to be raised by both blacks and whites, and schools approved by local school boards (controlled by whites), Rosenwald stimulated construction of more than 5,000 schools built across the South.
_	Berenguer extended to the entire colony the requirement that no one be admitted into meetings of the guilds or confraternities without being decently dressed.
_	Lawrence Lessig, who announced his campaign on September 6, criticized the requirement that Democratic candidates must earn at least 1% in three major national polls in the six weeks before the debate.
_	Often the definition is extended with the requirement that the treatment of programs and data in memory be interchangeable or uniform.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	It continued on as a separate union registered only in Queensland, and subsequently gained federal registration in Queensland during the 2000s on the requirement that the union rules limited the union's operation to Queensland.
_	In 2014, Bishop co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He did not vote on the requirement that companies give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	The bill would revise similarly the requirement that organ procurement organizations arrange for testing to prevent the acquisition of organs infected with the AIDS etiologic agent to require that they arrange for testing to identify organs infected with HIV.
_	The bill would repeal the requirement that Ranch A be used for: (1) fish and wildlife management and educational activities; and (2) maintenance and restoration of the museum-quality real and personal property there.
_	Here, the requirement that be even is necessary in order to prevent the result from being a bipartite graph.
_	Fifth, the law removes from the “regarded as” prong of the disability definition (the third prong of the definition) the requirement that an individual demonstrate that the impairment that he or she has, or is perceived to have, limits a major life activity in a way that is "perceived to be substantial".
_	PPD-40 specifies certain requirements for continuity plan development, including the requirement that all federal executive branch departments and agencies develop an integrated, overlapping continuity capability, that supports the eight National Essential Functions (NEFs) described in the document.
_	While maintaining its history and the symbolism derived from the Masonic fraternity, because of what Baird's cites (pIII-1) as a decline in the number of student Masons in undergraduate schools, Acacia opted in 1931 to relax the requirement that members must be Masons, removing the provision entirely in 1933.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	In 2014, Harris co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88–5.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	It does not enforce the requirement that Arkansas lawyers must complete 12 credits of Continuing Legal Education each year.; that is the function of the Arkansas Continuing Legal Education Board
_	By involving Leppington, the Church met the requirement that the bequest be used to help destitute children.
_	Mr. Javdanfar said that not all clauses of the law had been passed through the parliament and said the requirement that Jews, Christians and Zoroastrians wear special insignia might be part of an older version of the Islamic dress law, which was first written two years ago.
_	Among the provisions of the Treaty of Lausanne was the requirement that refugees from Anatolia now living in former Ottoman territories be entitled to citizenship.
_	In 2014, Pylant co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He opposed the requirement that companies give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	This condition can be translated in the requirement that, given a high-pressure zone with a constant pressure slope at a certain latitude, there must be a circular region around the high without wind.
_	Their intention was to waive the requirement that the award be granted solely for works completed during the previous year.
_	Implicit in this right is the requirement that magistrates give reasons for their decisions, unlike jury verdicts in the Crown Court.
_	Among the standards evaluated is the requirement that law schools have a law library.
_	To make HDMI more suitable for use on PC devices, version 1.2 also removed the requirement that only explicitly supported formats be used.
_	The extension came with the requirement that he be ordained to the priesthood at the end of the seven year interval.
_	In 2014, Chaney co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	Guy jointly introduced the theory of a partisan game, in which the requirement that a play available to one player be available to both is relaxed.
_	Without the requirement that "f"(1) = 1, one could still have "f"(1) = 0, but then "f"("a") = 0 for all positive integers "a", so this is not a very strong restriction.
_	This growth was hastened when the fraternity decided to drop the requirement that at least half the members of any petitioning fraternal group be working toward a degree in the teaching profession.
_	His car was listed as a Snoeck-Bolide, and was effectively a French-designed Lefebvre-Bolide car built under licence in Belgium by Etablissements Mathias Snoeck, in order to meet the requirement that all parts of the car be produced in the country that it represents.
_	Other general rules of admissibility also apply, such as the requirement that the declaration is based on the declarant's actual knowledge.
_	After the passing of the Elizabethan Poor Law (1601), outdoor relief was the kind of poor relief where assistance was in the form of money, food, clothing or goods, given to alleviate poverty without the requirement that the recipient enter an institution.
_	In 1984, however, three 911s modified to 959 specifications (due to the requirement that Group B cars be based on production cars with at least 200 built) were used in the Paris-Dakar Rally, with Jacky Ickx the prime motivator.
_	The British Admiralty ordered her in 1774 with the requirement that her design follow that of , the 18-gun French sloop-of-war "Cheveret", which the Royal Navy had captured on 30 January 1761 and that had disappeared, presumed foundered, during a hurricane in 1776.
_	One additional Commissioner is elected for each 300 members of the State Bar in a circuit "who maintain their principal office in the circuit as of March of each year, subject to the requirement that no circuit is entitled to more than ten Commissioners."
_	Through his textbook, Ciottone first suggested the requirement that Emergency Management be a part of the knowledge base necessary for the practice of Disaster Medicine, something that is commonly accepted today.
_	Some amendments made minor changes, such as removing the requirement that elections occur on a public holiday, but others were more radical.
_	"Pay equality", or equal pay for equal work, refers to the requirement that men and women be paid the same if performing the same job in the same organization.
_	Though the new Act kept the requirement that a Parliament be called least once in three years, there was no mechanism to enforce this requirement.
_	The uniqueness requirement can be replaced by the requirement that the magma be cancellative.
_	However, since 2005, the NFPA's NEC allows transformerless, or non-galvanically isolated, inverters by removing the requirement that all solar electric systems be negative grounded and specifying new safety requirements.
_	Neither is the requirement that the assessment ballot process be limited to property owners.
_	Aside from condemning all other churches, Irvine's doctrine included the rejection of church buildings, damnation of all followers of churches outside the new fellowship, rejection of paid ministry, rejection of collections during services and collection boxes, and the requirement that those seeking to join the ministry "sell all".
_	Some, including the requirement that all homes be fully detached and the prohibition of commercial and multifamily buildings, remain largely in effect through zoning laws.
_	Where archaeological requirements apply to a site of proposed development, if no significant archaeological or other cultural property sites are found in the impacted area, construction may proceed as planned, often with the requirement that archaeologists are on-site providing a watching brief.
_	Education at the secondary and university levels has been seriously hampered by the requirement that most males perform military service before completing their education.
_	Films that are eligible for the award must meet a series of criteria, including the requirement that the costumes must have been "conceived" by a costume designer.
_	The eccentricity is limited in this case by the requirement that close approaches of to the planet are avoided.
_	The California legislature passed legislation to remove the requirement that teachers be keenly sighted in order to be certified as teachers and banned discrimination for teachers in the university application process, their education, and their job search process.
_	(The requirement that "y" > 1 corresponds to the requirement that a polite representation have more than one term; applying the same construction for "y" = 1 would just lead to the trivial one-term representation "x" = "x".)
_	Gorski signed the controversial item pricing law in 1991, making Erie County one of the early counties to confirm the requirement that most supermarket products have a price tags.
_	The principle that the common law enforced a union's own rules, and that unions were free to arrange their affairs is reflected in the ILO Freedom of Association Convention, and article 11 of the European Convention on Human Rights, subject to the requirement that regulations "necessary in a democratic society" may be imposed.
_	But the school is always bound by the requirement that the rules and regulations must be reasonable.
_	ATA's attempt at integrating TCQ was constrained by the requirement that ATA host bus adapters use ISA bus device protocols to interact with the operating system.
_	At one time, the technique was also taught as part of standard CPR training with the requirement that it must be administered within 60 seconds of the onset of symptoms.
_	Further restrictions were added in November 2008, when the Commission added the requirement that such material must be placed at least 60 inches off the ground in order to be out of the reach of many children.
_	This is equivalent to the requirement that once a new element is added, all elements that were added before have to be removed before the new element can be removed.
_	In 1978, when the church was restored, the requirement that it be rebuilt exactly like the original meant that the 1/8 turn in the steeple had to be maintained.
_	Repeals the exception for bona fide third party charges not retained by the mortgage originator, creditor, or an affiliate from the requirement that total points and fees not exceed 3% of the total new loan amount.
_	First, it eliminated the requirement that qualified immunity issues be considered in order.
_	The costs were exacerbated by the requirement that the ships be built in Canada, which had political benefits for the Trudeau government that had authorized the program.
_	Another key item was the requirement that mortgage lenders provide consumers with a Credit Disclosure Notice that included their credit scores, range of scores, credit bureaus, scoring models, and factors affecting their scores.
_	In 2014, James did not vote on the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; only five House members opposed the measure.
_	This is in addition to the requirement that a prime minister prove he has the support of the Lok Sabha (by a vote on the floor of the house) within weeks of being sworn into office.
_	The strength required for a trademark to deserve dilution protection differs among jurisdictions, though it generally includes the requirement that it must be distinctive, famous, or even unique.
_	With an opinion that stressed "the requirement that a defendant 'knowingly and intelligently' waive his Miranda rights", the Court reversed Garibay's conviction and remanded his case.
_	In light of the requirement that theorems be proved, the concept of a theorem is fundamentally "deductive", in contrast to the notion of a scientific law, which is "experimental".
_	The choice of site caused early delays but in 1910 an architectural competition was announced with the requirement that the hall be simple but dignified.
_	Section 2(b)(2) added the requirement that a major conflict occur at least 10 years ago in order to be authorized in Area I.
_	Lessig was excluded from the first Democratic debate on CNN, after having criticized the requirement that Democratic candidates must earn at least 1% in three major national polls in the six weeks before the debate.
_	Pre-primary education (preschool education) embraces children between 3 and 6/7 years old, who attend kindergarten optionally, with the requirement that prior to starting school, children must attend two years of pre-school education.
_	Capablanca objected to the time limit, the short playing times, the thirty-game limit, and especially the requirement that he must win by two games to claim the title, which he regarded as unfair.
_	If A is complete, then we can remove the requirement that "G" be finitely generated; most generally, we can form finitary enriched limits in A.
_	Pittock was preparing to move into the Pittock Mansion and leased the entire block to a California investor with the requirement that a "worthy" building named after Pittock would be built on the site.
_	Among these reforms was the requirement that law schools provide more detailed and complete information about employment outcomes for graduates.
_	After he moved back to Taiwan, Lee Teng-hui had asked him twice in the 1990s to serve in the Executive Yuan Council, but each time he refused; reportedly, the requirement that he renounce U.S. citizenship was a major barrier.
_	After the February 26 Incident in 1936, the Japanese military had obtained a restoration of the requirement that the Army and Navy Ministers must be selected only from active duty officers.
_	Inversely, despite being on the losing team, the judges liked Baylor's look.<br>Note 2: Genevieve and Jason, after previously being eliminated, were brought back in Episode 9 with the requirement that their team had to win the challenge in order for them to remain in the competition.
_	The LCA and the LIV also criticised s 187A(6), which introduces the requirement that telecommunication service providers create data not currently captured through their services.
_	However, with the redesign, that cap was lifted, albeit with the requirement that each planet required two additional levels of research, with a progressive cost.
_	In the United States and Canada, usage of manual Zenith numbers diminished after the 1967 introduction of interstate direct-dial 1-800 InWATS toll-free service; the requirement that +1-800 numbers arrive on special fixed-rate trunks ended in 1982.
_	The pilot programs would retain the requirement that the food stamps be purchased, but eliminated the concept of special stamps for surplus foods.
_	Katz has studied the additional tilings allowed by dropping the vertex constraints and imposing only the requirement that the edge arrows match.
_	The idea was to always have the belt buckled thereby doing away with the requirement that the driver and passenger remember to buckle up.
_	In 1983, Terje André Hildeng purchased the company from the labor movement, with the requirement that the employees own ten percent.
_	These include the requirement that the Senate may advise and must consent to some of the president's government appointments; also the Senate must consent to all treaties with foreign governments; it tries all impeachments, and it elects the vice president in the event no person gets a majority of the electoral votes.
_	The Revolutionary government, in the name of equality, had abolished the requirement that doctors have licenses, and had allowed anyone to treat patients; in 1801 Napoleon's new Prefect of the Seine reported that, of the seven hundred persons listed as "doctors" in the official Almanac of Commerce, only three hundred had formal medical training.
_	A new law on 9 March 1803 restored the title of "Doctor" and the requirement that physicians have medical degrees.
_	The well-definedness condition corresponds to the requirement that every infinite path must eventually pass through a sufficiently long node: the same requirement that is needed to invoke a bar induction.
_	Crowley does not suggest the course itself be removed, only the requirement that all freshmen take the course.
_	These regulations include the requirement that all animal feed must be certified organic.
_	Among admissions criteria is the requirement that patients must present a "grave and immediate danger" to the public.
_	To end the secession, a law (the "Hortensian Law") was passed, which ended the requirement that the Patrician senators consent before a bill could be brought before the Plebeian Council for a vote.
_	Another cost of the increased bandwidth is the requirement that the chips are packaged in a more expensive and difficult to assemble BGA package as compared to the TSSOP package of the previous memory generations such as DDR SDRAM and SDR SDRAM.
_	That year, Dell launched Candlelight Ecstasy, the first line to waive the requirement that heroines be virginal.
_	Newborn screening samples are collected from the infant between 24 hours and 7 days after birth, with the requirement that the baby has fed at least once.
_	The Lithuanian statute of 1566 placed a number of restrictions on the Jews, and imposed sumptuary laws, including the requirement that they wear distinctive clothing, including yellow caps for men and yellow kerchiefs for women.
_	From the 1984 election, group ticket voting was introduced, in order to reduce a high rate of informal voting that arose from the requirement that each candidate be given a preference, and to allow small parties and independent candidates a reasonable chance of winning a seat.
_	During the 2009 legislative session, Representative Jill Chambers, the MARTOC chairperson at the time, introduced a bill that would place MARTA under GRTA, and permanently remove the requirement that MARTA split its expenditures 50/50 between capital and operations.
_	To "vet" was originally a horse-racing term, referring to the requirement that a horse be checked for health and soundness by a veterinarian before being allowed to race.
_	Section 176 further enforces the requirement that a Supervisor be a property owner in the district to which s/he is elected.
_	However, his wife is a Professor at the School of Theology in Oslo, and thus fulfills the requirement that one must be able to provide for their spouse.
_	Judge Michael F. Adams, an Australian judge, at the end of his tenure in the tribunal commenting on accountability in UN system observed “Someone in the position of Under Secretary General is never confronted with the requirement that particular questions be answered.”
_	In Great Britain, the Police and Criminal Evidence Act of 1984 built certain protections into the questioning process, including the requirement that all suspect interviews be taped.
_	The U.S. Army Air Corps awarded a contract for the prototype XB-24 in March 1939, with the requirement that one example should be ready before the end of the year.
_	An additional layer of privacy and security protection for consumer data provided by the Act is the requirement that service providers protect retained data through encryption and introduce the "Telecommunications Sector Security Reforms", which require service providers to do their best to prevent unauthorised access and interference.
_	The CFL agreed to study the feasibility of the Argos playing at BMO Field, which was built too short to fit a full length Canadian football field despite the requirement that the stadium be convertible to CFL configuration in the original stadium agreement.
_	On 21 June 2010, the Court of First Instance held that the requirement that, subject to a grace period of 56 days, an adult applicant for Comprehensive Social Security Assistance ("CSSA") must have resided in Hong Kong continuously for at least one year immediately before the date of application is unconstitutional since it unjustifiably infringes the freedom to travel and the right to equality.
_	Neglecting all other higher order terms, and enforcing the requirement that the plate does not change its thickness, the strain tensor components reduce to the von Kármán strains
_	Second, it strengthened the requirement that the commissioners examine the financial condition of life insurance companies, by explicitly requiring an annual actuarial valuation of every outstanding policy issued by each company doing business in the state.
_	The software then uses a primitive morphing technology to generate frames in-between the user-created frames, allowing complex animations to be created without the requirement that every frame be drawn by the user.
_	There is also the requirement that no two "downward" references point to the same node.
_	He created bills signed into law that would allow for the state takeover of failing school districts and the requirement that 11th grade high school students pass a standardized test (High School Proficiency Assessment) to graduate high school.
_	He placed plain-paper facsimile machines, which then cost more than $7,000 each, in six title company offices in the San Antonio area, with the requirement that those companies send their document requests to his firm.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	When a major reconstruction was commenced in 1990, Piano was selected to design the new buildings on five of the fifteen sites of the project, with the requirement that the buildings have roofs of copper, and facades of clear glass and materials of a baked earth color.
_	Prior to the requirement that all Californian law graduates must take the State Bar Exam, Santa Clara Law was one of the five schools whose graduates were exempt from the examination, along with Boalt Hall, Hastings, Stanford, and USC.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	The Royal Academy of Engineering under the banner of the Royal Society published a report in June 2012 that covered all aspects of the technology, and this has informed extensive legislation with the many government licensing authorities, including the requirement that only non hazardous chemicals may be used..
_	The Third Lateran Council had initially set the requirement that two-thirds of the cardinals were needed to elect a pope in 1179.
_	Whilst the Senate grew in prestige with 3 censuses to reduce its membership in 28BC, 18BC and 11BC and similarly with the imposition of its membership with the requirement that senators be worth 1 million sesterces, Augustus increasingly had the foremost role in the Roman state.
_	In a lawsuit, U.S. Army veteran and teacher Paul Murphy challenged the constitutionality of the $1000 excise tax on handguns; the requirement that he obtain a license and register his weapons; the restrictions on how he may store his weapons at home; the ban on large capacity magazines; the ban on rifles in calibers above .223; the ban on "assault weapons"; and the ban on transporting operable firearms.
_	Barr testified in favor of the bill because it would "remove the requirement that Valley View Ferry captains be licensed through the Coast Guard, and instead allow the state to implement its own licensing requirement."
_	It also includes the fact that the governor general in most circumstances is required to grant Royal Assent to bills adopted by both houses of parliament, and the requirement that the prime minister either resign or request a dissolution and general election upon losing a vote of confidence in the House of Commons.
_	Hill gained autonomy from the Baptist State Convention of North Carolina when the state convention voted to eliminate the requirement that it have final approval over who could serve as trustees for the school; this ruling allows the university to choose non-Baptists as trustees.
_	In 2012, the IAAF Gold Label was awarded to the event, after satisfying the last condition in April that year: the requirement that the race could be followed live on television in at least five countries.
_	The necessity for Faddeev–Popov ghosts follows from the requirement that quantum field theories yield unambiguous, non-singular solutions.
_	Prior to the court case, Teladoc v. Texas Medical Board, the Texas Medical Board upheld the requirement that physicians must hold in-person, patient examinations only.
_	In addition to the requirement that formula_1 be total, transitive and continuous, He added a "sensitivity" requirement:
_	The bill would have shortened a station's license term from eight years to four, with the requirement that a license-holder cover important issues fairly, hold local public hearings about its coverage twice a year, and document to the FCC how it was meeting its obligations.
_	XVI reinstated the requirement that a papal election require a two-thirds majority regardless of the number ballots taken.
_	Also counted the transmitter according to the right-hand unduly background music note when making calls as music, making it thought to be able to meet the requirement that the music must fulfill 95 percent of the airtime between 7am and 7pm.
_	A commonwealth's attorney is a constitutional officer, which means that the job is established in the state's constitution which defines the position, the broad powers of the elected officeholder and in Virginia, the requirement that every county and every city be served by a commonwealth's attorney.
_	Tribes such as the Chickasaw, Creek, Timucua, Caddo, and Apalachee were organized into ranked clans, with the requirement that one cannot marry within one's clan.
_	It was not clear how non-working spouses could enroll in the program or receive benefits due to the requirement that the beneficiary must have had sufficient earnings to be credited with income quarters under the Social Security Act.
_	He shortened the course leading to the Doctorate in theology from fifteen to fourteen years, and he removed the requirement that Doctors of Medicine be in holy orders.
_	I.e., it is the same as in American-style, but with the additional requirement that one not sink an opponent's ball (doing so is a fault), and lacking the requirement that ball and pocket have to be called (i.e. are perfectly valid, even on the black.)
_	The teachers union sued the school district challenging the requirement that teachers must reapply for their jobs.
_	In May 2011, the requirement that presidential candidates present proof of natural born citizenship was added but later trimmed from an omnibus election law reform bill.
_	The formula follows from the requirement that the number of votes received by winning candidates (the Droop quota) must be greater than the remaining votes that might be received by an additional candidate or candidates (the Droop quota – 1):
_	He started assembling Chrysler's in 1933 at his factory on Castleforbes Road, after the introduction of the requirement that all cars sold in Ireland had to be assembled there.
_	Later, Alexander I, responding to the 1820 morganatic marriage of his brother and heir, added the requirement that consorts of all Russian dynasts in the male line had to be of equal birth (i.e., born to a royal or sovereign dynasty).
_	He ignored them, and when they objected to him charging money to stay in the treehouses, Garnier then allowed visitors to stay for free, with the requirement that they buy a $75 T-shirt first.
_	Moreover, he disliked the requirement that each installment end with a cliffhanger, which was unlike his normal style.
_	East Indians entering the colony were also subject to particular crown laws which segregated them from the rest of Trinidad's population, such as the requirement that they carry a pass with them once off the plantations, and that if freed, they carry their "Free Papers" or certificate indicating completion of the indenture period.
_	An amendment was made to Iran's constitution removing the requirement that the Supreme Leader be a Marja and this allowed Ali Khamenei, the new favoured jurist who had suitable revolutionary credentials but lacked scholarly ones and who was not a Grand Ayatollah, to be designated as successor.
_	In March, Andrew Carnegie tentatively agreed to donate (equivalent of $ million in ) to construct sixty-five branch libraries in the city, with the requirement that they be operated and maintained by the City of New York.
_	No-ad scoring eliminates the requirement that a player must win by two points.
_	While the main studio concept nominally remains in US broadcast regulations, and certain administrative requirements (such as the local employment of a manager and the equivalent of at least one other full-time staff member, as well as the maintenance of a public inspection file) are still applied, removal of the requirement that stations originate local content greatly weakens the significance of maintaining a local main studio.
_	The Fairness for American Families Act would amend the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, to delay until 2015 the requirement that individuals maintain minimal essential health care coverage.
_	Games six and seven were played back-to-back due to a Lady Gaga concert, held on April 25 at the Bell Centre, and the requirement that the first round of the playoffs end by April 27.
_	Here, the requirement that the map is conformal is nothing more than the statement
_	Despite minor controversy over the requirement that students pass the test before graduating high school, the test became an accepted part of the state education system, until it was replaced in 2014.
_	The Taft Court is also notable for being the first court able to exert some control over its own docket, as the Judiciary Act of 1925 instituted the requirement that almost all cases receive a writ of certiorari from four justices before appearing before the Supreme Court.
_	Some have added the requirement that there also be signs or symptoms of low blood volume for the condition to exist.
_	Due to several abuses of powers by officials, many of whom had been appointed by Chilperic, several mandates were made, among them the requirement that officials must have come from the region they officiate over.
_	A duty-free shop is a retail outlet that is exempt from the payment of certain local or national taxes and duties, on the requirement that the goods sold will be sold to travelers who will take them out of the country.
_	Residents, which numbered over 200 by August 2006, Katrina's first anniversary, were able to stay rent-free for five years, with the requirement that (if able-bodied) they contribute to the community by learning new skills or using their existing skills.
_	The indictment charged Hastert with unlawfully structuring the withdrawal of $952,000 in cash in order to evade the requirement that banks report cash transactions over 10,000 (Title 31, United States Code, Section 5324(a)(3)), and making false statements to the FBI about the purpose of his withdrawals (Title 18, United States Code, Section 1001(a)(2)).
_	With hardship came praise, and the newly made law ordered the requirement that "All municipalities dedicate not only a principal street in every town to Marti, but also a statue, bust, obelisk, commemorative column, bronze plaque or stone tablet" on public property.
_	It also empowered the Patent Office to begin printing, and dropped the requirement that applicants submit two copies of their applications (which had been implemented after multiple conflagrations in the Patent Office destroyed large numbers of patent records).
_	Leonard A. Lauder was awarded the Foreign Language Advocacy Award in 1990 by the Northeast Conference on the Teaching of Foreign Languages in recognition of Mr. Lauder's support for the requirement that MBA students in the Institute attain superior levels of linguistic proficiency and engage in immersion experiences to attain cultural proficiency.
_	Thebus has been criticised, though, for having dispensed with the causation element, and for its infringement on the presumption of innocence and the requirement that the prosecution prove each element of the crime.
_	His humiliation is compounded by the requirement that he appear on deck every two hours in full dress uniform, a punishment usually reserved for young midshipmen.
_	Safeguarding the Director's independence is the requirement that all instructions from the Attorney General be in writing and published in the Canada Gazette.
_	The design of the Connecticut Tercentenary half dollar was a Public Works Administration project, and as such was a technical violation of the requirement that the federal government not pay for the design.
_	Its core premises include the requirement that learning should be based on doing some hands-on experiments and activities.
_	In the last few decades the FCC has discarded the requirement that a station be located in the corresponding numerical district.
_	The eigenvalue formula_28 of this Sturm-Liouville differential equation is fixed by the requirement that formula_29 must be finite for formula_30.
_	The structure of the tree is determined by the requirement that it be heap-ordered: that is, the priority number for any non-leaf node must be greater than or equal to the priority of its children.
_	It is in the formal proof that this relation is an equivalence relation that the requirement that the second coordinate is not zero is needed (for verifying transitivity).
_	In 2014, Burrell co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers to have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; only five House members opposed the measure.
_	This amendment asked voters to remove the requirement that Virginia citizens must register to vote in-person and permits voter registration by mail.
_	This amendment also removed the requirement that prevented citizens from cancelling their voter registration if they had voted in the past 4 years.
_	This repealed the requirement that municipalities bear all costs of radial construction, but allowed Ontario Hydro to develop co-operative agreements between Hydro and municipalities for radial construction.
_	IBM also claims that SCO's SCOsource program is incompatible with the requirement that redistributions of GPLed works must be free of copyright licensing fees (fees may be charged for the acts of duplication and support).
_	After some delay, owing to the requirement that the Coast Guard obtain written permission from the owners and insurers of "Alva Cape" before sinking her, the process of towing her out of the harbor began at dawn on July 2, when lines were attached fore and aft to tugboats "Kerry Moran" and "Nancy Moran".<ref name="nyt 7/2"></ref>
_	Among PPACA’s provisions are: the requirement that all U.S. citizens and legal residents possess health insurance; the creation of refundable tax credits for households between 100% and 400% of the federal poverty line; the expansion of Medicaid eligibility; the provision of free preventative services; the extension of dependent coverage to age 26; new funding to support community health centers; and more.
_	A non-metric connection is not determined by a metric tensor formula_173; instead, it is and restricted by the requirement that the parallel transport formula_174 between points formula_77 and formula_176 must be a linear combination of the base vectors in formula_177.
_	One key factor is the requirement that such products are readily available, reasonably priced, and pass the required performance standards of their non-biobased counterparts.
_	This measure would eliminate the requirement that state education spending increase at a set rate.
_	Among unique features of the North American game are the separation of play into downs instead of releasing the ball immediately upon tackling, the requirement that the team with the ball set into a set formation for at least one second before resuming play after a tackle (and the allowance of up to 40 seconds to do so), the allowance for one forward pass from behind the site of the last tackle on each down, the evolution of hard plastic equipment (particularly the football helmet and shoulder pads), a smaller and pointier ball that is favorable to being passed but makes drop kicks impractical, a generally smaller and narrower field measured in customary units instead of metric (in some variants of the American game a field can be as short as 50 yards between end zones), and a distinctive field (shaped like a gridiron, from which the code's nickname is derived) with lines marked in five-yard intervals.
_	The hijackers' threat to crash the aircraft into a nuclear reactor led directly to the requirement that U.S. airline passengers be physically screened, beginning January 5, 1973.
_	In 1994, the Ontario Human Rights Commission upheld a complaint by a female principal that the requirement that she be a member of FWTAO was discrimination.
_	Computed tomography (CT or CAT) scans can detect much smaller amounts of fluid than chest radiography, but computed tomography is not a primary method of diagnosis within the trauma setting, due to the time required for imaging, the requirement that a patient remain supine, and the need to transport a critically ill patient to the scanner.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	In August 2018, legislation was introduced to the Parliament of Western Australia that will repeal the requirement that one must be "unmarried" for a change of sex to registered on one’s birth certificate.
_	LR(1) parsers have the requirement that each rule should be expressed in a complete LR(1) manner, i.e. a sequence of two states with a specific lookahead.
_	Among noteworthy changes is the requirement that male and female students take a course in home economics.
_	Other measures are taken to ensure the survival of the fishery, including strict rules on the minimum sizes and quantities of fish allowed to be taken, as well as the requirement that unwanted fish, such as the northern pike, be killed when caught.
_	However, with the requirement that men be enlisted into the armed forces during the war, women comprised half of the enrolment in the post-secondary system by 1944.
_	Lithium–sulfur system arranged in a network of nanoparticles eliminates the requirement that charge moves in and out of particles that are in direct contact with a conducting plate.
_	Increased standards for hockey helmets and the requirement that they be worn in competitive play has resulted in a decrease of serious head injury and fatalities.
_	However, their efforts were stymied in late December 1993 when the United States Olympic Committee denied a request for a waiver to the requirement that athletes be citizens by the national championships.
_	Some UK Christian Unions have had difficult relationships with the students' union due to their policy of allowing leaders to choose their successors in order, they argue, to ensure a Christian leadership (students' unions often require democratic processes be followed), opinions on issues such as homosexuality, and the requirement that leaders affirm a fixed Doctrinal Basis.
_	Specifically, it was decided that, while providing education is a charitable purpose, doing so only in exchange for an economic fee does not meet the requirement that the purpose is carried on for public rather than private benefit.
_	The basic set may have additional restrictions, such as the requirement that it use each interval only once.
_	The deal also removed the requirement that the provincial and territorial governments provide matching funds.
_	This analysis leads to the requirement that "n" must be at least 5.
_	The objection to the treaty by the spacefaring nations is held to be the requirement that extracted resources (and the technology used to that end) must be shared with other nations.
_	The Association itself became more egalitarian in these years, electing its first female member of the executive committee in 1972 and democratizing access to the Bar by allowing mail-in ballots for executive elections and eliminating the requirement that new members be nominated by current members.
_	The Arkansas General Assembly took steps in 1999 to authorize Instant Racing by removing the requirement that simulcast races be shown live.
_	The website quickly restored the video with a content warning and the requirement that viewers sign in (to verify their age).
_	Additional specific rules include the requirement that only the wheelchair wheels may be used to support the player: hands and feed cannot be used.
_	In some sense, this is also linked to the requirement that experiments should be reproducible.
_	The night before the meeting, Nickerson drafted a formal ritual for policyholders to comply with the requirement that they be a "lodge" or fraternal order.
_	A bill repealing the requirement that outstanding tax assessments be paid before a court appeal could be filed suffered a pocket veto.
_	It noted that it only regulates "misleading material where that material is likely to cause harm or offence" and "as a consequence, the requirement that content must not materially mislead the audience is necessarily a high test."
_	"R" Us also announced the requirement that baby products be produced without the addition of phthalates, which have raised concerns about infant safety.
_	Thus, the requirement that a tax return preparer use either a social security number or a PTIN when engaged in the business of preparing federal tax returns pre-dated the requirements that had been imposed by the Internal Revenue Service in its Registered Tax Return Preparer program.
_	The members of the Governing Council are appointed at the Plenary Session of the Provincial Council and are mayors and councillors from the province of Girona, with the requirement that at least half of them must be councillors on Girona Provincial Council.
_	The Court stated that the power of federal courts to engage in judicial review was limited by the requirement that the case be an actual case or controversy under Article III.
_	For example, if the requirement that every element has an inverse is eliminated, the resulting algebraic structure is called a monoid.
_	There is not the requirement that the heir be of the body of the original holder.
_	Netting out fixed costs, a firm then faces the requirement that "R ≥ VC", variable costs, in order to continue operating.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	More precisely, we would like to express the requirement that, should both actions be able to fire, the first one will be fired next.
_	Mormon leaders appealed to the state legislature to overturn the requirement that they leave the state, but the legislature tabled the issue until a date well after that when the Mormons would have left the state.
_	The senate of the school added the requirement that it "would not confine itself to economic applications, but would also give attention to business problems, which implied that operations research had to be included in the program."
_	Contributed to the requirement that Internet mail should include the four-digit representation of years, and thus avoid Y2K issues.
_	This number is less than the general case, which lacks the requirement that each bead must be distinct.
_	California Senate Bill 1827, the "State Income Tax Equity Act," establishes the requirement that couples registered as California domestic partners file their state income taxes as married couples.
_	An operator T is semisimple if every T-invariant subspace has a complementary T-invariant subspace (if the underlying field is algebraically closed, this is the same as the requirement that the operator be diagonalizable).
_	The provisions in the Carriage of Passengers Act had additional reporting requirements, such as the requirement that the manifest include "that part of the ship or vessel which the passenger had occupied during the voyage."
_	This included the requirement that, in translations of the liturgical texts from the official Latin originals, "the original text, insofar as possible, must be translated integrally and in the most exact manner, without omissions or additions in terms of their content, and without paraphrases or glosses.
_	In 2000, after being barred from applying for nomination papers in June because he was not of Hawaiian ancestry, Kenneth R. Conklin was one of 13 plaintiffs in a controversial lawsuit "Arakaki v. State of Hawai'i" challenging the requirement that candidates for election to the Office of Hawaiian Affairs board of trustees be Hawaiian.
_	The firm marketed itself as offering more rigorous screening of applicants, including in many states, the requirement that applicants submit to a polygraph examination and a drug screen for illicit and prescription drugs before hiring.
_	Further, while bearing the same general costs of everyday life, such as child care, one jointly filing family is unable to experience greater tax relief (available to individually filing parents), due to the requirement that child care expenses be applied to the lower spouse's income.
_	Section 49 of the Courts and Court Officers Act 1995, however, did abolish the requirement that barristers should wear wigs in court.
_	Bishop Kempf granted him permission for Lohfink to pursue a doctorate in theology with the requirement that he would initially serve as a pastor for a year in Frankfurt.
_	In an 8-0 decision (Justice James Clark McReynolds did not participate in the decision), the Court held, in an opinion written by Chief Justice Edward Douglass White, that the Sixteenth Amendment removes the requirement that income taxes be apportioned among the states according to population (, clause 4 of the U.S. Constitution).
_	The procedure for handing over the bombs added an extra ten minutes to the bombers' reaction time, and the requirement that US personnel had guardianship of the weapons at all times meant that neither they nor the bombers could be relocated to dispersal airfields as the RAF desired.
_	Under the multiversion concurrency control method, "non-repeatable reads" may occur when the requirement that a transaction affected by a commit conflict must roll back is relaxed.
_	Passage of the NCLEX or the CGFNS Examination by any passer of the compromised June 2006 PRC examination will not substitute for the requirement that he or she take the “special voluntary examination” authorized by Executive Order 609 issued by the Philippine Government on March 12, 2007.
_	Measures that effectively froze class distinctions were instituted, including the requirement that different classes live separately in different areas of a town and a prohibition on the carrying or ownership of weapons by farmers.
_	Stephen Baskerville states that laws establishing no-fault divorce did not stop at removing the requirement that grounds be cited for a divorce, so as to allow for divorce by "mutual consent"; it also allows either spouse to end the marriage without any agreement or fault by the other.
_	The most significant component of this law was its termination of the requirement that "auctoritas patrum" be obtained before any bill could be considered by the Plebeian Council.
_	Supporting Tanzil-ur-Rahman interpretation were several decisions handed down in the late 1980s and early 1990s declaring repugnant to Islam such things as the payment of court fees, interest on loans, or investments with a fixed rate of return, the requirement that divorce decrees needed to be recorded by family court to be valid.
_	At the same time the Petrine government set penalties for trafficking in printed materials from other foreign printers and introduced the requirement that the books had to be published "for the glory of the great sovereign" and were not to include any "abasement of our Imperial Majesty [...] and our state".
_	Some authors add the requirement that a Dedekind domain not be a field.
_	Other physical traits mark them different from other human beings, such as the requirement that all those who are born
_	Since then the requirement that Groups have a coherent political complexion has been enforced (as ITS later found out), and "mixed" Groups are not expected to appear again.
_	However, they are exempt from the requirement that a Firearm Certificate or Shotgun Certificate need be obtained to possess or acquire them provided that they meet certain limits as to their power.
_	In 1975, when the new charter was enacted that reincorporated the Town of Sugar Hill as the City of Sugar Hill, it added the requirement that a councilmen be appointed as mayor pro tempore, and retained the election method established in 1952.
_	This was in addition to removing the laws that require financial advisers to act in the best interest of their clients, and the requirement that they provide clients with a statement of the fees they'll be charged each year.
_	Among these achievements are the criminalization of marital rape, rendering a rape survivor’s prior sexual history inadmissible as evidence in court (rape shield law), repealing the requirement for corroboration in rape cases, and eliminating the requirement that survivors must have physically resisted the attack in order to prosecute.
_	The teams can participate in any round of the season with the requirement that teams must contest at least seven events, with their best six results from the first seven events they enter being counted towards their final points tally.
_	Askey explained why hypergeometric functions appear so frequently in mathematical applications: "Riemann showed that the requirement that a differential equation have regular singular points at three given points and every other complex point is a regular point is so strong a restriction that the differential equation is the hypergeometric equation with the three singularities moved to the three given points.
_	Under the Canada Health Act, the federal government mandates and enforces the requirement that all people have free access to what are termed "medically necessary services," defined primarily as care delivered by physicians or in hospitals, and the nursing component of long-term residential care.
_	Despite their initial opposition, Deutsche Bahn finally accepted this proposal and also waived the requirement that the City fund € 5 million of the cost.
_	Thus, "the distinction between combatants and civilians, the requirement that wounded and captured enemy combatants must be treated humanely, and that quarter must be given, some of the pillars of modern humanitarian law, all follow from this principle".
_	This removed the requirement that all persons purchase health insurance or pay a penalty.
_	Katherine states it is a woman's duty to love and obey her husband, but with the requirement that he do precisely the same for her.
_	Unloading also poses its own special hazards, due to the requirement that the farmer regularly climb the silo to close an upper door and open a lower door, moving the unloader chute from door to door in the process.
_	Popular provisions in the new constitution included an equitable land tax (which benefited small farmers) and the requirement that county officials be popularly elected, rather than appointed.
_	Along with the Otago and Southland provinces, the CRFU objected to the requirement that NZRU executive committee members reside in Wellington.
_	Another challenge for editors trying to add Black history articles to Wikipedia is the requirement that potential article topics, such as historical individuals or events, meet Wikipedia’s “” criteria.
_	One problem for Navajo widows and widowers seeking the federal benefits for which they are qualified is the requirement that they document their marriages, although many were married in the 1930s and 1940s in undocumented tribal ceremonies.
_	The issue before the Supreme Court was whether the requirement that all employees work on Friday and Saturday was discriminatory against her religion.
_	In languages with V2 word order, such as German, inversion can occur as a consequence of the requirement that the verb appear as the second constituent in a declarative sentence.
_	The structure, mode of dress and the institutional culture was military in every respect, indicated by a rank structure similar to that used in the army and the requirement that non-commissioned members salute commissioned members.
_	In July 2013, the DOD waived the requirement that companies develop a prototype.
_	The list includes a Ministerial by-election which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	The fact that the right may in time turn out to be worth little, or less than the parties anticipated, does not detract from this proposition; the requirement that the object of a cession be certain did not mean that the money value of the ceded right had to be precisely calculable when the transfer of that right occurred.
_	Dickerson v. United States, 530 U.S. 428 (2000), upheld the requirement that the Miranda warning be read to criminal suspects and struck down a federal statute that purported to overrule "Miranda v. Arizona" (1966).
_	The "Water People" species of hominid on Ringworld are not able to rish with most other hominids due to the requirement that such activities take place underwater.
_	Among the rules imposed, was the requirement that Indian workers be transported safely, and that a British Agent or a British Consular and a British Protector be appointed to inspect the departure site as well the Saint Croix plantations.
_	The legislative struggle to enforce laws against brutal ship's captains and the requirement that two-thirds of sailors be Americans was proposed, and the effort was carried for thirty years by Andrew Furuseth and the Sailors' Union of the Pacific after 1908, and the International Seamen's Union of America.
_	Unlike in involuntary commitment, the person is free to leave the hospital against medical advice, though a period of notice, or the requirement that the leaving take place during daylight hours, is sometimes required.
_	The first term is fixed due to the requirement that the equation should, when integrated over , reduce to the last equation before it.
_	One of his cases was an unsuccessful attempt to remove the requirement that judges seeking re-election finance their own ballot statement – at a cost approaching the annual salary for a superior court position.
_	This includes the requirement that the person must undergo sexual reassignment surgery.
_	In 1983, the Canadian laws on rape were reformed, in particular removing the requirement that accounts of rape be corroborated.
_	Retained were the agreement not to sue, the requirement for company-approved training and the requirement that the agreement bind future owners.
_	Historically, Bar Camp was based on the structure of Foo Camp, but with the requirement that participation should be open to all.
_	He approached contributors with the requirement that the authors "write an entry that would 'neither demonize nor proselytize, but would leave an accurate and unbiased historical record.'"
_	Bribery became such a problem that major reforms were ultimately passed, in particular the requirement that all votes be by secret ballot.
_	There is no minimum threshold of money, nor is there the requirement that the transaction succeed in actually disguising the money.
_	In 1814 the requirement that a worker in a skilled trade needed to have served an apprenticeship was abolished.
_	The condition that "F" be a submersion is equivalent to the requirement that the Jacobian derivative "dF"("x") of "F" is a surjective linear map for every "x" ∈ "V".
_	The Oireachtas responded by removing all provisions for direct democracy from the constitution, save for the requirement that, once the eight-year transitional period had passed, it would be necessary to hold referendums on all constitutional amendments.
_	One controversial provision of the bill was the provision that would waive the requirement that schools follow certain nutritional requirements in their school lunches, requirements that first lady Michelle Obama has been a strong supporter of.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	Also included in the Kingsbury Commitment was the requirement that AT&T allow competitors to connect through its phone lines, which reduced the incentive of these companies to build competing long-distance lines.
_	The PTGA provides the legislative framework for the Plan, and includes the requirement that the MOI review the Plan at least every 10 years after it came into effect.
_	That enough would volunteer was made more doubtful by the requirement that they should abandon their civilian lives for the six months of training considered necessary for them to be effective in such a reserve role.
_	The majority report also took a dim view of the exemptions from the province's railway legislation that were built into the A&GW's charter: unlike the province's other railways, the A&GW was not required to have directors resident in Alberta and was exempt from the requirement that railway companies not commence business until 25% of their capital was subscribed and 10% paid up.
_	The CRFU were unhappy with the requirement that all NZRU executive committee members live in Wellington, something they felt would put New Zealand rugby "in the hands of Wellington men".
_	Given the requirement that material appearing in the journal should be written for a non-technical audience and be highly readable, the submission of unsolicited manuscripts is not encouraged.
_	The Supreme Court in 1993 extended the requirement that inmates receive required medical care beyond what it established in "Estelle".
_	Here is the worldline from some initial event to some final event with the ordering of the events fixed by the requirement that the final event occurs later according to the clock than the initial event.
_	The normalization is fixed by the requirement that the sum of the squares, which equivalent to the requirement that the norm of the state must be one.
_	The Chief worked with the requirement that the point be on the eastern shore of Basiad Bay.
_	Conservation of momentum in the COM frame amounts to the requirement that "p" = 0 both before and after collision.
_	It proposes the requirement that all residents in the United States aged between 18 and 42 carry out national service, and be available for conscription during wartime.
_	While these new rules expand the definition of what social security considers to be an "acceptable medical source" for disability claim medical opinions to include nurse practioners, physician assistants, and others, they also have efffectively abolished the "treating physician rule" by eliminating the requirement that a treating physician opinion be granted "controlling weight".
_	In addition to the Ambassador at Large for International Religious Freedom, and the Annual Report, the cornerstone of IRFA is the requirement that each year the President review and determine whether any country has met the threshold, based on international human rights law, of "Country of Particular Concern" or CPC, engaging in or tolerating "particularly severe violations of religious freedom."
_	In 2014, Norton did not vote on the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; only five House members opposed the measure.
_	At the outset there was little interest because of land cost (£1 per acre compared to free in the Oregon Territory) and because of the requirement that settlers bring other workers or families with them.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	With the requirement that rides be packed into one or more trailers for travel, there is a limit to the size of the rides, and funfairs struggle to compete with much larger attractions, such as roller coasters, found in amusement parks.
_	The brilliance of the act is that it does not issue prescriptive guideline for how to achieve the goal of health and safety, but merely sets out the requirement that the goal be achieved.
_	Since Hurricane Katrina, Mississippi has removed the requirement that casinos on the Gulf Coast operate on barges and now allows them on land along the shoreline.
_	Composing such music at that time was an act of courage: it was a protest against the suppression of freedom, and specifically against the requirement that the composers in Soviet Russia followed the narrowly prescribed doctrines of the Socialist Realism.
_	In 2005, Smartwool implemented the requirement that its New Zealand wool suppliers no longer practice mulesing.
_	It exists in opposition to the strict epistemological requirements for "knowledge" ("e.g." the requirement that knowledge must be certain).
_	In "R v Abdul Hussain and Others" (1999) Crim. LR 570 considered the requirement that the threat be imminent and operative even though its execution is not immediate.
_	Another part of the problem lay in the requirement that the 'basic' factor be, or count as, a norm.
_	Justice McCaffrey wrote, "While I have no argument with the requirement that all Pennsylvania voters, at some reasonable point in the future, will have to present photo identification before they may cast their ballots, it is clear to me that the reason for the urgency of implementing Act 18 prior to the November 2012 election is purely political.
_	This was opposed by the Christian town council, until 1811, when he issued a proclamation ending the requirement that Jews live in the ghetto or pay special taxes.
_	As suggested by the name, the further requirement that the category be skeletal is often assumed for the definition of "posetal"; in the case of a category that is posetal, being skeletal is equivalent to the requirement that the only isomorphisms are the identity morphisms, equivalently that the preordered class satisfies antisymmetry and hence, if a set, is a poset.
_	[E]ven if I agreed with the majority that the removal of restraints on alienation should trigger the application of state limitations periods, the 1959 Act lifted only "statutory" restrictions on the alienation of Catawba land, and the requirement that the Federal Government approve any transfer of the property at issue in this case did not, and does not, stem solely from any federal statute.
_	He voted against the requirement that welfare recipients undergo periodic testing for use of narcotics.
_	"the requirement that states maintain databases of information about their citizens and residents and then share this personal information with all other states will expose every state to the information security weaknesses of every other state and threaten the privacy of every American"
_	However, the requirement that the channel must be linear implies that the indirect method cannot be used reliably in many real-life applications: whenever the transmission chain features components that might exhibit non-linear behaviour (such as loudspeakers), indirect measurements may yield incorrect results.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	From the requirement that each molecule traveling upward undergoes on average one collision, the pressure is:
_	If the manifolds "M" and "M"′ are both of class "C", then the requirement that "f" be a morphism is the requirement that it be a "p"-times continuously differentiable function.
_	This translates to the requirement that a student take at least 4 classes per semester to be considered a full-time student.
_	It takes two forms: physical segregation of the sexes and the requirement that women cover almost entirely their bodies.
_	Related to the idea of stabilizing selection is that of the requirement that organisms function adequately in their environment.
_	In 1993, the CAA instituted the requirement that all international airports in New Zealand must keep airside departing and arriving passengers separate.
_	Inspired by the free software movement, Loca Records allows similar freedoms as the GNU General Public License on their releases, including copying, re-release, modification, and sampling, with the requirement that the new work uses the same license.
_	A "configuration" of a cellular automaton is an assignment of a state to every cell of the automaton; the update rule of a cellular automaton forms a function from configurations to configurations, with the requirement that the updated value of any cell depends only on some finite neighborhood of the cell, and that the function is invariant under translations of the input array.
_	Various rules grew up around the formalities necessary to create a valid will and the Statute of Frauds (1677) created the requirement that a will of real property must be in writing.
_	Notably, the Habsburgs also dispensed with the requirement that emperors be crowned by the pope before exercising their office.
_	Access to health care is enhanced by the requirement that doctors and dentists work in public health for at least five years.
_	Although due to difficulties in travel, timing, and frequency of consecrations, this was reduced to the requirement that all comprovincial (of the same province) bishops participate.
_	In 2014, Jones voted for the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics.
_	Another noteworthy rule is the requirement that all diplomacy take place in the open at the table, thus not allowing any secret deals to be made and speeding up the game's pace slightly.
_	Apart from the requirement that candidates are graduates from approved medical programs and, in the case of residency, licensed as medical doctors, there are no specific criteria an employer has to consider in hiring for an internship or residency position.
_	One provision of the bill would waive the requirement that schools follow certain nutritional requirements in their school lunches, requirements that first lady Michelle Obama has been a strong supporter of.
_	According to the Edmonton Sun (July 4, 2004), the centre of this dispute was the requirement that approximately half of the team had to consist of local players.
_	One legislative issue pushed by Duke was the requirement that welfare recipients be tested for the use of narcotics.
_	These include the values of honor and responsibility, strict mental and physical discipline, the demerit system, summer encampment, high academic standards and the requirement that cadets maintain outstanding military bearing and appearance at all times.
_	EAWA imposed the requirement that all such companies would be classified as H-1B-dependent employers for their Labor Condition Applications, with the following caveats:
_	Rosenzweig believes that the addition of an ascertainment requirement and the requirement that the identification of individuals should be more specific "seem unnecessary and unwise" — in Rosenzweig's view it would unnecessarily burden the ability of law enforcement and intelligence agents to perform surveillance on terrorist suspects.
_	It takes two forms: physical segregation of the sexes and the requirement that women cover their bodies so as to cover their skin and conceal their form.
_	An engagement may be arranged between families for their children, but Islamic requirements for a legal marriage include the requirement that both parties, bride, groom and guardian for the bride ("wali"), give their legal consent.
_	When applied to the graphic matroid of a graph "G", this definition of an ear decomposition coincides with the definition of a proper ear decomposition of "G": improper decompositions are excluded by the requirement that each circuit include at least one edge that also belongs to previous circuits.
_	A kinetic hanger satisfies the heap property (the priority of each element is higher than the priority of its children) but relaxes the requirement that the tree structure must be strictly balanced, thus insertions and deletions can be randomized.
_	April 6, 2000, the Boulder Faculty Assembly voted in favor of a resolution supporting WAAKE-UP!'s demands, though it didn't specifically include the requirement that the University of Colorado should join the Worker Rights Consortium.
_	It reasoned, following a paper by University of Utah law professor Paul G. Cassell, that Miranda was not a constitutional requirement, that Congress could therefore overrule it by legislation, and that the provision had supplanted the requirement that police give Miranda warnings.
_	Act codified the requirement that those in judicial service attain at least a bachelor of laws, including support personnel (clerks).
_	He further reveals that the animation support in glTF is insufficient for accurately reproducing animations created in most popular modeling software (including Blender, Autodesk 3ds Max, and Autodesk Maya) due to the requirement that time be linear for cubic spline interpolation.
_	An example of the latter is the requirement that a contract of guarantee be evidenced in writing, which is found in the Statute of Frauds.
_	Standing doctrine embraces... the general prohibition on a litigant's raising another person's legal rights, the rule barring adjudication of generalized grievances more appropriately addressed in the representative branches, and the requirement that a plaintiff's complaint fall within the zone of interests protected by the law invoked.
_	As a result, the requirement that all teachers be Protestant was held to be a violation of the Civil Rights Act.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	Arguably, the old definition of "federal interest computer" contained in 18 U.S.C. § 1030(e)(2) conferred such jurisdiction because the requirement that the computers used in committing the offense not all be located in the same state might be satisfied if one computer were located overseas.
_	This models the requirement that a secure channel is both authenticated and private.
_	In order to fulfill the requirement that legislative districts be made as equal in population as possible, wards were added and removed as necessary from Jersey City to get the necessary population.
_	Access to healthcare is enhanced by the requirement that doctors and dentists work in public health for at least five years.
_	The powerplant configuration selected for Concorde, and its development to a certificated design, can be seen in light of the above symposium topics (which highlighted airfield noise, boundary layer management and interactions between adjacent engines) and the requirement that the powerplant, at Mach 2, tolerate combinations of pushovers, sideslips, pull-ups and throttle slamming without surging.
_	The second, proposed by Dan Burton, stated that it "would retain the requirement that all ballots used for authorized plebiscites include the full content of the ballot printed in English" —a consideration already contemplated in Puerto Rican electoral law.
_	With the first production car shown to the public in 1993, Porsche had only to meet certain design criteria--the requirement that production-based cars have storage space for a typical suitcase had already been fulfilled, as the Dauer road car was able to carry luggage.
_	However, the Court struck down the requirement that the health warnings be unattributed, as this requirement violated the right to free speech, further ruling that it was in the federal government's jurisdiction to pass such laws, as it fell under the peace, order and good government clause.
_	Blatchford also eliminated the requirement that volunteers could not return to the United States during their Peace Corps service for vacations.
_	(This rule was introduced in 1840; the requirement that an archdeacon be in priest's orders was enacted in 1662.)
_	The CAPE-OPEN project formally identified a unit operation or a thermodynamic engine as a Process Modelling Component (PMC) with the requirement that a PMC could be “wrapped” with standard interfaces that would allow it to be placed in a CAPE-OPEN compliant PME without the need for additional interfacing software to be developed – no programming would be required either for the modelling environment or for the core of the modelling component.
_	Authorities do generally conform to the requirement that suspects be informed of charges within five days of being taken into custody.
_	This definition incorporates the requirement that evidence be both material ("of consequence to the determination of the action") and have probative value ("having any tendency to make the existence of any [material] fact...more probable or less probable than it would be without the evidence").
_	In "Siebe Gorman & Co Ltd v Barclays Bank Ltd" it was said to be done with a stipulation that the charge was "fixed" and the requirement that proceeds be paid into an account held with the lending bank.
_	The pseudo-abelian condition is stronger than preadditivity, but it is weaker than the requirement that every morphism have a kernel and cokernel, as is true for abelian categories.
_	Conditions for validity of marriage such as sufficient use of reason (canon 1095) and freedom from coercion (canon 1103), and the requirement that, normally, a marriage be contracted in the presence of the local Ordinary or parish priest or of the priest or deacon delegated by either of them, and in the presence of two witnesses (canon 1108), are not classified in the Code of Canon Law as impediments, but have much the same effect.
_	The FMF’s submissions contributed, for instance, to the devolution of exclusive powers to local and regional tiers of government, the inclusion in the limitation clause of the requirement that limitations of rights must be “justifiable in an open and democratic”, and the inclusion of the administrative justice clause (section 32), the freedom of trade clause (section 22), and the rule of law as a justiciable foundational provision in the first section of the Constitution (section 1(c)).
_	The Court also cautioned against section 395 being used to circumvent the requirement that leave of court must be obtained to apply for prerogative orders (see below).
_	There was "only the requirement that the works be carried out on the directions of the minister", the court said.
_	These included the requirement that 700 local residents living in a restricted area of Kehl would not be allowed to leave their homes between Friday night and Saturday morning without requesting a police escort.
_	From the beginning, there were no restrictions on entering students relating to race, color, creed, or national or ethnic origin—only the requirement that students qualify for admission and have the desire to succeed.
_	In 1955 the Ohio General Assembly eliminated the requirement that cities and school districts have common borders.
_	A probability is a way of assigning every event a value between zero and one, with the requirement that the event made up of all possible results (in our example, the event {1,2,3,4,5,6}) is assigned a value of one.
_	To qualify as a probability, the assignment of values must satisfy the requirement that if you look at a collection of mutually exclusive events (events with no common results, e.g., the events {1,6}, {3}, and {2,4} are all mutually exclusive), the probability that at least one of the events will occur is given by the sum of the probabilities of all the individual events.
_	In July 1969, during a fuselage upbending test, the wing failed at 128% of limit load, which is below the requirement that it sustain 150% of limit load.
_	Drihnhofer claimed that Virtopsy fully satisfies the requirement that medical forensic findings provide “a complete and true picture of the object examined”.
_	The Council also demanded that all outside interference in Bosnia and Herzegovina cease, including the requirement that all forces, in particular elements of the Croatian Army, be withdrawn, disbanded or disarmed, calling upon all parties to fulfil their commitments to put into effect an immediate cessation of hostilities and to negotiate in the Mixed Military Working Group and end the blockade of Sarajevo and other towns.
_	Walton adds the requirement that there must be a loss of control.
_	The simplex algorithm proceeds by performing successive pivot operations each of which give an improved basic feasible solution; the choice of pivot element at each step is largely determined by the requirement that this pivot improves the solution.
_	A WSS comprises a switching array that operates on light that has been dispersed in wavelength without the requirement that the dispersed light be physically demultiplexed into separate ports.
_	The students were allowed to vote on the new merged school colors and mascot, with the requirement that one school would keep their colors while the other school would keep their mascot.
_	Pope Boniface rescinded the requirement that physicians complete studies for the lower orders of the Catholic priesthood.
_	The CCIA is reported to be taking up a test case for American tech companies wishing to present "a united front against censorship" and it is calling on the Obama administration to intervene with Beijing over the requirement that manufacturers pre-install the software on all new computers.
_	NEPA's most significant outcome was the requirement that all executive federal agencies prepare environmental assessments (EAs) and environmental impact statements (EISs).
_	This second point would have made "Australia II" illegal under the requirement that the boat be "designed and constructed in country" as the Deed of Gift that governed the competition stipulated.
_	Other rules, such as the requirement that participating communities declare themselves "terrorist-free zones" as required by U.S. law irritated people, said Kathryn Ledebur, director of the organization.
_	The 2008 Farm Bill stated that alfalfa grown in approved crop rotation practice is to be considered an agricultural commodity and can be used to fulfill the requirement that eligible land be cropped in four out of six previous years, which had been challenged in the previous years
_	The design was chosen by public competition, with the requirement that party political emblems were forbidden and the inclusion of the Stellone d'Italia, "inspired by a sense of the earth and municipalities."
_	In 2005, the Inter-American Court of Human Rights found "Kawas v. Honduras" admissible; its ruling in 2009 set international legal precedent for the requirement that governments must protect at-risk environmental human rights defenders.
_	Ultimately, the Board found that while ephemeral copies satisfy the “material form” requirement, the buffer copies were totally unrecognizable as audio files and therefore did not meet the requirement that they be capable of identification.
_	It was purchased with the requirement that the islands would be a recreational space for the city.
_	Rather, NASA focused development on the Lockheed Martin VentureStar which it felt answered some criticisms of the DC-X; specifically the requirement that many NASA engineers preferred the airplane-like landing of the VentureStar over the vertical landing of the DC-X.
_	That holistic constraint, along with the requirement that the theory of truth is law-like, suffices to minimize indeterminacy just enough for successful communication to occur.
_	The main constraint, over which there has been much debate, is the requirement that each genetic and phenotypic change during evolution should be relatively small, because developmental systems are so complex and interlinked.
_	According to "Always A Grand Duke", the 1933 memoir of Nicholas II’s brother-in-law, Grand Duke Alexander Mikhailovich (published in New York, by Farrar and Rinehart, Inc.), concern about the eventual marriages of cadet Romanovs so troubled the senior grand dukes that Alexander approached the Emperor about relaxing the requirement that all dynasts marry partners "possessing corresponding rank" enshrined in article 188 of the Pauline Laws, but was rebuffed.
_	In 1974 it produced a report for the Criminal Law Revision Committee on lowering the age of consent to 14, with the requirement that below the age of 18 the burden of proof that consent for sexual activities between the parties existed would be the responsibility of the older participant.
_	In 1974, his protest song and testimony convinced the Seattle City Council to drop the requirement that street performers have a permit to perform.
_	Kim Jong-un used the occasion to emphasize the requirement that officials have the spirit of serving the people and abandon outdated ideological points of view and outmoded work-styles.
_	(Hence the requirement that "P" be absolutely continuous with respect to "Q".)
_	The USAF was scanting and diluting the requirement that all FACs be qualified fighter pilots by this time, in its effort to supply the demand.
_	Hence, the requirement that the map formula_109 is a diffeomorphism (i.e., that its Jacobian linearization is invertible) asserts that convergence of the estimated output implies convergence of the estimated state.
_	The US name is based on the requirement that all wheelchair rugby players need to have disabilities that include at least some loss of function in at least three limbs.
_	In July 2018, the Trump administration that it would end the requirement that nonprofits, including political advocacy groups who collect so-called "dark money", disclose the names of large donors to the Internal Revenue Service.
_	The Commonwealth Electoral Legislation Amendment Act 1983 brought forward by the Hawke Government introduced public election funding and the requirement that all minor donations to parties be disclosed.
_	The process new drivers go through in order to qualify for a superlicence was changed as well, with additional restrictions—including the requirement that drivers complete eighty percent of two seasons from a series outside a recognised points-paying championship—put in place as part of the wider FIA Global Pathway.
_	It then details some requirements for this process, such as the ability of a sponsor or applicant to initiate the process by request, the requirement that the FDA work with that sponsor within 90 days, and what components are a necessary part of the regulatory management plan.
_	The assumptions of an ideal machine are equivalent to the requirement that the machine does not store or dissipate energy; the power into the machine thus equals the power out.
_	It is impossible that there should be liberty, for if so the mechanical order of phenomena, by means of which they are comprehensible, would be disturbed, and we should have an unintelligible world, coupled with the requirement that it shall be understood.
_	The ERRA also strengthened the criminal penalties for cartel behaviour by removing the requirement that such behaviour be dishonest; it "will be enough for prosecutors to show that an individual knowingly participated in one of the categories of criminal cartel agreement ... and that relevant information about the arrangements was not to be given to customers, or published, before its implementation".
_	This raised the question of whether the invitation to Wallenberg’s next of kin in October 1989 was in fulfillment of the requirement that the possessions be returned within six months of a prisoner's death.
_	However, Resident Visas held by Australians expire upon exit from New Zealand, so travelling in and out of New Zealand can affect the requirement that the Resident Visa must be held for two years continuously.
_	Therefore, any partition of the graph's edges into cliques would have to have at least one clique for each of these three edges, and these three cliques would all intersect in that central vertex, violating the requirement that each vertex appear in exactly two cliques.
_	IFFRAS believes that the predominant emerging human security paradigm model brings focus to the importance of regional and international stability in conjunction with the need to prevent state failure as well as the requirement that all states adhere to the generally recognized principles of fundamental human rights.
_	The program was originally conceptualised in 1991 at the direction of the then President of the Board Dr John Lambert following the relaxation of the requirement that all students in NSW had to attend a minimum number of primary and secondary years of schooling.
_	2. Note that this number is less than the general case of "B"("n"), which lacks the requirement that each bead must be distinct.
_	In addition to the requirement that spending be for the general welfare, however, the Court devised more scrutinous criteria for determining the constitutionality of the conditions imposed:
_	Amongst the detail of note in terms of the Kohen's involvement is the requirement that he be experienced in having "Kavana" (mental intent) of the holy name of Yahweh during his servicial involvement.
_	The dress code was implemented gradually and completed with the requirement that every part of the female body including the eyes be covered in public.
_	Low sexual desire alone is not equivalent to HSDD because of the requirement in HSDD that the low sexual desire causes marked distress and interpersonal difficulty and because of the requirement that the low desire is not better accounted for by another disorder in the DSM or by a general medical problem.
_	Eventually the requirement that the horse be a Canadian-bred was also dropped.
_	Introduced by the creator of the relational database model, E. F. Codd, SQL Null serves to fulfil the requirement that all "true relational database management systems (RDBMS)" support a representation of "missing information and inapplicable information".
_	This is problematic insofar as the regulations for broadcast translators exempts non-commercial stations from the requirement that translators be within the coverage area of the original station that they rebroadcast.
_	At first, Alix was troubled by the requirement that she renounce her Lutheran faith and become Orthodox, but she was persuaded and eventually became a fervent convert.
_	Public school teachers in Detroit had sought to overturn the requirement that they pay fees equivalent to union dues on the grounds that they opposed public sector collective bargaining and objected to the political activities of the union.
_	She was ranked that year 80 percent by Louisiana Right to Life even though she was one of five representatives to vote against the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics.
_	WLW 500,000 watt authorization included the requirement that the station limit its nighttime skywave signal toward Canada to the equivalence of 50,000 watts, which led to the construction of two shorter towers, electrically a quarter wavelength in height and separated by a half wavelength, that were located 1850 feet (560 m) southwest of the main tower.
_	Now considered a fundamental topological notion, a network is a collection of subsets that is similar to a basis, without the requirement that the sets be open.
_	This was due to the ballast needed to offset the weight of the tanks, and the requirement that the coasters be grounded to prevent them from capsizing as the tanks were transferred by crane onto the vessel's wooden side ramps.
_	At the state level, as of July 2015, through legislation or by executive order issued by the state governor, the following states have banned the requirement that PLAs be used for government funded construction projects: Alabama, Arkansas, Arizona, Georgia, Idaho, Iowa, Kansas, Louisiana, Maine, Michigan, Mississippi, Missouri, Montana, Nevada, North Carolina, North Dakota, Oklahoma, South Carolina, South Dakota, Tennessee, Utah, Virginia, and West Virginia.
_	If one omits the requirement that rings have a unity element, then subrings need only be non-empty and otherwise conform to the ring structure, and ideals become subrings.
_	He added the requirement that revenue bills originate in the house.
_	Other restrictions included the requirement that the procedure be approved in writing by three physicians and by a three-member special committee that either (1) continued pregnancy would endanger the pregnant woman's life or "seriously and permanently" injure her health; (2) the fetus would "very likely be born with a grave, permanent and irremediable mental or physical defect"; or (3) the pregnancy resulted from rape or incest.
_	This clause was entrenched by the requirement that it could only be amended by an absolute majority of two-thirds of Senators and members of the House of Assembly sitting together in joint session.
_	The "Garner" court had remanded the case to the district court with the requirement that the individuals be permitted to take the oath, now that the oath had been interpreted.
_	This practice has raised some controversy within the industry, leading to the requirement that the satellite provider offer to install any extra dish antenna hardware for free and place a notice to this effect in place of any missing channels.
_	The city also agreed to eliminate the requirement that a parking garage be built near the hotel.
_	The benefit separation requirement helps ensure compliance with the requirement that only special benefits are assessable.
_	In this way, the requirement for justice, which helps to enlarge the moral requirement of universalizability to a fully-fledged political requirement, goes hand in hand with the requirement that modern society provide a framework in which the individual’s goals, objectives and projects are meaningful.
_	In July 2018, the FCC issued proposals regarding changes to the rules, including removing the requirement that a program must be regularly scheduled and at least 30 minutes in length, and providing the option for all of a station's E/I programming to air on a subchannel rather than the main signal.
_	After the battle at Khandava Indra had promised Arjuna to give him all his weapons as a boon for matching him in battle with the requirement that Shiva is pleased with him.
_	Through the requirement that provincial-level companies have to apply for loans provided by the Party-state to participate in regional BRI projects, Beijing has also been able to take more effective control over China's regions and reduce "centrifugal forces".
_	The problem is to maximize formula_9 subject to the requirement that profit formula_10 should be equal to some fixed value formula_11.
_	An agreement with the state of Mississippi was for them to provide a loan to Twin Creeks Technologies of up to $50 million, where Twin Creeks Technologies would pay no interest for 20 years, in exchange for which the company planned to hire 500 people to work at their manufacturing facility in Senatobia, Mississippi or invest 132 million dollars, as well as the requirement that they be in commercial production by December 31.
_	The sovereign's position as Head of the Armed Forces is reflected in New Zealand's naval vessels bearing the prefix "Her Majesty's New Zealand Ship" ("His Majesty's New Zealand Ship" in the reign of a male monarch), and in the requirement that all members of the armed forces swear their allegiance to the sovereign and his or her heirs and successors.
_	As it was, the requirement that the Austrian quartermaster's department supply both the Austrian and Russian armies proved beyond its capacity, and in practice, the Russians received little in the way of supplies from the Austrians.
_	Macmillan writes that this conclusion is reinforced by the responsibilities and challenges associated with stagecoach work such as that done by Gage in Chile, including the requirement that drivers "be reliable, resourceful, and possess great endurance.
_	Given the emphasis on the requirement that all buddy divers be able to aid their buddy in an emergency, over the last decade there have been some agency-approved diving practices established where certain types of buddies do not actually meet this criterion.
_	and the requirement that formula_7 gives
_	The chambers also approved the requirement that all children would inherit an equal share of land thus ending the law of primogeniture.
_	A homeowner’s ability to pay is currently based primarily on their mortgage and property tax payment history as well as the requirement that there are no recent bankruptcies.
_	Women's rights activists criticized the bill for removing protections from women, such as the requirement that a husband obtain his wife's consent before bringing another wife into the family.
_	Among the first major acts of the Farnese grand magistry were revised, amended and expanded statutes, issued on 25 May 1705 and confirmed in a papal brief dated 12 July 1706; both these confirmed the requirement that the grand magistry should pass by male primogeniture.
_	Record separator-delimited JSON streaming allows JSON text sequences to be delimited without the requirement that the JSON formatter exclude whitespace.
_	Because of this in the video there is a content warning and the requirement that viewers sign in (to verify their age).
_	In 1901, Andrew Carnegie tentatively agreed to donate $5,200,000 () to construct 65 branch libraries in New York City, with the requirement that the City provide the land and maintain the buildings once construction was complete.
_	The function is determined by the requirement that the covariant derivative of along is 0.
_	The concept of "retirement" was replaced with "separated from service" and the requirement that the retired officer have a nonforfeitable right to retirement benefits was eliminated.
_	In 2014, Gisclair co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics.
_	AST 1218 also included the requirement that the missile could be carried by aircraft that lacked the target acquisition systems of the Phantom and Lightning.
_	In "Turner v. Louisiana", the Supreme Court of the United States explained that the requirement that a verdict "must be based upon the evidence developed at the trial" is an essential component of the "fundamental integrity of all that is embraced in the constitutional concept of trial by jury".
_	Fixed tuning eliminates the requirement that multiple tuning stages accurately match while being adjusted.
_	In the past, it referred to the requirement that the office-holder actually kiss the hands of the Sovereign as a symbol of personal fealty and loyalty to the Sovereign, that fealty and loyalty being a requirement to serve in the King's or Queen's government.
_	The court also dropped the requirement that Cody spend every Veterans Day in solitary confinement, finding that Gall did not have the authority to impose that type of punishment.
_	The 2008 reauthorization of the Higher Education Act also maintained the requirement that universities must make an effort to register students to vote.
_	Title IV details the requirement that the President annually review and determine whether any country has met the CPC threshold, based in international human rights law, of "engaging in or tolerating particularly severe violations of religious freedom".
_	Hortensius, a Plebeian, passed a law called the "Hortensian Law" ("lex Hortensia"), which ended the requirement that an "auctoritas patrum" be passed before any bill could be considered by either the Plebeian Council or the Tribal Assembly.
_	But if the shared vertex of the two rhombi has the same color as the two opposite acute-angled vertices, then these two vertices have the same color as each other, violating the requirement that the edge connecting them have differently-colored endpoints.
_	To reduce this risk, he reaffirmed the requirement that any individual wait for ten years before being reelected to any office.
_	The "Sexual Law Reform Society" proposed in September of that year lowering the age of consent to 14, with the requirement that below the age of 18 the burden of proof that consent for sexual activities between the parties existed would be the responsibility of the older participant.
_	A letter of 25 September 2000 from the Congregation for Divine Worship and the Discipline of the Sacraments treats the phrase "which is desirable wherever possible" as referring to the requirement that altars be built separate from the wall, not to the celebration of Mass facing the people, while "it reaffirms that the position toward the assembly seems more convenient inasmuch as it makes communication easier ... without excluding, however, the other possibility."
_	The provisions of the Protocol include the requirement that the Parties to the Protocol base their future decisions on the current scientific, environmental, technical, and economic information that is assessed through panels drawn from the worldwide expert communities.
_	David R. George III was working on the "" novel "Twilight" when Palmieri offered him the chance to write "The Lost Era" novel featuring the Tomed Incident under the requirement that the book had to explain what happened, and additionally for there to be a segue from "Twilight" into the new book.
_	H.R. 1961 would amend federal shipping law to extend through October 31, 2028, the exemption of certain vessels from the requirement that U.S. passenger vessels having berth or stateroom accommodations for at least 50 passengers be constructed of fire-retardant materials in order to be granted a certificate of inspection.
_	In 2014, Geymann co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking; the measure failed, 19-73.
_	According to numerous sources, the amendment to Iran's constitution removing the requirement that the Supreme Leader be a Marja was instituted to deal with the problem of a lack of any remaining Grand Ayatollahs willing to accept "illimitable velayat-e faqih".
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	Moreover, his power to pass decrees was limited by the requirement that the Prime Minister and the appropriate other Minister had to verify his decrees with their signatures.
_	In 2015, Nybakk and Liberal Party leader Trine Skei Grande boycotted a parliamentary delegation visiting Iran due to the requirement that female members would have to wear a chador, which they argued was discriminatory to women.
_	The third condition is equivalent to the requirement that the functor –×"Y" (i.e. the functor from "C" to "C" that maps objects "X" to "X"×"Y" and morphisms φ to φ×id) has a right adjoint, usually denoted –, for all objects "Y" in "C".
_	The first element to be repealed was the requirement that the victim’s testimony had to be corroborated by a witness.
_	In "Horton v. California" 496 U.S. 128 (1990), the court eliminated the requirement that the discovery of evidence in plain view be "inadvertent", which had led to difficulties in defining "inadvertent discovery."
_	In November 1844, railway construction started in the Böhl district and in the neighbouring communities with the provision of information to the owners of affected properties that set out the requirement that they make their boundaries clearly visible.
_	The final version of the law retained the requirement that permission for protests be obtained—though it now specified that this permission could only be refused on reasonable' grounds"—and cut the maximum jail term to six months.
_	On October 28, 2010, the federal government awarded the Authority a further $900 million for passenger rail improvements, including $715 million specifically for the high-speed rail project, but with the requirement that it be used for the Central Valley segments from Merced to Fresno, or Fresno-to-Bakersfield.
_	Any mental poker protocol that relies on the players to perform the encryption is bound by the requirement that every player encrypt every card that is dealt.
_	This would also help meet the requirement that was imposed when Florida voters approved a constitutional amendment limiting class size, starting in 2010, but phased in before then by the Florida legislature.
_	In approaching Ideal's second claim—that National had violated section 1962(a) by using illegitimate funds to purchase its second store—the Court explained that both section 1962(c) and 1962(a) claims must be asserted under section 1964(c), invoking the requirement that the plaintiff's injury be proximately caused by the defendant's RICO violation.
_	Though the position of the Church of Scotland was "unalterably" secured, the Universities (Scotland) Act 1853 repealed the requirement that professors declare their faith before assuming a position.
_	Further restrictions were added in November 2008, when the Commission added the requirement that such material must be placed at least 60 inches off the ground in order to be out of the reach of many children.
_	The heaviest aircraft to have dive-bombing included in its design and development, the four-engined Heinkel He 177, also utilised a glide-bombing approach; the requirement that the He 177 be able to dive/glide-bomb delayed its development and impaired its overall performance.
_	Liturgiam authenticam "(De usu linguarum popularium in libris liturgiae Romanae edendis)" is an instruction of the Holy See, dated 28 March 2001, that included the requirement that, in translations of the liturgical texts from the official Latin originals, or Sacred Scripture from the original Hebrew, Aramaic, and Greek "the original text, insofar as possible, must be translated integrally and in the most exact manner, without omissions or additions in terms of their content, and without paraphrases or glosses.
_	The Vermont court's decision not only breaks with the rule that a tribe must consent to extinguishment of its aboriginal title, but also rejects the requirement that the dominant sovereign must express its intent to extinguish title with a "plain and unambiguous action."
_	Especially since the Federal Trade Commission Franchise Rule on Franchising changed the requirement that representatives of franchisors as salespeople disclose their past personal and professional history, there has been an onslaught of salespeople titling themselves 'consultants', and that includes several firms offering to train new members in as little as two weeks to become franchise experts prepared to advise new buyers as to the best opportunity in which to invest their available funds.
_	The "Off-Road Vehicle Act" created the requirement that all-terrain vehicles and snowmobiles be registered and licensed.
_	The Federal Bureau of Prisons website also confirmed Lanier's date of discharge conditional to the requirement that he spends a six-month duration in a halfway house before entering a three-year-long supervised release into society where will be disallowed alcohol and/or firearms.
_	The game, he continued, would challenge the series' conventions, such as the requirement that players complete dungeons in a set order.
_	For example, a requirement of invariance may be incompatible with the requirement that the estimator be mean-unbiased; on the other hand, the criterion of median-unbiasedness is defined in terms of the estimator's sampling distribution and so is invariant under many transformations.
_	An example was the requirement that 24 oilers be present there for the striking forces, and the further requirement that the Area Petroleum Office of ComServPac effect delivery of 4,150,000 barrels of fuel oil at Manus in equal amounts throughout September.
_	This violates the requirement that codewords are always accepted, but may be good enough for some needs.
_	The majority opinion stated that Congress, in enacting the ADA, had satisfied the requirement that it make clear its intention to abrogate state sovereign immunity and allow states to be sued for damages under the Fourteenth Amendment.
_	The issue was what standard of procedural fairness should be applied when considering the judicial review of the waiver of the requirement that applications for permanent residence be filed from abroad.
_	To encourage settlement in the west, Congress (1861–1863) passed the Homestead Acts which granted an applicant of land with the requirement that the applicant improve the land.
_	The Commissioner of Police was given the powers to appoint, discipline and dismiss police volunteers and also to determine their functions, with the requirement that police volunteers be under the supervision of police officers at all times.
_	The petition asks the Supreme Judicial Court to remand the language to Massachusetts Attorney General Martha Coakley and Secretary of State William Galvin with the requirement that they amend the language for clarity and accuracy.
_	In 2014, Morris co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	Notice that the requirement that 1, introduces two algebraic constraints on the components of "Â", that is
_	The legislative provisions include the requirement that no bill may be broader than its caption, and it may have only one subject (Section 17).
_	There was no religious division in medieval Ireland, beyond the requirement that English-born prelates should run the Irish church.
_	Also, the requirement that individuals who have behaved altruistically in the past are helped by others in the future is confirmed by the data.
_	This weakened the requirement that the threat's implementation must be so imminent that the defendant had to decide in that moment whether to break the law, and it has given rise to cases such as "R v Cole" 1994 Crim. LR 582 in which a man robbed several building societies to avoid the threats of a debt collector.
_	In mathematics, a semigroupoid (also called semicategory, naked category or precategory) is a partial algebra that satisfies the axioms for a small category, except possibly for the requirement that there be an identity at each object.
_	The events of the Hawaii Supreme Court prompted the United States Congress to enact the Defense of Marriage Act (DOMA) in 1996, which forbade the federal government from recognizing same-sex marriages and relieved states of the requirement that they recognize same-sex unions performed in other jurisdictions.
_	There are no classifications in this event except the requirement that all athletes participating must have need for a wheelchair for daily mobility.
_	If one relaxes the requirement that the graph be cubic, there are much smaller non-Hamiltonian polyhedral graphs; the one with the fewest vertices and edges is the 11-vertex and 18-edge Herschel graph, and there also exists an 11-vertex non-Hamiltonian polyhedral graph in which all faces are triangles, the Goldner–Harary graph.
_	Therefore, according to the Supreme Court of Appeal, an interpretation of legislation is constrained by the requirement that it must be “reasonably possible.”
_	Alternatively, the requirement that "Y" be a Hausdorff space can be relaxed to the assumption that "Y" be a general topological space, but then the limit of a function may not be unique.
_	Concerns over the flammability of nitrate film, following several major fires during the cinema's first decade resulted in the increasing regulation of the film exhibition industry, including the requirement that projectors be housed in fireproof booths, segregated from the auditorium.
_	The original reason for this regulation was the necessity for safety precautions for the use of nitrate prints, and hence the requirement that projectionists should be formally trained to handle them in order to ensure public safety.
_	Selected areas of the gorge are accessible to rock climbers only, with the requirement that they sign a climbing register and pay the entrance fee when entering and leaving.
_	He was instrumental in the successful petitioning of the Federal Communications Commission in 1979 to eliminate the requirement that a broadcast signal originate from the city of that station's license, changing broadcasting on a national level.
_	FITS was designed with an eye towards long-term archival storage, and the maxim "once FITS, always FITS" represents the requirement that developments to the format must be backward compatible.
_	The Court of Appeal, conversely, thought that the requirement that government reasons be rational should be a very difficult test to pass and only "extraordinary circumstances" could justify not following recommendations.
_	In practice, however, the requirement that the third party intervention will usually break the chain and, at the very least, the liability to pay compensation representing the totality of the loss or damage will be apportioned between the two or more tortfeasors.
_	The Los Angeles County Transportation Commission (LACTC) was formed in 1976 resulting from the requirement that all counties in the state form local transportation commissions.
_	This legislation did not change the requirement that disabilities be service-related but was nevertheless a very expensive bill that set the stage for the larger fight to come.
_	To reduce this risk, he reaffirmed the requirement that any individual wait for ten years before being reelected to any office.
_	Thus, the shape of the Kepler triangle is uniquely determined (up to a scale factor) by the requirement that its sides be in a geometric progression.
_	This satisfied the requirement that the involved people, namely Cynthia Dobson and her fetus, were closely related.
_	A Pennsylvania state appeals court panel in August 2014 vacated the requirement that the apologies to her fellow judges include the photograph of her in handcuffs as a punitive penalty that was not allowed under state law because it served no legitimate rehabilitative or corrective ends.
_	Longwood is the only Virginia college or university to offer a dual-enrollment course that certifies the requirement that high school students pass a one-credit course in economics and personal finance.
_	Due to the requirement that the sun be in a specific location for filming and that the environment be bright enough, production fell behind schedule when it was unseasonably cloudy for three days straight.
_	By these results, the different shapes of receptive field profiles found in biological vision, which are tuned to different sizes and orientations in the image domain as well as to different image velocities in space-time, can be seen as well adapted to structure of the physical world and be explained from the requirement that the visual system should be invariant to the natural types of image transformations that occur in its environment.
_	Since 1950, the statuettes have been legally encumbered by the requirement that neither winners nor their heirs may sell the statuettes without first offering to sell them back to the Academy for US$1.
_	The first Bienal without Ciccillo was defined by meaningful changes: the appointment of a Council for Art and Culture with freedom to develop the exhibition program – among the new rules is the requirement that National Representations follow the themes proposed by the Bienal for the selection of artists, a model inspired by the Venice Biennale.
_	With proportional representation, and the small majorities in the Senate compared to the generally larger majorities in the House of Representatives, and the requirement that the number of members of the House be "nearly as practicable" twice that of the Senate, a joint sitting after a double dissolution is more likely than not to lead to a victory for the House over the Senate.
_	In addition to the requirement that the species be considered kosher, meat and poultry (but not fish) must come from a healthy animal slaughtered in a process known as "shechitah".
_	This is equivalent to the requirement that the generalized forces for any virtual displacement are zero, that is "Q"=0.
_	Thus the property that a function ascribes a unique image to each value in its domain is reflected by the property that any ball can go into only one box (together with the requirement that no ball should remain outside of the boxes), whereas any box can accommodate (in principle) an arbitrary number of balls.
_	Fierz and Pauli argued their result by enumerating all free field theories subject to the requirement that there be quadratic forms for locally commuting observables including a positive-definite energy density.
_	At first the objective was to take over the province's government, which was successfully done, and enter into negotiations with the imperial government of the regent Diogo Antônio Feijó to explain the reason for the rebellion with the requirement that a new government be appointed to the province that would please the regional elite.
_	They also objected to the requirement that many teenage defendants be tried as adults.
_	The legislature had tacked on the requirement that a grant of of land would be required for the university to be built, which they presumably thought would be sufficient to prevent its construction.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	But the requirement that a misdemeanor must have occurred in the officer's presence to justify a warrantless arrest is not grounded in the Fourth Amendment, see Street v. Surdyka, 492 F.2d 368, 371-372 (CA4 1974); 2 W. LaFave, Search and Seizure § 5.1 (1978), and we have never held that a warrant is constitutionally required to arrest for nonfelony offenses occurring out of the officer's presence.
_	The Court held that this includes the requirement that a decision, viewed objectively, must be rationally related to the purpose for which the power was given.
_	While in office as prosecuting attorney he pushed for tougher sentencing laws and led a successful fight to amend the state constitution to allow for "information charging" and eliminate the requirement that victims and other witnesses testify during preliminary or grand jury hearings.
_	It removed the requirement that a same-sex couple with one of the partners being a non-EEA national must have been resident in another member state in order to move to Ireland.
_	Since the 1960s, there have been attempts to increase patient autonomy including the requirement that physician’s take bioethics courses during their time in medical school.
_	Kleene require that the "predicates" Q that doing the testing are all mutually exclusive"predicates" are functions that produce only { true, false } for output; Boolos-Burgess-Jeffrey add the requirement that the cases are "exhaustive".
_	However, it is susceptible to malnourishment, apparently due to the requirement that a relatively large proportion of its diet be animal prey.
_	In Catalonia, the usage "Princeps namque" established the requirement that every man participate in the national defense in the event of external threat.
_	When the requirement that the set of scalars form a field is relaxed so that it need only form a ring (so that, for example, the division of scalars need not be defined, or the scalars need not be commutative), the resulting more general algebraic structure is called a module.
_	As Virginia wines sold in Virginia have the requirement that the majority of the grapes used must be grown in Virginia, and since Virginia is not growing enough grapes to support the number of wineries, one Floyd County winery has expanded its operation in a five-year contract to export its wines to China.
_	In the United States, venison is less common at retail due to the requirement that the animal be first inspected by USDA inspectors.
_	In addition, during the period starting with the day when the writ of election is issued and ending with the start of the eve of polling day, election campaign recordings are exempted from the requirement that films must be submitted to the Board of Film Censors for review, and may be published on and distributed through the Internet.
_	The assignment of orientational symbols to physical quantities and the requirement that physical equations be orientationally homogeneous can actually be used in a way that is similar to dimensional analysis to derive a little more information about acceptable solutions of physical problems.
_	For example, he supported the requirement that new plants to be able to withstand an aircraft crash.
_	In 2014, he co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics.
_	Burmese political reforms signalled significant relaxations of the country's censorship policies and in August 2012 the Ministry of Information lifted the requirement that print media organisations submit materials to the government prior to publication.
_	In regard to the pending Congressional bill, H.R. 2892, it was subsequently announced that "[t]he Administration supports the Committee's aim to achieve an orderly termination through a phased decommissioning beginning in January 2010, and the requirement that certifications be provided to document that the LORAN-C termination will not impair maritime safety or the development of possible GPS backup capabilities or needs."
_	In September 1974, the Sexual Law Reform Society proposed lowering the age of consent to 14, with the requirement that below the age of 18 the burden of proof that consent for sexual activities between the parties existed would be the responsibility of the older participant.
_	One method that colonial powers used to urge the native populations into participating in the larger economy was the requirement that taxes be paid in official currency.
_	She included the requirement that Waterfall House be converted into a museum within five years to house Big Sur history, otherwise that it be razed.
_	At the time of Washington Duke's donation in 1896, which carried the requirement that women be placed "on an equal footing with men" at the college, four women were enrolled; three of the four were faculty members' children.
_	He suggests that governments "lift the requirement that high school texts enshrine Darwin's failed attempt as an eternal truth."
_	Maday sought an injunction which would temporarily remove the requirement that she change in private in the girls' locker room.
_	Many people who are against the bill have opposed the requirement that would force clinics to follow the same standards as surgical centers, since it could lead to the closure of the clinics and result in large areas of the state to not have access to a clinic.
_	During Luffa's episcopate, he and the abbey disputed over the right of the bishop to be entertained by the abbey and the requirement that the abbot attend the diocesan councils.
_	There are some authors who prefer to leave out the requirement that a semiring have a 0 or 1.
_	In 1554 the Cardinal de Châtillon ordered published the "Synodial Constitutions of the Diocese of Beauvais", containing some twenty-one chapters on the duties and conduct of the clergy, including the requirement that they keep their beards shaved ("la barbe rase") and their hair cut short.
_	After the requirement that all number plate codes had to be compatible with both the Cyrillic and Latin alphabets came into force:
_	Such practices include: not conveying to patients that sterilization is permanent and irreversible, in their own language (including the option to end the process or procedure at any time without conceding any future medical attention or federal benefits, the ability to ask any and all questions about the procedure and its ramifications, the requirement that the consent seeker describes the procedure fully including any and all possible discomforts and/or side-effects and any and all benefits of sterilization); failing to provide alternative information about methods of contraception, family planning, or pregnancy termination that are nonpermanent and/or irreversible (this includes abortion); conditioning receiving welfare and/or Medicaid benefits by the individual or his/her children on the individuals "consenting" to permanent sterilization; tying elected abortion to compulsory sterilization (cannot receive a sought out abortion without "consenting" to sterilization); using hysterectomy as sterilization; and subjecting minors and the mentally incompetent to sterilization.
_	The same year other regulations were changed: the requirement that students wear coat and tie to class was dropped, students of age were allowed to drink in the dormitories, and only underclassmen with failing grades were subject to a curfew.
_	Like its predecessor, it granted broad citizens' rights, but these rights were limited by the requirement that they be exercised only in the interest of the state.
_	The Fifth Amendment (1791) establishes the requirement that a trial for a major crime may commence only after an indictment has been handed down by a grand jury; protects individuals from double jeopardy, being tried and put in danger of being punished more than once for the same criminal act; prohibits punishment without due process of law, thus protecting individuals from being imprisoned without fair procedures; and provides that an accused person may not be compelled to reveal to the police, prosecutor, judge, or jury any information that might incriminate or be used against him or her in a court of law.
_	The Native Tree Society has its own database Trees Database with the requirement that the trees entered meet their height measurement standards.
_	In 2014, Thierry voted for the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved, 88-5.
_	Here, "n" is an integer, resulting from the requirement that ψ vanish on the metal plates.
_	When the commission granted this unusual request on October 30, 1963, it also waived the requirement that the station's main studio be maintained in Meriden, Connecticut.
_	The changes included fewer entrances, law enforcement officers at each entrance, identification badges for students and staff, and the requirement that all book bags must be clear plastic.
_	The size of ASALM was limited by the requirement that it use the same launchers as the earlier SRAM.
_	The main differences from English draughts are: the size of the board (10×10), pieces can also capture backward (not only forward), the long-range moving and capturing capability of kings, and the requirement that the maximum number of men be captured whenever a player has capturing options.
_	Among the items listed in this agreement was the "planting of the gospell among these rude, barbarous, and uncivill people" by Protestant churches; the outlawing of bards who were traditionally on circuit between the houses of noblemen; the requirement that all men of wealth send their heirs to be educated in Lowland schools where they would be taught to "speik, reid, and wryte Inglische."
_	Burke supports the #MeToo bill in the US Congress, which would remove the requirement that staffers of the federal government go through months of "cooling off" before being allowed to file a complaint against a Congressperson.
_	Though the requirement that a will be in writing stems from an attempt to frustrate fraud, an apparent exception to the requirements for the formal execution of the Act under section 9 is a secret trust.
_	In 2014, LeBas co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinic; only five House members voted against the measure.
_	The Dutch government proposed the requirement that these new refugees be housed in camps instead of being housed privately, and that the CJV would facilitate their further emigration as soon as possible.
_	Not on the list, however, is the requirement that prosecutors demonstrate to the finder of fact which specific “pending proceeding” the accused attempted to obstruct.
_	Alternately, edges can be allowed to point at other edges, irrespective of the requirement that the edges be ordered as directed, acyclic graphs.
_	It should be obvious, just from the first rule, and the requirement that all instances of a non-terminal are rewritten simultaneously with the same rule, that the number of "S"s doubles on each rewrite step using the first rule, giving the derivation steps formula_199.
_	The meetings were united by a shared definition of abstinence; the requirement that speakers at each meeting have a minimum of 90 days of continuous abstinence; the practice of doing the Twelve Steps in AWOL groups; and the belief that overeating, under-eating, bulimia, and other food-related, self-destructive behaviors are symptoms of the disease of addiction.
_	The main differences from English draughts are: pieces can also capture backward (not only forward), the long-range moving and capturing capability of kings, and the requirement that the maximum number of men be captured whenever a player has capturing options.
_	A sufficient condition for a stable singularity to be of physical interest is the requirement that the singularity be generic (or general).
_	However, the Prosecutor reasoned that the defense of self-defense would likely succeed because of the requirement that the prosecution establish beyond a reasonable doubt that Chipperfield knew he was shooting an unarmed and severely wounded man who did not pose a threat of death or serious injury to Chipperfield or others.
_	Despite the requirement that "Enns" and be constructed as sister ships, and the fact that their size and armament were identical, there were significant design differences between the two vessels, as they were constructed by completely independent shipbuilding companies.
_	This condition is equivalent to the requirement that the polar formula_13 of the set formula_14 in formula_5
_	Among these procedures, one of the most important is the requirement that an agency set forth factual findings sufficient to support a rational basis or by procedures otherwise inadequate to meet the statutes listed above.
_	To accurately express the requirement that codice_31 follow codice_32 a property is required:
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	it is not the category of all cospans in "the category of manifolds with inclusions on the boundary", but rather a subcategory thereof, as the requirement that "M" and "N" form a partition of the boundary of "W" is a global constraint.
_	The first stage of testing considered multiple goal-line technology systems, with the requirement that the system notified the referee of the decision within one second of the incident happening.
_	One can therefore switch to a spacetime with Euclidean signature, where the above trace (Tr) leads to the requirement that all bosonic and fermionic fields be periodic and antiperiodic, respectively, with respect to the Euclidean time direction with periodicity formula_3 (we are assuming natural units formula_4).
_	On April 9, 2005, the Governor of Hawaii signed HB119, which eases the requirement that every signature on a petition must include the signer’s social security number; now only the last 4 digits need be included.
_	He voted against the requirement that welfare recipients undergo periodic testing for use of narcotics.
_	The Act was heavily criticised for the way it set these areas out, particularly the requirement that trusts trying to invest in multiple areas would need to be permanently divided.
_	Hours later, phase three of the plan was instituted; it ordered a mandatory evacuation scheduled to start at midnight August 25, for all residents, with the requirement that everyone be evacuated by 5 pm local time, August 26.
_	In 2014, Hoffman co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He opposed the requirement that companies give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	On 9 August 2017, the PRI revised its requirements for presidential candidates, eliminating the requirement that candidates must have 10 years of party membership, and allowing non-party members to lead the party.
_	An important aspect of self funded group health plans lies in the requirement that the employer remain liable for funding of plan claims regardless of the purchase of stop loss insurance.
_	It again proposes the requirement that all residents - male and female - in the United States aged between 18 and 42 carry out national service for a period of two years, in the event of a war or national emergency, as declared by the president.
_	The award was presented apparently for civic accomplishments in peacetime by former veterans, with the criteria including the requirement that the recipient be an "excellent comrade and friend worthy of honor".
_	In 1985, they began a campaign in Takatsuki, Osaka Prefecture which resulted in the establishment of a division in the city board of education devoted exclusively to education for ethnic Koreans, and the elimination of the requirement that city employees hold Japanese nationality.
_	They also played an important role in the 1980s struggle against the requirement that all foreign residents, including Special Permanent Residents like the Zainichi Koreans, give their fingerprints to police; they organised refusers from different parts of Japan, as well as providing information and increasing awareness of their campaign.
_	Supporters of the bill considered it a "common sense" measure that would help returning veterans find work by ending the requirement that emergency personnel retake civilian certification courses when they already held similar certifications from the military.
_	The LP effect can be seen as a result of the requirement that quantum physics be invariant with respect to the gauge choice for the electromagnetic potential, of which the magnetic vector potential A forms part.
_	Plugging in the requirement that the covariant derivatives vanish, we obtain
_	In fact, the legality of a blockade under customary international law hinges on the requirement that aid for the civilian population be met with free passage.
_	As part of Cariboo's application to become a university college in 1989, the first Campus Plan was developed, with the requirement that every building have an official name.
_	In 2014, Burford co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	However, a number of leading Senate Republicans objected to the requirement that the U.S. contributions be halved if the UN failed to meet all of the criteria.
_	We can state β-acyclicity as the requirement that all subhypergraphs of the hypergraph are α-acyclic, which is equivalent to an earlier definition by Graham.
_	To deal with the vast number of OTC drugs that were already on the market before the requirement that all drugs obtain an NDA, the FDA created the OTC monograph system to review classes of drugs and to categorize them as GRAS/E after review by expert panels.
_	The land for Lake Taghkanic State Park was donated to the state by D. McRae Livingston in 1929, with the requirement that Lake Charlotte's name would be changed to Lake Taghkanic.
_	With proportional representation, and the small majorities in the Senate compared to the generally larger majorities in the House of Representatives, and the requirement that the number of members of the House be "nearly as practicable" twice that of the Senate, a joint sitting after a double dissolution is more likely than not to lead to a victory for the House over the Senate.
_	The constant formula_6 is determined by the requirement that formula_7 be the initial weight formula_8, i.e. by solving
_	The quantization condition comes from the requirement that the phases around the Dirac string are trivial, which means that the Dirac string must be unphysical.
_	The definition of the condition includes the requirement that the duodenal histological appearances are otherwise unremarkable, specifically with normal villous architecture.
_	One of the questions about kin selection is the requirement that individuals must know if other individuals are related to them, or kin recognition.
_	The Ballot Act 1872 was an Act of the Parliament of the United Kingdom that introduced the requirement that parliamentary and local government elections in the United Kingdom be held by secret ballot.
_	This adds the requirement that the sum of the allowances and tolerances on the major diameters of nut and bolt be less than the sum of the allowances on the pitch diameters (PD); the drawback is that, for a given amount of end play (axial clearance, due solely to PD deviations), closer tolerances and cleaner work environment are necessitated in the application of a centralizing Acme thread.
_	Smith's close friend Joseph Knight Sr. corroborates the requirement that Smith was to "take the Book and go right away".
_	As with most of the Royal Society's medals, the award is open for candidates from the Commonwealth of Nations or of the Republic of Ireland, with the requirement that they be either a citizen of such a nation or have lived in such a nation for at least three years before the nomination.
_	For the user to have any hope of reconstructing with a maximum distortion "D", we must impose the requirement that the information lost in transmission does not exceed the maximum tolerable loss of "H" − "R"("D") bits/symbol.
_	Accordingly, in "Hedley Byrne & Co Ltd v Heller & Partners Ltd" the House of Lords imposed the requirement that there would need to be a "special relationship" in order to justify a duty of care under which a person making a negligent statement could be held liable to a person who relied upon it.
_	However, the requirement that a UK government adheres to EU rules on net neutrality may disappear at some point in future when the United Kingdom leaves the European Union.
_	The ‘purposes of sentencing’ provisions of section 142 of the Act and the requirement that the offence(s) must be so serious that neither a fine alone nor a community sentence can be justified do not apply.
_	Two days later, 5 July, Xinjiang officials announced new airport security measures, which included the requirement that passengers present hospital-issued certificates before bringing crutches onto an aircraft.
_	These included the requirement that the prosecution not withhold favorable evidence from the accused.
_	There is the requirement that this takes linear time on average, but there is no worst-case requirement; these requirements are exactly met by quickselect, for any choice of pivot strategy.
_	At the European Patent Office (EPO), the requirement that an invention is susceptible of an industrial application has generally been taken to be more or less automatically fulfilled but a 2005 decision of the Boards of Appeal of the EPO saw this requirement analysed in new detail.
_	In deciding whether a case meets the requirement that there be a strong likelihood that the inmate is actually innocent of the crime for which he or she has been convicted, project staff will exam such factors as the following:
_	The 1972 Supreme Chapter Assembly eliminated the requirement that all members be male, thus permitting the initiation of female students and dentists.
_	While most Episcopalian schools would be absorbed through local mergers, the 224 Catholic schools, with 94,000 pupils in 1918, retained their distinct religious character, access to schools by priests and the requirement that school staff be acceptable to the Church.
_	With the requirement that all teams build brand-new cars for the 2013 season, most of the cars that were raced in 2011 and 2012 were sold to teams competing in the V8 Development Series, the second-tier category for V8 Supercars.
_	The most important change was the requirement that all new drug applications demonstrate "substantial evidence" of the drug's efficacy for a marketed indication, in addition to the existing requirement for pre-marketing demonstration of safety.
_	The procedure for handing over the bombs added an extra ten minutes to the bombers' reaction time, and the requirement that US personnel had guardianship of the weapons at all times meant that neither they nor the bombers could be relocated to dispersal airfields as the RAF desired.
_	In 2015, the requirement that at least one director and one Representative Director must be a resident of Japan was changed.
_	It was started then with the requirement that it would only continue as an official award if approved again by the World Science Fiction Society after that year.
_	"Anyone who watches crime shows on television is likely to be just as aware as March of his right to counsel," Sharp wrote, "but this Court is unaware of any exception to the requirement that a defendant be given a Miranda warning before waiving his right to counsel that applies only to lawyers or those who have watched more than their fair share of "Law & Order"."
_	Article 25 would have constitutionalized the requirement that three judges should come from Quebec, and articles 26 to 30 assigned partial responsibility of appointments to both federal and provincial justice ministers.
_	In 1790 the General Assembly removed the requirement that voters had to take an oath of allegiance, and the loyalists in general became supporters of the Federalist Party while those who supported the war became supporters of the Democratic-Republican Party in the early 1790s.
_	Renormalization procedures are based on the requirement that certain physical quantities (such as the mass and charge of an electron) equal observed (experimental) values.
_	A massive planet or brown dwarf on an orbit of 50–200 days would fulfil the observational criteria: the requirement for dynamical stability, the constraints from the lack of observed timing variations and the requirement that the object can maintain the eccentricity of the binary stars.
_	The main innovation of the Novo Mercado, in relation to legislation is the requirement that the capital of the company is composed only of common shares.
_	In 2014, Danahay co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the measure passed the House, 88-5.
_	The lack of an apostrophe in the official title of the organisation stems from the requirement that the name of a financial institution account needs to exactly match the name of an organisation as it appears in its incorporation documents.
_	In 1980, however, Congress reinstated the requirement that young men register with the Selective Service System, but without reinstating an active draft.
_	Act gave legal tender status to bank notes from any issuer and removed the requirement that banks authorised to issue bank notes must redeem them on demand for gold (the gold standard).
_	It was donated by the City of New York in the early 1930s, along with much of Marine Park, by Alfred Tredway White and Frederic Pratt with the requirement that it become parkland.
_	The method proceeds by first dropping the requirement that the x be integers and solving the associated linear programming problem to obtain a basic feasible solution.
_	In 1937 women were added to the statutory party structure by the addition of three provisions: (1) each precinct would now elect one precinct committeewoman in addition to the committeeman, (2) county, district and state committees would now elect a vice-chair, in addition to the chair, secretary and treasurer, with the requirement that the chair and vice-chair be of opposite gender, and (3) the National Committeewoman was added to the party council.
_	As a judicial compensation commission likely should not have a problem with this, as acknowledged by Lamer, La Forest found the requirement that the commission look into the matter to be "a triumph of form over substance".
_	This is equivalent to the requirement that for all subsets "A"<nowiki>'</nowiki> of "X"<nowiki>'</nowiki>
_	The 1918 Act brought the Roman Catholic schools into the state system, but retained their distinct religious character, access to schools by priests and the requirement that school staff be acceptable to the Church.
_	During the Nazi regime in Germany, he protested against the dismissal of Jewish professors from universities, as well as the requirement that professors give a Nazi salute at the beginning of their classes.
_	The Dutch settlers disputed the requirement that they had to lodge their claims in Britain and objected that the value of the slaves was many times the allocated amount.
_	These regulations, however proved ineffectual and the requirement that residents vacate the premises between 10 a.m. and late afternoon hit poor and sick residents hard, as they were obliged to walk the streets in the intervening period in all weathers.
_	In 1828, Ordinance 50 made it possible for blacks and Asians to own property, abolished the requirement that they carry identification passes, and required employers to provide contracts for all work.
_	Provisions in section 4 as to formalities for contracts for the sale of land were repealed by Schedule 7 to the Law of Property Act 1925 (15 Geo 5 c 20), however the requirement that contracts for the sale of land be evidenced in writing was maintained by section 40 of that Act, subsequently replaced by section 2 of the Law of Property (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1989 (c 34).
_	On 28 March 2001, the Congregation for Divine Worship issued the Instruction "Liturgiam authenticam", which included the requirement that, in translations of the liturgical texts from the official Latin originals, "the original text, insofar as possible, must be translated integrally and in the most exact manner, without omissions or additions in terms of their content, and without paraphrases or glosses.
_	It included the Excelsior Scholarship, a provision that families making less than $125,000 in 2019 could have free tuition at all SUNY and CUNY universities, though some education experts including Sara Goldrick-Rab say it won't help the poorest students and that the requirement that recipients live and work in New York after graduating is counter-productive.
_	Construction was expected to take nearly six years with multiple lane flyovers and the requirement that the interchange remain open throughout the project.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	Foote and other Southern leaders attempted to condition California's statehood either on granting Texas the full extent of its boundary claims on New Mexico, or on the requirement that slavery be allowed in the disputed region if it was not awarded to Texas.
_	The boundary of this region is partly determined by the requirement that the maximum permissible gate power (P), specified for a given trigger pulse duration, is not exceeded.
_	The background to this purchase relates to the requirement that TfL (who took over from London Regional Transport in 2000) compensates TCL for the consequences of any changes to the fares and ticketing policy introduced since 1996.
_	The decree includes the requirement that the Venezuelan public sector must use free software based on open standards, and includes a definition of open standard:
_	There was also widespread poverty and unemployment and the 1834 Poor Law Amendment had deprived working people of outdoor relief, i.e., the right to receive assistance to alleviate poverty without the requirement that the recipient enter an institution.
_	together with the requirement that "x"•"y" be monotone in "x" and "y".
_	Education at the secondary and university levels has been seriously hampered by the requirement that most males perform military service before completing their education.
_	To be granted and to preserve certification, companies must receive a minimum score on an online assessment for "social and environmental performance", satisfy the requirement that the company integrate B Lab commitments to stakeholders into company governing documents, and pay an annual fee ranging from $500 to $50,000.
_	The banks had to somehow restructure the debts to avoid financial panic; this usually involved new loans with very strict conditions, as well as the requirement that the debtor countries accept the intervention of the International Monetary Fund (IMF).
_	This bill removed the requirement that correctional officer uniforms come from Correctional Industries.
_	The convictions were quashed because there was no evidence that the first representation came before the obtaining of the petrol and the judge had failed to direct on the requirement that the deception operate on the mind of the attendant in respect of the second representation.
_	Returning north via Rome, Donizetti signed a contract for performances of "Zoraida" by the Teatro Argentina which included the requirement that the libretto to be revised by Ferretti, given Donizetti's low opinion of the work of the original Neapolitan librettist, Andrea Leone Tottola: he referred to it as "a great barking".
_	The objection to the treaty by the spacefaring nations is held to be the requirement that extracted resources (and the technology used to that end) must be shared with other nations.
_	Although the three Leslie brothers claimed all the land to the head of the Condamine River, including its tributaries, they were forced to give up most of the claim to new arrivals because of the requirement that all land claimed had to be adequately stocked.
_	In 2016, he sponsored a bill that was signed into law that eliminated the requirement that New York City taxi drivers take an English proficiency exam.
_	It is well-established that Congress may grant lower federal courts less than the totality of Article III's possible federal question jurisdiction; for example, before 1980, federal question jurisdiction had an amount in controversy requirement, similar to the requirement that still exists in diversity cases.
_	That year, Dell launched their Candlelight Ecstasy line with Amii Lorin's "The Tawny Gold Man", becoming the first line to waive the requirement that heroines be virgins.
_	According to press reports, Ulloa in his speech referred to certain bill that was being debated in the Legislative Assembly which sought to eliminate the requirement that certain public officials swear in God's name at the time of taking office, and would have separated the Catholic Church and the state (Costa Rica is a confessional state, although it guarantees freedom of worship for non-Catholic denominations).
_	The first step in paving the way for women to join Alpha Phi Omega was the Constitutional Convention in 1967, which removed the requirement that members have affiliation with the Boy Scouts of America.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give public notice of proposed hydraulic fracking.
_	The document defines the activities which are to be undertaken by the initiative, specifically "to establish a more coordinated and effective basis through which to impede and stop shipments of WMD, delivery systems, and related materials flowing to and from states and non-state actors of proliferation concern, consistent with national legal authorities and relevant international law and frameworks, including the UN Security Council circumstances in which such operations may be carried out (at sea, on land, or in the air) including, most importantly, the requirement that any action taken must be consistent with international law."
_	Picnicking is permitted with the requirement that no garbage is left behind.
_	In 1977, San Pedro’s Angels Gate Park became a facility of the City of Los Angeles Department of Recreation and Parks, with the requirement that a cultural center be developed for the community.
_	Jensen was among the Bahá'ís who accepted Remey to be the 2nd Guardian, and to reconcile the requirement that Guardians be Aghsan he believed Remey had been adopted by `Abdu'l-Bahá, and further that Remey's adopted son Pepe was the third Guardian, a point denied by Pepe.
_	The probability, which is the modulus squared of the probability amplitude, then, follows the interference pattern under the requirement that amplitudes are complex:
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	Although the hypothetical evil genius is never stated to be one and the same as the hypothetical "deus deceptor," (God the deceiver) the inference by the reader that they are is a natural one, and the requirement that the deceiver is capable of introducing deception even into mathematics is seen by commentators as a necessary part of Descartes' argument.
_	Those who oppose the ruling contend that the requirement that the defendant must speak to indicate his intention to remain silent further erodes the ability of the defendant to stay completely silent about the case.
_	Price discrimination can also be seen where the requirement that goods be identical is relaxed.
_	Due to Arthur's essential role and the requirement that there be a sorcerer on hand to break the spell once Guinevere is in position, Gaius informs Arthur that he has found a woman to perform the task.
_	For example, the requirement that the eruv boundary be thoroughly checked each week and any needed repairs made before sunset on Friday limits the area that can be practically covered by a manageable eruv.
_	According to "Always A Grand Duke", the 1933 memoir of Nicholas II’s brother-in-law, Grand Duke Alexander Mikhailovich of Russia (published in New York, by Farrar and Rinehart, Inc.), concern about the eventual marriages of cadet Romanovs so troubled the senior grand dukes that Alexander approached the Emperor about relaxing the requirement that dynasts marry partners "possessing corresponding rank" enshrined in article 188 of the Fundamental Laws (the so-called "Pauline Laws"), but was rebuffed.
_	Section 8 eliminated the requirement that chaplains be Christian by changing "of some Christian denomination" to "of some religious denomination."
_	Relaxing the requirement that all individuals be spheres yields a formalization of mereology far easier to exposit than Lesniewski's variant.
_	The donation made the requirement that the houses needed to be rebuilt if they were damaged by fire or any other reason.
_	In practice, loop variants are often taken to be non-negative integers, or even required to be so, but the requirement that every loop have an integer variant removes the expressive power of unbounded iteration from a programming language.
_	Four years earlier, Senator Keet had co-sponsored a bill that added several new water safety rules to the Arkansas code, including the requirement that children wear life preservers on most boats.
_	On June 24, 1977, in the case of "Shaffer v. Heitner", 433 U.S. 186, the Supreme Court of the United States decided that the requirement that the circumstances giving rise to jurisdiction comply with the notion of "fair play and substantial justice" should apply to the "quasi in rem" jurisdiction questions.
_	Drake was instrumental in making reforms in the Newfoundland justice system in the way that prisoners were incarcerated and the requirement that people charged with criminal offences had to be transported to England for trial.
_	Among the recommendations in the letter was the requirement that the probable cause notices be approved by a judge (i.e., judicially determined).
_	One now adds the requirement that one wants force to be measured in newtons, distance in metres, and charge to be measured in the engineers' practical unit, the coulomb, which is defined as the charge accumulated when a current of 1 ampere flows for one second.
_	In 1970 the requirement that commanding officers first obtain permission from the Secretary of Defense was lifted, and areas were allowed to be declared housing areas off limits to military personnel by their commanding officer.
_	By these results, the different shapes of receptive field profiles found in biological vision, which are tuned to different sizes and orientations in the image domain as well as to different image velocities in space-time, can be seen as well adapted to structure of the physical world and be explained from the requirement that the visual system should have the possibility of being invariant to the natural types of image transformations that occur in its environment.
_	Mikhail Gromov, however, made the important observation that symplectic manifolds do admit an abundance of compatible almost complex structures, so that they satisfy all the axioms for a Kähler manifold "except" the requirement that the transition maps be holomorphic.
_	However, it is not possible to remove the requirement that formula_4 be of codimension two in the formula_12, as the following argument shows.
_	Baking a treacle tart was set as the technical challenge by Mary, with the requirement that the pastry lattice on top be woven.
_	One of the criterion that the BIA determined the Muwekma Ohlone failed to meet was the requirement that,
_	By considering the family of maximally dense packings of the smoothed octagon, the requirement that the packing density remain the same as the point of contact between neighbouring octagons changes can be used to determine the shape of the corners.
_	Once the pivot column has been selected, the choice of pivot row is largely determined by the requirement that the resulting solution be feasible.
_	Act was replaced by the Workmen's Compensation Act 1897, which removed the requirement that the injured party prove who was responsible for the injury – instead they only needed to show that the injury had occurred on the job.
_	Another part of the strong equivalence principle is the requirement that Newton's gravitational constant be constant in time, and have the same value everywhere in the universe.
_	The teachers union sued the school district challenging the requirement that teachers must reapply for their jobs.
_	It repealed the requirement that government officials take communion in the Church of England.
_	It set the work day at 8 hours per day, made Sunday a mandatory day off, introduced the requirement that wage earners receive holidays, and limited the work week to 48 hours (35 hours for unhealthful workplaces).
_	However, John Linnell and Flansburgh took care to avoid using humor excessively, acknowledging the requirement that recorded music withstand repeated listens without losing value.
_	In return, the council demanded changes in the schools' denominational character, and in 1908 a revised scheme removed the requirement that masters and mistresses belong to the Church of England and allowed pupils to opt out of instruction in the teachings of the Church.
_	The Copyright Act of 1909 was amended in 1976 specifically to protect the broadcast and meet the requirement that the original work of authorship be "fixed in any tangible medium of expression" (a).
_	The "Local Government Act, 1993" removed the requirement that the administrative head of a council be a "Town or Shire Clerk" and specified that the head was to be known as the "General Manager".
_	Since linear combinations of these quantities are also Lorentz invariant, this leads naturally to the Lagrangian density for the Dirac field by the requirement that the Euler–Lagrange equation of the system recover the Dirac equation.
_	One of the sections that the Court made optional was the requirement that states expand Medicaid eligibility to childless adults at or below 133% of the federal poverty level (FPL).
_	The draft was acceptable to Mason as a basis for discussion, containing such points important to him as the requirement that money bills originate in the House and not be amendable in the Senate.
_	First is the requirement that the applicant be "attached to the principles of the Constitution of the United States, and well disposed to the good order and happiness of the same."
_	A structure satisfying all the axioms "except" the requirement that there exists a multiplicative identity element is called a rng (commonly pronounced "rung", and sometimes called a pseudo-ring).
_	If the constants , , and/or are not unitless, then the units of must be equal to the units of , due to the requirement that and agree on their units.
_	Wagner was among the first members of Congress to sponsor the Financial CHOICE Act of 2017, which weakens oversight by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, allows greater risk-taking by financial institutions, and eliminates the requirement that financial advisors act in their clients' best interests.
_	The work was funded by Lord Stanley of Alderley, a convert to Islam and patron of the church, whose donations to rural churches carried the requirement that Islamic detail should be included in any restoration work.
_	This concern has found expression in the standards for involuntary commitment in every U.S. state and in other countries as the "danger to self or others" standard, sometimes supplemented by the requirement that the danger be "imminent".
_	The court (20 September 1990) strongly asserted the requirement that every state action must not be arbitrary even if that state action was in the field of contractual relations between the state and individuals.
_	While the decision was based on the wording of the specific legislation, its ongoing significance is its foundation for the requirement that the government act as a model litigant.
_	Jurisdiction over the site was transferred in 1924 to the city's Homes for Dependents agency, which lifted the requirement that all residents of the colony had to work — with most of the work involving the cultivation of many varieties of fruits and vegetables, and at various times even grains such as wheat and corn; these crops fed not only the colony's residents but met the needs of other city institutions as well.
_	The weak Fréchet distance is a variant of the classical Fréchet distance without the requirement that the endpoints move monotonically along their respective curves — the dog and its owner are allowed to backtrack to keep the leash between them short.
_	Finally, it ruled that limiting the exemption only to the 16 municipalities violates the requirement that the classification must apply to all similarly situated.
_	Kasich and the others specifically called upon Congress to "end the requirement that state Medicaid programs cover nearly every prescription drug approved by the Food and Drug Administration."
_	The inclusion of a ride with the Concours d'Elegance reinforced the requirement that any motorcycle winning an award at the LOTM Concours must be in running condition (with specific exceptions, such as Land Speed Racers and Grand Prix racers); motorcycles that could not be started and ridden over the awards podium forfeited their prize.
_	That enough would volunteer was made more doubtful by the requirement that they should abandon their civilian lives for the six months of training considered necessary for them to be effective in such a reserve role.
_	The list includes a Ministerial by-election which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	In addition, the requirement that the revelation of relevant information by the accused was unknown to the police and that the prosecutor examines the police investigation before the case is brought to the court, is seen as an extra layer of safeguard for the validity of confession as evidence.
_	Analytical uses of Fmoc-Cl that do not use chromatography may be limited by the requirement that excess Fmoc-Cl be removed before an analysis of fluorescence.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	Mathews and his troops also played a key role in the ending of the Anglo-Zanzibar War of 1896 which erupted out of an attempt to bypass the requirement that new Sultans must be vetted by the British consul.
_	The "P" symbol or "P" badge was introduced on 8 March 1940 by the Nazi German government with relation to the requirement that Polish workers ("Zivilarbeiter") used during World War II as forced laborers in Germany (following the German invasion and occupation of Poland in 1939) display a visible symbol marking their ethnic origin.
_	If one relaxes the requirement that the tetrahedra be all the same shape, one can tile space using only tetrahedra in many different ways.
_	However, the requirement that such a referendum must first be approved by a three-fourths vote of the Legislative Yuan, and that at least 50% of the whole electorate had to vote for the change for the referendum to succeed considerably reducing the chance that these amendments would trigger a conflict with China.
_	A similar proposal was made to the Baptist women of Illinois in 1887, with the requirement that they provide a $100,000 endowment; although a Women's Society was established to serve as a vehicle for this, the funds were never raised.
_	This is a generalization of the requirement that have finite variance, and is necessary for this strong form of Chebyshev's inequality in infinite dimensions.
_	Ore condition is simply the requirement that "S" be a right denominator set.
_	It removed the requirement that the victim of a hate crime be engaged in a federally protected activity.
_	During periods of recess, the Senate meets in "pro forma" sessions to satisfy the requirement that neither house may adjourn for more than three days without the consent of the other house.
_	Bush says they do not have a set text--only the requirement that Saddam be disarmed.
_	Canada's broadcasting regulators, the Canadian Radio-television and Telecommunications Commission (CRTC), ruled that CHOM DJs were not allowed to speak in French on the air, despite the requirement that CHOM must broadcast a certain proportion of French language songs.
_	He supported the requirement that abortion providers maintain hospital admitting privileges near their clinics.
_	Manning also indicated that the destruction of the steel was illegal, based on his review of the national standard for fire investigation, NFPA 921, which provides no exemption to the requirement that evidence be saved in cases of fires in buildings over 10 stories tall.
_	In Islam, polygyny is allowed while polyandry is not, with the specific limitation that a man can have no more than four legal wives at any one time and an unlimited number of female slaves as concubines, with the requirement that the man is able and willing to partition his time and wealth equally among the respective wives.
_	Although Mexican labor law is much more stringent than American labor laws (e.g. the requirement that workers be paid three months severance after as much time on the job, should they be let go without cause), women are sometimes subjected to unsafe and unsanitary working conditions.
_	Chiropody became a registered profession in New Zealand in 1969 with the requirement that all applicants take a recognized three-year course of training.
_	In 1836, the requirement that the ceremony take place in a religious forum was removed, and registrars were given the authority to register marriages not conducted by a religious official.
_	Pook's design was constrained by the requirement that the vessel be armored.
_	Squat cleans are a common movement used in weightlifting with the requirement that the competitor must squat below parallel on the clean.
_	Here, offspring are produced by the same mechanism as in parthenogenesis, but with the requirement that the egg merely be stimulated by the "presence" of sperm in order to develop.
_	Negotiations intensified toward the end of preseason, with the major sticking points being the $1.5 million repayment the USFL demanded on the remaining two years of Young's contract, and the requirement that Young clear USFL waivers.
_	For a single person with a qualify child, there is no age requirement per se other than the requirement that the single person not himself or herself be claimable as another relative's qualifying child (see Age section above).
_	The station must be non-profit and dedicated to the community, with the requirement that 70% of its programming must be produced within the community.
_	The CAPE-OPEN project formally identified such a modelling programme as a Process Modelling Environment (PME) with the requirement that users of a PME should be able to easily connect the PME with other modelling tools without the need to develop bespoke interfaces.
_	In 1953 a member of the county, George Lorimer, donated $8,000 for the construction of a new library in Screven County on the requirement that the money be matched by the county board within 6 months.
_	Also new in this election is the requirement that candidates register prior to campaigning.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	In 2004, the requirement that institutes gain research degree awarding powers before they could gain university status was dropped in England and Wales (but not in Scotland or Northern Ireland), although they were still required to have 4000 full-time equivalent students, with 3000 on degree courses.
_	The measure passed by a one-vote margin, and included an important new component, the requirement that industries report the chemicals being used and stored at their facilities, and their emissions into the air, land, and water.
_	To this end he reaffirmed the requirement that any individual wait for ten years before being reelected to any office.
_	The term Single-Crossing Condition (Spence Mirrlees property) refers to the requirement that the isoutility curve for agents of different types cross only once.
_	Voter registration (or enrollment) is the requirement that a person otherwise eligible to vote register (or enroll) on an electoral roll before they will be entitled or permitted to vote.
_	Section 3 of the Act disapplied certain procedural requirements in cases of high treason consisting of counterfeiting the king's coin, namely the requirement that the accused be given a list of the witnesses and the jurors.
_	The phrase "Muḥammadun rasūlu llāh" fulfills the requirement that there should be someone to guide in the name of God, which states Muhammad is God's Messenger,"rasūl", "nabi" (prophet).
_	It was funded by Lord Stanley of Alderley, a convert to Islam, whose donations to rural churches carried the requirement that Islamic detail should be included in any restoration work.
_	The challenge arises from the requirement that the set of qualified users can change in each broadcast emission, and therefore revocation of individual users or user groups should be possible using broadcast transmissions, only, and without affecting any remaining users.
_	This Act is perhaps best remembered for its expansion of the requirement that welfare recipients be marked to indicate their status, in this case by wearing a prominent badge.
_	Notice that, again from the definition of the tensor product, any density matrix, indeed any matrix acting on the composite state space, can be trivially written in the desired form, if we drop the requirement that formula_16 and formula_17 are themselves states and formula_25
_	The song not only notes the requirement that Baby Blue leave, but also includes the hope that Baby Blue will move forward, in lines such as "Strike another match, go start anew".
_	Despite the failure of the United States and Australia to ratify the protocol, the agreement became effective in 2005, once the requirement that 55 Annex I (predominantly industrialized) countries, jointly accounting for 55 percent of 1990 Annex I emissions, ratify the agreement was met.
_	The Court also ordered that Morton be placed on supervised release for five years after prison release, and that among the terms of the supervision is the requirement that Morton "shall not engage, as whole or partial owner, employee or otherwise, in any business involving the sale of financial instruments or providing debt relief services without the express approval of the Probation Officer prior to engaging in such employment."
_	The President's power in this area is restricted by the requirement that the board must recommend the detainee's release; if further detention is recommended, the President has no power to direct otherwise.
_	The Association for Financial Markets in Europe (AFME)'s formal response to Ferber particularly cited concern with the requirement that all algorithms run continuously as this would preclude the use of broker algorithms to execute client orders.
_	It is possible for men to wake up during a wet dream or simply to sleep through it, but for women, some researchers have added the requirement that she should also awaken during the orgasm and perceive that the orgasm happened before it counts as a wet dream.
_	On June 25, 1987, the CTC voted to support the SR 52 extension, with the requirement that $4.8 million (about $ in dollars) come from local funding sources.
_	After Mahamadou Issoufou won the January–March 2011 presidential election, he stepped down as PNDS President in March 2011, prior to his swearing-in, in accordance with the requirement that the head of state not participate in partisan politics; Bazoum took over as Acting President of the PNDS.
_	One historical approach to determining safe cant deficiency was the requirement that the projection to the plane of the track of the resultant of the inertial and gravitational forces acting on a vehicle fall within the middle third of the track gauge.
_	NASA had no official policy prohibiting women, but the requirement that astronauts had to be military test pilots effectively excluded them.
_	This simplification removes the requirement that the winner pays the successful bid value, so the game is simply to select the lowest unique positive integer, with the value of that integer having no further consequence.
_	He was arrested on 27 March 2013, and released on 31 March with the requirement that he stay in Venice and register with the police daily.
_	The license allowed for resumption of project development with the requirement that the title be changed to remove the "King's Quest" reference.
_	Serial killer Catherine Birnie (Western Australia) is serving four consecutive life sentences with a non-parole period of 20 years, but due to the requirement that the attorney-general signs off on all parole recommendations from the Prisoners Review Board, it is highly unlikely she will ever be released from prison.
_	The results of this election were instrumental to the presidential election in July due to the requirement that a presidential ticket had to be supported by a party or a coalition of parties winning at least 20% of the seats or 25% of the popular votes in the legislative election.
_	Truman had at least one other strong reason to object to the anti-Catholic requirement, which was that the Catholic Pendergast family, which operated a political machine in Jackson County, were his patrons; Pendergast family lore has it that Truman was originally accepted for patronage without even meeting him, on the basis of his family background plus the requirement that he was not a member of any anti-Catholic organization such as the Klan.
_	While some analysts would put forth the theory that the most highly available systems adhere to a simple architecture (a single, high quality, multi-purpose physical system with comprehensive internal hardware redundancy), this architecture suffers from the requirement that the entire system must be brought down for patching and operating system upgrades.
_	Keet had four years earlier co-sponsored a bill that added several new water safety rules to the Arkansas code, including the requirement that children wear life preservers on most boats.
_	The plans were drawn up by young architect Joseph Herenden Clark, a recent graduate of the Columbia School of Architecture who, upon hearing the requirement that the structure be made from brick with white trim and a slate roof, recalled Christ Church in Alexandria, Virginia.
_	Emotional labor concerns the requirement that an employee display certain emotions, such smiling at customers, even when the employee does not feel the emotion he or she is required to display.
_	Unlike the prior two laws, however, "lex Hortensia" eliminated the requirement that the Senate ratify, in the case of the "lex Valeria-Horatia", or give its prior approval to, in the case of the "lex Publilia", plebiscites before becoming binding on all citizens.
_	Moreover, the requirement that a process will eventually release all its resources (when the process terminates) is sufficient for the correctness of the algorithm, however it is not sufficient for a practical system.
_	The lawsuit, "Arakaki v. State of Hawaii", challenged the requirement that trustees of the Office of Hawaiian Affairs (OHA) be of Hawaiian ancestry, on the basis of the Fourteenth Amendment, the Fifteenth Amendment and the Voting Rights Act.
_	However, the requirement that the person have "fled" the requesting jurisdiction has since been removed from Irish law, and a new warrant has been issued by the Hungarian authorities.
_	Due to the requirement that official government documents make use of only "jōyō kanji" and their readings, several rare characters are also included by dint of being a part of the Constitution of Japan, which was being written at the same time the original 1850-character "tōyō kanji" list was compiled.
_	The group announced on August 17, 2011, that they would file an appeal to the court "that the Superior Court allowed Ottawa's City Council far too much latitude in regard to restrictions set out in provincial law concerning competitive procurement, the use of tax dollars to assist commercial entities and the requirement that it put the public interest first."
_	The Societies suffered a steady decline membership after the University ended the requirement that all undergraduate students be a member of one of the two societies.
_	This is equivalent to the requirement that for all subsets "A"<nowiki>'</nowiki> of "X"<nowiki>'</nowiki>
_	On May 16, 2016, the Supreme Court decided that concrete harm had not been established by the 9th Circuit Court, only particularized ("the requirement that an injury affect the plaintiff in a personal and individual way", "individualized rather than collective" - quotes from the brief) harm.
_	She included the requirement that Waterfall House be converted into a "museum for the custody and display of indigenous Indian relics, flora and fauna of the California coastal area, and historical objects pertaining to the Big Sur country", or otherwise demolished.
_	As noted above, the requirement that the action integral be stationary under small perturbations of the evolution is equivalent to a set of differential equations (called the Euler–Lagrange equations) that may be determined using the calculus of variations.
_	The rate of return is higher than for savings accounts because the requirement that the deposit be held for a prespecified term gives the bank the ability to invest it in a higher-gain financial product class.
_	He was released two months later with the requirement that he leave Germany within two months.
_	Ballot Language: "Shall the City Charter be amended to update language and to repeal the requirement that the City Auditor conduct audits and investigations of City officials and officers upon their death, resignation, or removal from City office?"
_	It also established the requirement that the U.S. President had to approve all future land sales and cessions by the Osage.
_	She has also campaigned in the "Express" to highlight the treatment of people with mental-health problems, and has written articles opposing the requirement that pensioners pay for medical treatment while in nursing homes.
_	Furthermore, due to the lengthwise installation of the five-cylinder engine, and the requirement that the overall length of the car comply with Japanese government regulations concerning cars classified as "compact", compromises were made with regards to rear passenger accommodations, and sales suffered as a result.
_	Credit has certain disadvantages, including the requirement that traders or their intermediaries trust one another, or trust that authorities exist who can be relied on to enforce agreements.
_	The difficulty in the halting problem lies in the requirement that the decision procedure must work for all programs and inputs.
_	The Fourth Circuit reversed the district court, reasoning that § 3501 had supplanted the requirement that the police give the "Miranda" warnings because "Miranda" was not a constitutional requirement and therefore Congress could overrule that decision by legislation.
_	He wanted stricter enforcement of the requirement that children whose parents were not educated in English be educated in French.
_	Many laws in Israel pertain to this subject, such as the requirement that all citizens enter into the army at age 18, men for three years and women for two.
_	The House of Commons accepted all of the amendments made by the Senate except one, which removed the requirement that death be "reasonably foreseeable."
_	Additional rules include the requirement that freshman resident hall students sign out before leaving campus and that resident hall students abide by a campus curfew of 11:00 pm, with lights out at midnight.
_	The size of the matrices is determined by the requirement that Cℓ(R) have dimension 2.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	She particularly objected to the requirement that the prisoners not associate with each other upon release.
_	Restrictions were tightened even further on February 25, 1917, with the requirement that only a single type of loaf of bread could be sold; it weighed seven hundred grams, was eighty centimeters long, and was sold twenty-four hours after it was baked.
_	After a Titan II propellant feed line was found to have some damage during factory inspections, NASA put out the requirement that all GLV propellant lines had to be X-rayed in order to prevent a potentially disastrous fuel leak during launch.
_	He voted against the requirement that welfare recipients undergo periodic testing for drug use.
_	These include the eliminating of the requirement that candidates for the House of Representatives must be members of a political party for at least 90 days prior to an election.
_	The most important change there was the requirement that the Treasurer publish an annual report, along with a copy of the total income and expenditure of the Society.
_	Similarly, for the PMBoK, the major development in this coordinated approach was the requirement that a knowledge area always starts with the associated management plan.
_	The school wide projects altered the requirement that local funds had to match school wide program funding by Title I, allowing a larger number of high need schools to implement school wide programming.
_	The reconfiguration block has to fulfill the requirement that the behaviour of the reconfigured plant matches the behaviour of the nominal, that is fault-free plant.
_	Construction was expected to take nearly six years with multiple lane flyovers and the requirement that the interchange remain open throughout the project.
_	The abolition of Catholic dioceses was a violation of Canon Law, and the requirement that the clergy were to be obliged to take an oath to the Constitution in order to hold their jobs and collect their state-supplied salaries brought about a schism.
_	Another gray area regarding these depictions involves the requirement that an obscene work depicting minors "lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value".
_	In "Poulterer's Case", 77 Eng. Rep. 813 (K.B. 1611), the court reasoned that the thrust of the crime was the confederating of two or more, and dropped the requirement that an actual indictment of an innocent take place, whereby precedent was set that conspiracy only need involve an attempted crime, and that the agreement was the act, which enabled subsequent holdings against an agreement to commit any crime, not just that originally proscribed.
_	Later in June 2017, Jenkins said that while AHCA allowed states to opt out of the requirement that insurers not discriminate against individuals with preexisting conditions and the requirement that insurers provide "essential health benefits", he did not want West Virginia to seek waivers from those requirements.
_	Though the position of the Church of Scotland was "unalterably" secured, the Universities (Scotland) Act 1853 repealed the requirement that professors declare their faith before assuming a position.
_	In 2014, Hazel co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	Free disposal is a third work-around that keeps the requirement that the division be totally envy-free and works for all value measures, but drops the requirement that the entire cake must be divided.
_	This removed the requirement that both of the arguments of "cons" be available at the same instant of time.
_	The State Electoral Commission invalidated his candidacy as he had not fulfilled the requirement that all presidential candidates live in the country for 15 consecutive years prior to nomination.
_	This omission allowed TransDigm to avoid the requirement that monopoly suppliers to DoD report their costs.
_	Consistency in database systems refers to the requirement that any given database transaction must change affected data only in allowed ways.
_	Some of the restrictions include waiting as long as twelve years after petitioning before a religious community can start to apply for recognition and the requirement that a legally-recognized religion must have over 22,000 members.
_	Google issued a statement criticizing the requirement that data be reported in aggregated form, stating that lumping national security requests with criminal request data would be "a step backwards" from its previous, more detailed practices on its website's transparency report.
_	Wirral then looked for operators who would contract to operate the tramway, and removed the requirement that the Pacific Road venue should continue to be an Arts Centre.
_	After the battle at Khandava Indra had promised Arjuna to give him all his weapons as a boon for matching him in battle with the requirement that Shiva is pleased with him.
_	All countries are entitled to send up to three athletes to the Junior World Championships, subject to the requirement that each entrant must have finished at least three IBSF sanctioned competitions on at least two tracks in the previous two years.
_	It would restate the existing statutory definition of “raises taxes,” restate the requirement that new or increased fees must be approved by majority vote in both houses of the legislature, and correct statutory references.
_	The fallacy in the argument can be illustrated through the use of an Euler diagram: "A" satisfies the requirement that it is part of both sets "B" and "C", but if one represents this as an Euler diagram, it can clearly be seen that it is possible that a part of set "B" is "not" part of set "C", refuting the conclusion that "all Bs are Cs".
_	The Grand Committee's proposal added the requirement that revenue bills originate in the lower house and not be subject to modification by the upper house (although this Origination Clause would later be modified so that revenue bills could be amended in the upper house, or Senate).
_	Some sources include the requirement that the curve may not cross the line infinitely often, but this is unusual for modern authors.
_	An example is the requirement that every car be fit with a catalytic converter.
_	Women's rights activists criticized the bill for removing protections from women, such as the requirement that a husband obtain his wife's consent before marrying a second wife.
_	Von Staden, an international organisations academic, and Jean-Paul Costa, the former President of the Court, have said that an element of subsidiarity that has been integrated into the institutional design of the Court via the requirement that applicants exhaust domestic remedies prior to being eligible to lodge an application at Strasbourg.
_	In 1996, the Republican-controlled Ohio General Assembly passed a law that struck the requirement that the Ohio state government invest solely in bonds.
_	Starting in 1909, David Lloyd George introduced restrictions on distilling in the United Kingdom; these included increased taxes and the requirement that all whisky sold had been aged for at least three years.
_	The convention also weakened the requirement that money bills begin in the House and not be subject to amendment in the Senate, eventually striking the latter clause after debate that stretched fitfully over weeks.
_	For rigor, the Indian philosophies further demand "Vyapti" - the requirement that the "hetu" (reason) must necessarily and separately account for the inference in "all" cases, in both "sapaksha" and "vipaksha".
_	The second modification was the requirement that one of the ice giants encounters Jupiter, causing its semi-major axis to jump.
_	Renormalization is based on the requirement that some physical quantities — expressed by seemingly divergent expressions such as formula_3 — are equal to the observed values.
_	In 1882, the requirement that the post holder should be a Doctor or Bachelor of Divinity was also repealed.
_	Goodhue modified his design in response to the requirement that the old church portal, beloved by the parishioners, be preserved, with its bronze doors, from the Madison Avenue building and re-erected on the new site.
_	OpenGL often lags behind on feature updates due to the lack of a permanent development team and the requirement that implementations begin development after the standard has been published.
_	State and local governments would be able to maintain their real spending levels, despite the requirement that they pay the FairTax on their purchases.
_	The same comment about observables would apply together with the requirement that they have even grading under the grading where the "ψ"s have odd grading.
_	A particular problem regarded the "vătraşi", whose lifestyle was heavily disrupted by forced settlement and the requirement that they perform menial labour.
_	This is implied in the requirement that the quantity under the square root is positive.
_	Section 28 removes the Secretary of State's powers to give directions to local authorities regarding the provision of careers and post-16 education advice, and the requirement that schools must provide people involved in careers advice access to both students and school facilities.
_	The writings of Saint Ambrose (died 397) also show that the requirement that priests, whether married or celibate, should be continent was the established rule.
_	"Besides, the requirement that a thorough investigation must be conducted and that the decision should be based on the advice by the judge who passed the sentence was ignored."
_	In November 2014, U.S. President Barack Obama announced changes to DACA which would expand it to include illegal immigrants who entered the country prior to 2010, eliminate the requirement that applicants be younger than 31 years old, and lengthen the renewable deferral period to two years.
_	In doing so, it stated that IO Schedule 1 Paragraph 1(4)(b), which imposed the requirement that the seven years of ordinary residence qualifying a non-Chinese national to apply for permanent residence immediately precede the application, contravened the Basic Law and should be struck down.
_	Congress changed the age limits to 17–23 years old and changed the requirement that enrollees be on relief to "not regularly in attendance at school, or possessing full-time employment."
_	This satisfies the requirement that, waste of hospitals and health facilities must be burnt at a minimum temperature of acc. to the rules of environmental protection.
_	Apart from the requirement that there must be at least eight SMCs, the total number of SMCs and GRCs in Singapore and their boundaries are not fixed.
_	On September 17, 1904, Kimball Webster, town historian, Selectman and Library Trustee, donated land in the center of town with the requirement that it eventually hold a free standing public library building.
_	2– Determine the value of angle ∠3 (this equation derives from the requirement that point D must coincide with point E):
_	Many content-aggregator sites including Reddit, video-platforms such as LiveLeak and imageboards such as 4chan have their own subsites which are dedicated to or allow such content – often with the requirement that such material be marked as such which is often done via a NSFL tag.
_	For a circular plate, the requirement that the deflection and the slope of the deflection are finite
_	In August 2012, the Ministry of Information lifted the requirement that print media organisations submit materials to the government before publication; films remained subject to prior censorship.
_	and the requirement that phase velocity, "v", be constant at all frequencies.
_	Practical limitations to media neutrality include the inability of journalists to report all available stories and facts, the requirement that selected facts be linked into a coherent narrative, government influence including overt and covert censorship, the influence of the owners of the news source, concentration of media ownership, the selection of staff, the preferences of an intended audience, and pressure from advertisers.
_	As noted above, some artists have developed affinities for particular instruments included in this program; the requirement that instruments so supplied be credited to Steinway led to Olga Samaroff's above-mentioned purchase of a D-274 on which to make records.
_	In April 1917, William Burr was made the advisory engineer and made many changes to the original Strauss designs, most importantly the requirement that piers project into the concrete cylinders was stricken.
_	Common variations involve dealing three cards to each player, one of which can either be discarded at some point (like Pineapple, above), or else held to the end, but maintaining the requirement that players play exactly two of their own cards with exactly three of the board.
_	On 28 March 2001, the Holy See issued the Instruction "Liturgiam Authenticam", which included the requirement that, in translations of the liturgical texts from the official Latin originals, "the original text, insofar as possible, must be translated integrally and in the most exact manner, without omissions or additions in terms of their content, and without paraphrases or glosses.
_	An essential idea of the MIT exokernel system is that the operating system should act as an executive for small programs provided by the application software, which are constrained only by the requirement that the exokernel must be able to guarantee that they use the hardware safely.
_	She sailed after George Canning wrote on 16 May 1814 to Secretary of the Admiralty John Wilson Croker requesting an exemption for her from the requirement that vessels travel in convoy.
_	The fields do "not" form a variety of algebras; the requirement that all non-zero elements be invertible cannot be expressed as a universally satisfied identity.
_	He would donate both the new building and the books with the requirement that the city was to maintain the building and take care of the annual expenses.
_	After considerable further negotiations with the federal government, approval was finally granted, with the requirement that Vancouver materials and workmen be used as much as possible to provide employment during the Great Depression.
_	Access to the FDR and CVR is necessarily difficult because of the requirement that they survive an accident.
_	In 1955 the Ohio General Assembly eliminated the requirement that cities and school districts have common borders.
_	Among the drawbacks of the technique are the limited number of gamma ray sources and the requirement that samples be solid in order to eliminate the recoil of the nucleus.
_	Ultimately, the United States Department of Energy imposed on MIT the requirement that they release a copy into the National Energy Software Center (NESC) library in 1982, while allowing MIT to assert restrictions in terms of high price and no redistribution.
_	In 2014, Representative Fannin voted for the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	Sometimes, as in a filtered algebra, there is instead the requirement that the formula_2 be subalgebras with respect to some operations (say, vector addition), but not with respect to other operations (say, multiplication), that satisfy formula_13, where the index set is the natural numbers; this is by analogy with a graded algebra.
_	However the requirement that the harm inflicted is not disproportional to the harm avoided.
_	The first, was to the same effect as the successful 1977 referendum providing for territory voting at referendums, and secondly would have modified the requirement that a majority of electors in a majority of states approve a change.
_	One of the changes to the LCC will be the requirement that during tanking, all four sensors must be operational.
_	She included the requirement that Waterfall House be converted into a "museum for the custody and display of indigenous Indian relics, flora and fauna of the California coastal area, and historical objects pertaining to the Big Sur country.".
_	Letting "ω" denote a section of , the requirement that "ω" be non-degenerate ensures that for every differential "dH" there is a unique corresponding vector field "V" such that .
_	Finally, one makes the requirement that "ω" should not change under flow lines, i.e. that the Lie derivative of "ω" along "V" vanishes.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	The main reason was the requirement that the entire Znojmo-Břeclav railway line, a branch-off of the former Emperor Ferdinand Northern Railway, remain inside Czechoslovak territory.
_	They added the requirement that the patient is awake and alert, as coma precludes adequate neurological assessment, and require exclusion of venous sinus thrombosis as an underlying cause.
_	Furthermore, they added the requirement that no other cause for the raised ICP is found.
_	The first prefix provision defines the requirement that the state have a constitutional convention.
_	H.R. 1003 would amend the Commodity Exchange Act to revise the requirement that the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC), before promulgating a regulation or issuing an order, consider the costs and benefits of the action.
_	The Massachusetts state law imposed the requirement that a person has the right against the unreasonable interference of privacy and states that the superior court shall have jurisdiction to enforce a person's right and thus must award damages if need be.
_	This revision omitted the requirement that the impact should be in line with the wickets, but meant that any batsman playing a shot could not be out if the ball pitched outside off stump, in contrast to the 1935 law.
_	5– Determine the value of angle ∠3 (this equation derives from the requirement that point D must coincide with point E):
_	Faisal was not explicitly authorised by his father to enter into such an agreement, with his instructions from his father limited to the requirement that he accept only fulfilment of the previous British promises for Arab independence; the caveat was added as a result.
_	For example, the Somali and other pastoralists tended not to follow the requirement that daughters inherit half as much property as sons, particularly when livestock was at issue.
_	However, software distributed under GPLv1 could not be combined with software distributed under a more restrictive license, as this would conflict with the requirement that the whole be distributable under the terms of GPLv1.
_	The condition that the points are in general position is equivalent to the requirement that this matrix determinant is never zero for distinct points "p", "q", and "r".
_	Image partners such as Larsen and Valentino, who did not take this approach, assumed a neutral position on it, in keeping with the requirement that none of them had any say in how the others' studios were run.
_	The agreement has not altered other language provisions applying prior to grant of a European patent, such as the requirement that the claims of a European patent application have to be translated "in the two official languages of the European Patent Office other than the language of the proceedings" after receiving the communication under indicating that the EPO intends to grant a European patent.
_	The Tenth Party Congress in 1969 introduced the requirement that applicants under the age of twenty-six would be accepted into the party only if they were UTC members.
_	The 1917 Code of Canon Law introduced the requirement that a cardinal must be at least a priest.
_	This is done by special procedural rules for trials in all cases of press delicts, by trial by jury, by the requirement that no judgement of indemnity can be given if not a two-thirds majority of the jury has found the publication criminal - as well as through other rules that makes it impossible for the state or for private interests to take legal action against various persons or steps in the production.
_	The site also met the requirement that the depot be in a dry and isolated area.
_	Starting with this release, Microsoft has also dropped the requirement that all Windows Phone OEMs include a camera button and physical buttons for back, Start, and Search.
_	Sometimes the requirement that the operation be valued in a set is explicitly stated, in which case it is known as the axiom of closure.
_	First, that the debt was issued to finance a constitutional mandate: the requirement that "The Legislature shall provide for the maintenance and support of a thorough and efficient system of free public schools for the instruction of all children in the State between the ages of five and eighteen years" (Article VIII Section IV).
_	The council sought to formalise the deal through a controversial request for tender which effectively precluded anybody but North Melbourne from applying by stipulating that applicants "must play Australian rules football within the framework of the Victorian Football League"; it dropped the requirement that applicants play in the League after it was criticised as unethical, but the point was moot as Coburg Football Club's rent offer of £200 per year had no chance of competing with North Melbourne's £4,000 per year.
_	Although trade barriers fell with GATT and the WTO, the requirement that all member states be treated equally and the need for all to agree on terms meant that there were several rounds of negotiations.
_	The principle is a restatement of the requirement that a database is a minimum cover set of the relational algebra.
_	Rosenzweig believes that the addition of an ascertainment requirement and the requirement that the identification of individuals should be more specific "seem unnecessary and unwise".
_	In 2014, Howard co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	On August 9, 1956, she led the march of 20 000 women on the Union Buildings of Pretoria along with Lilian Ngoyi, Rahima Moosa, Helen Joseph, Albertina Sisulu and Bertha Gxowa to protest the requirement that women carry pass books as part of the pass laws.
_	Jeffrey Tigay, Professor Emeritus at the University of Pennsylvania, called the requirement that sacrifices be offered only in a single sanctuary "the most singular" of all the laws in Deuteronomy.
_	Examples of his approach included the requirement that singers should act, and that the music was to be the guide, with the seamless whole being an interpretation of the music.
_	In addition, many of these long-established regulatory bodies extend specific regulations solely to retail forex dealers, such as higher capital requirements, disclosure statements and the requirement that all dealers disclose to customers that their funds may not be safe in the event of bankruptcy.
_	Justice Byron White, writing for the majority explained, "the FCC has included among the conditions of the Red Lion license itself the requirement that operation of the station be carried out in the public interest."
_	The title reflects its former status as a Collegiate Church, and derives from the requirement that all of the canons of the Cathedral must possess the academic distinction of Doctor of Theology in order to serve there.
_	While the Servomechanisms Lab was in the process of developing their first mill, in 1953, MIT's Mechanical Engineering Department dropped the requirement that undergraduates take courses in drawing.
_	She founded the Bryn Mawr School, a private college-preparatory school for girls in Baltimore and generously donated to Bryn Mawr College of Pennsylvania with the requirement that her intimate friend, Martha Carey Thomas, be the president.
_	Two specific criteria are common to most of the 340B-eligible hospital types: the requirement for a "disproportionate share hospital (DSH) adjustment percentage" above a certain level; and the requirement that the hospital: (a) be owned or operated by a state or local government; (b) be a private nonprofit hospital "formally granted governmental powers" by a state or local government; or (c) be a private nonprofit hospital with a contract with a state or local government to provide care to low-income individuals who are not eligible for Medicare or Medicaid.
_	This link was maintained by the requirement that for every Cyprus pound issued by the Currency Board in Cyprus, one pound sterling issued by the Bank of England had to be deposited by the Government of Cyprus with the Crown Agents in London.
_	Other respected songwriters lost interest in or simply avoided writing for Presley because of the requirement that they surrender a third of their usual royalties.
_	In this case, since the positioning of the straight line is constrained by the requirement that the lower range values of the line and the device's characteristic be coincident, the non-linearity based on this definition will generally be larger than for independent linearity.
_	It preserves the requirement that public schools ensure students obtain an English language proficiency, require school districts to solicit parent/community input in developing language acquisition programs, require instruction to ensure English acquisition as rapidly and effectively as possible, and authorize school districts to establish dual–language immersion programs for both native and non–native English speakers.
_	con.. A Democratic Unionist Party (DUP) councillor objected to the GAA's goals of promoting Irish games, language and culture, to the then Rule 21 ban on participation in GAA sports by members of the crown forces, and to the requirement that the Irish tricolour - "a foreign flag" - be flown during matches.
_	However, the advantage of an early migration is significantly reduced by the requirement that the Jupiter–Saturn period ratio jump to beyond 2.3 to reproduce the current asteroid belt.
_	The league, which was to combine a professional pay structure with the requirement that all players be college graduates, had originally been scheduled to start in the spring of 2007, but later postponed its launch to the spring of 2008, only to cancel its 2008 season a month before kickoff and suspend its launch until the next year.
_	It has been argued that the requirement that a police officer must have individualized suspicion before searching a parolee's person and home was long considered a foundational element of the Court's analysis of Fourth Amendment questions and that abandoning it in the name of crime prevention represents an unprecedented blow to individual liberties.
_	In the United States, some view the requirement that jurors take an oath to be unlawful in itself, while still others view the oath's reference to "deliverance" to "require" nullification of unjust law: "will well and truly try and a true deliverance make between the United States and the defendant at the bar, and a true verdict render according to the evidence, so help [me] God".
_	A playoff system was later introduced, along with the requirement that 2.
_	This is due to the requirement that the disappearance of mesons is evaluated with respect to the baseline provided by the total production of all charm quark-containing subatomic particles, and because it is widely expected that some are produced and/or destroyed at time of QGP hadronization.
_	Otherwise, the state could "manipulate its way out" of the requirement that it prove every element of the crime beyond a reasonable doubt.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	On December 5, 2017, Ion exercised an option to buy the WLWC license for $150,000; the deal was made possible by a change in FCC ownership rules that eliminated the requirement that there be at least eight owners of television stations in a market following the formation of a duopoly.
_	De Valera began a legal case to challenge the requirement that members of his party take the Oath, but the assassination of the Vice-President of the Executive Council (deputy prime minister) Kevin O'Higgins led the Executive Council under W. T. Cosgrave to introduce a Bill requiring all Dáil candidates to promise on oath that if they were elected they would take the Oath of Allegiance.
_	In a short period of time well over 15,000 signatures of registered Democrats were collected in over 50 New York counties, with the requirement that there be at least 100 such valid signatures in each county.
_	These do not subject a person to more punishment than the crimes listed above but provide only a gimmick for prosecutors to avoid the requirement that an individual sex act be specified in a rape indictment.
_	By 1948, with trooping requirements falling off, and the need for more ships to cater for the demand for emigrants to Australia and New Zealand, the Ministry of Transport (formerly the MoWT) decided to restore "Georgic" for civilian service, with the requirement that she could be converted again for trooping duties if the need arose.
_	The statute of frauds refers to the requirement that certain kinds of contracts be memorialized in a writing, signed by the party to be charged, with sufficient content to evidence the contract.
_	Helenwood was incorporated as a town by referendum in 1997, after the state statute that set minimum criteria for municipal incorporation was amended by the Tennessee General Assembly to remove the requirement that a newly incorporating area must not be within three miles of an existing city and to reduce the minimum population for incorporation from 1,500 residents to 225.
_	The Court of Appeals re-affirmed that the Congress has the power to impose the income tax, and stated that the Sixteenth Amendment "merely eliminates the requirement that the direct income tax be apportioned among the states".
_	The percentage breakdown could come to vary considerably, but that is allowed for by the requirement that the number of voters and the percentage required for election must be, within a specified tolerance, the same across all electorates.
_	He contradicts Hobbes on human nature as selfish, and argues that our understanding of natural law develops from our understanding of nature, without the requirement that it be innate.
_	In 2014, Williams voted for the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; only five House members opposed the measure.
_	At present, freeway expansion has largely stalled in the United States, due to a multitude of factors that converged in the 1970s: higher due process requirements prior to taking of private property, increasing land values, increasing costs for construction materials, local opposition to new freeways in urban cores, the passage of the National Environmental Policy Act (which imposed the requirement that each new federally funded project must have an environmental impact statement or report) and falling gas tax revenues as a result of the nature of the flat-cent tax (it is not automatically adjusted for inflation), the tax revolt movement, and growing popular support for high-speed mass transit in lieu of new freeways.
_	The Ministry of Supply made clear in the requirement that the plane and missiles should be treated as a "weapon system" i.e., a cohesive whole.
_	The "Pharmacy and Drug Amendment Act", which passed with all-party support, changed the regulatory regime faced by pharmacies and eliminated the requirement that doctors' prescriptions include a precise amount to be prescribed, to allow pharmacists some discretion on the question.
_	These are the various aspects of the requirement that merit individual scrutiny in order to understand the entirely of a problem.
_	In 2014, Guinn supported the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	The Hermite or Pólya class is a set of entire functions satisfying the requirement that if "E(z)" is in the class, then:
_	The FDA, agreeing with the need to insure a vouchered and taxonomically validated reference is used, maintains the requirement that only validly authenticated standards be used to make regulatory decisions.
_	On December 5, 2017, Ion exercised an option to buy the WLWC license for $150,000; the deal was made possible by a change in FCC ownership rules that eliminated the requirement that there be at least eight owners of television stations in a market following the formation of a duopoly.
_	On 17 May 2005, all the parties in the Congress of Deputies, except the PP, passed the Government's motion giving approval to the beginning of peace talks with ETA, without making political concessions and with the requirement that it give up its weapons.
_	Additional unseen changes were related to Federal Emission Standards and the requirement that ALL 1971 cars run on unleaded regular grade gasoline.
_	Samuel Scheffler takes a different approach and amends the requirement that everyone be treated the same.
_	The only other restriction on equipment defined in the Laws of the Game is the requirement that a player "must not use equipment or wear anything that is dangerous to himself or another player".
_	The Commonwealth also argued that the requirement that an appropriation be "for the purposes of the Commonwealth" meant the purposes determined by the Parliament; in other words, that the Parliament's power to make laws appropriating money was unlimited.
_	As a consequence, the French rock scene in 2006–07 was seen by many as fresh and exciting, even though the requirement that forty per cent of songs broadcast on radio in France should be in French continued to militate against bands who wished to perform in English (which, because of its American origins and British dominance in the 1960s, has always been the prime language of rock 'n' roll).
_	Bartolucci was excused from the requirement that a cardinal be or become a bishop.
_	After the Roman Empire closed down the mint in Tyre, the Roman authorities allowed the Jewish rabbanim to continue minting Tyrian shekels in Palestine, but with the requirement that the coins should continue to bear the same image and text to avoid objections that the Jews were given autonomy.
_	These uses are still subject to the requirement that there be no consumer confusion as to source or sponsorship.
_	They can also "cheat" the requirement that they must be touching if they both hold a good conductor (such as holding a row of clothespins).
_	which is a corollary of the above definition of the boundary operator and the requirement that formula_12.
_	If done poorly it may fail the requirement that external functionality not be changed, introduce new bugs, or both.
_	Gardner said that he supported going even further than the current Washington and Oregon laws, to eventually permit lethal prescriptions for people whose suffering is unbearable without the requirement that the sufferer have a terminal condition.
_	Necessity is the requirement that at each instant, the evolution is "viable" (remains) in the "environment" K described by "viability constraints", a word encompassing polysemous concepts as "stability, confinement, homeostasis, adaptation", etc., expressing the idea that some variables must obey some constraints (representing physical, social, biological and economic constraints, etc.) that can never be violated.
_	Tribes retain their authority to conduct, license, and regulate class II gaming, provided it complies with the Act - including the requirement that the Tribal government adopt a gaming ordinance approved by the National Indian Gaming Commission (NIGC).
_	1939 legislation repealed the requirement that FDIC-insured banks join the Federal Reserve System.
_	To this, Asylum come to Rudimental and Amor with an album deal, but under the requirement that Amor dedicate his production efforts to all of Rudimental's work.
_	It is only for the purpose of finding formula_28 for this auxiliary point that the value of the function formula_1 must be an adequate correction to get closer to its own solution, and for that reason fulfill the requirement that formula_30 .
_	The difficulty of standardizing and supplying a third cartridge, as well as the political bramble the US would have to clamber through to force its approval on their NATO allies, led to the dropping of the requirement that the SAW be chambered in 6mm.
_	Arakaki v. State of Hawai'i, 314 F.3d 1091 (9th Cir. 2002), was a lawsuit challenging the requirement that candidates for election to the Office of Hawaiian Affairs board of trustees be Native Hawaiians.
_	The "Local Government Act, 1993" removed the requirement that the administrative head of a council be a "Town or Shire Clerk" and specified that the head was to be known as the "General Manager".
_	Despite the requirement that transfers of ownership must be in writing, courts have held that a nonexclusive license may be granted without a written instrument.
_	The ABA further sets forth additional requirements, including the requirement that the law library have a full-time director who holds a law degree and a degree in library or information science or equivalent with extensive experience in librarianship.
_	The tournament was the fifth year of El Dorado, after the DIMAYOR agreed the "Pacto de Lima" with the FIFA, with the requirement that the foreign players would return to their countries the next year.
_	The procedure for handing over the bombs added an extra ten minutes to the bombers' reaction time, and the requirement that US personnel had guardianship of the weapons at all times meant that neither they nor the bombers could be relocated to dispersal airfields as the RAF desired.
_	Initial challenges for the trophy met with futility – a large factor in this lack of success was the requirement that the Western champion travel to the East to compete in the championship game, but the main reason was that clubs in the larger Eastern markets were able to make the transition from amateur to professional status more quickly.
_	Section 507 modified the sanction for transporting hazardous materials by removing the requirement that the person have knowledge of the regulation related to the transportation of hazardous materials.
_	For example, some authors require that an attractor have positive measure (preventing a point from being an attractor), others relax the requirement that "B"("A") be a neighborhood.
_	In particular, it led to the requirement that a minimum visibility must be reported as available before the aircraft may commence an approach – a concept that had not existed previously.
_	The purchaser/seller requirement is the requirement that, to bring an action under 10b-5, a private plaintiff must be either a buyer or a seller of the company's stock.
_	The fiber product of stacks is defined using the usual universal property, and changing the requirement that diagrams commute to the requirement that they 2-commute.
_	These include the requirement that graves be dug by hand and that the digging be done by members of the community not immediately connected with the deceased.
_	In 1884, when women in Canada became eligible to vote for school board members − based on the requirement that they were mothers − they were then allowed to run for school board positions in 1889.
_	Bidtopia later allowed other sellers with online business experience into their marketplace, and added the requirement that seller accounts and bidder accounts be mutually exclusive, as their needs and desires are vastly different.
_	The king also established scholarships for the sons of Irish exiles, without the requirement that they study for the priesthood.
_	Thus, a beneficiary of a successful National Interest Waiver petition is exempt from the requirement that his or her employer first obtain a Labor Certification from the U.S. Department of Labor.
_	However, the censors' prime demand was the requirement that "Gustavo III" be set elsewhere than in Europe.
_	This structure does not meet the requirement that Weak Start imposes on it ("i.e." elements high on the prosodic hierarchy need to be preceded by elements that are equal or lower on the hierarchy).
_	Attached to their donation was the requirement that their nephew, I. N. Phelps Stokes, the author of "The Iconography of Manhattan Island", design the building.
_	Since Hurricane Katrina, Mississippi has removed the requirement that casinos on the Gulf Coast operate on barges and now allows them on land along the shoreline.
_	The Congress, via Section 4, included in the text of the proposed amendment the requirement that ratification by three-fourths (38) of the states be completed within seven years following its passage by the Congress (i.e., August 22, 1985) in order for the proposed amendment to become part of the Constitution.
_	The usage calls attention to the requirement that, if most software is loaded onto a computer by other software already running on the computer, some mechanism must exist to load the initial software onto the computer.
_	This action fulfills the requirement that the balls lie in the plane that bisects the angle of drive.
_	It gives its approval subject to the requirement that the parties sell an ABS production site in Tarragona, Spain.
_	Article XIV of the Massachusetts Declaration of Rights, written by John Adams and enacted in 1780 as part of the Massachusetts Constitution, added the requirement that all searches must be "reasonable," and served as another basis for the language of the Fourth Amendment:
_	Mathematically, this can be stated as the requirement that formula_56 except for case formula_57.
_	Tucker also opposed state protection of the 'banking monopoly' – the requirement that one must obtain a charter to engage in the business of banking.
_	On 15 May 1920, the Army Engineering Division sought bids for the construction of a bomber based on Barling's sketches, with the requirement that it be capable of carrying a bomb load, to an altitude of at a speed of no less than .
_	If, in the definition of a deformation retraction, we add the requirement that
_	One of the main points of contention in the conference committee was the requirement that D.C. build its freeways and bridges.
_	This included the emphasis on establishing whether witches’ gatherings had taken place; the requirement that witches’ entire statements be recorded with all the contradictions and consideration of motives, and if the accused had been exposed to violence or coercion; insistence on proof from outside witnesses and acceptance of revocation of statements; the stipulation that no person should be sentenced solely on the basis of witches’ denunciations; and insistence that public discussion of witchcraft should be forbidden.
_	The bill would eliminate the requirement that the United States Secretary of Education make publicly available on the College Navigator website: (1) college affordability and transparency lists, and (2) state higher education spending charts.
_	For example, they demand "Vyapti" - the requirement that the "hetu" (reason) must necessarily and separately account for the inference in "all" cases, in both "sapaksha" and "vipaksha".
_	Certain kinds of evidence, such as documentary evidence, are subject to the requirement that the offeror provide the trial judge with a certain amount of evidence (which need not be much and it need not be very strong) suggesting that the offered item of tangible evidence (e.g., a document, a gun) is what the offeror claims it is.
_	One specific example was the requirement that post-colonial societies were made to form nation-states (in the Western tradition), which often created arbitrary boundaries and borders that did not necessarily represent a whole nation, people, or culture, and are often the cause of international conflicts and friction even to this day.
_	This might make Easter fall outside its canonical limits due to the requirement that the Easter full moon follow the equinox.
_	Combining the above two equations with the requirement that they be valid at any temperature yields two relationships between the Einstein coefficients:
_	In 2014, Badon voted for the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; only five House members opposed the measure.
_	This included the requirement that, in translations of the liturgical texts from the official Latin originals, "the original text, insofar as possible, must be translated integrally and in the most exact manner, without omissions or additions in terms of their content, and without paraphrases or glosses.
_	The government seeks to end a 20-day limit on family detention and to end the requirement that children be held in day care centers that are state-licensed.
_	This trend appears to be attributable to the relative stability of the exchange rate since the introduction of the new currency, administrative measures aimed at promoting its use, such as the requirement that shopkeepers must price goods in afghani.
_	Duty-free shops (or stores) are retail outlets that are exempt from the payment of certain local or national taxes and duties, on the requirement that the goods sold will be sold to travelers who will take them out of the country.
_	An affine reflection group is a discrete subgroup of the affine group of "E" that is generated by a set of "affine reflections" of "E" (without the requirement that the reflection hyperplanes pass through the origin).
_	As of 2014, patronage of establishments on Cornwall Island by US residents continues to be sharply curtailed by the requirement that US residents proceed directly to the Canadian customs office north of the river.
_	With the requirement that top class hockey be played on artificial surfaces the first privately owned artificial hockey pitch was laid at Auchenhowie in 1994 providing unrivalled facilities to Western players and contributing significantly to the improvement of playing standards throughout the club.
_	Now, since formula_125 is a left formula_125-module over itself, the above tensor product carries a left module structure over the larger algebra formula_125, uniquely determined by the requirement that
_	This argument was rejected; the court said that the patent granted for the invention did not specify the use of Roundup as part of the invention, and thus there was no basis for introducing the requirement that Roundup had to be used in order for the invention to be used.
_	The administration of legacy and succession duties was integrated in 1881, with the requirement that no probate or letters of administration would be granted by the Court if a court officer cannot certify that an affidavit has been filed stating the estate's value and stamped where liability for duty is shown.
_	Nevertheless, in 1837, a single schoolhouse rose, with the requirement that there be a classroom for each of the two classes: the big Protestant one and the smaller Catholic one.
_	Additionally, an amendment to the AHCA would allow states to waive the requirement that insurers not charge those with pre-existing conditions higher premiums.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	First, the requirement that "φ" be continuously differentiable can be replaced by the weaker assumption that "φ" be merely differentiable and have a continuous inverse .
_	Alternatively, the requirement that Det(Dφ)≠0 can be eliminated by applying Sard's theorem .
_	Thus, just as hexagons have angles not less than 120° and cannot be used as the faces of a convex regular polyhedron because such a construction would not meet the requirement that at least three faces meet at a vertex and leave a positive defect for folding in three dimensions, icosahedra cannot be used as the cells of a convex regular polychoron because, similarly, at least three cells must meet at an edge and leave a positive defect for folding in four dimensions (in general for a convex polytope in "n" dimensions, at least three facets must meet at a peak and leave a positive defect for folding in "n"-space).
_	The proposed CHPE project has applied to the U.S. Department of Energy for a Presidential Permit, and to the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers for permits issued pursuant to the federal Clean Water Act and Rivers and Harbors Act, and hence, is subject to the requirement that an Environmental Impact Statement (EIS) be prepared.
_	In 1895, tasked with improving the dismal acoustical performance of the Fogg Museum's lecture hall, Sabine carried out a series of nocturnal experiments there, using hundreds of seat cushions borrowed from nearby Sanders as sound-absorbent materialeach night's work being limited by the requirement that the cushions be back in Sanders in time for morning lectures there.
_	All of this can be handled by the requirement that items are declared before they are used.
_	These aspects would include: the use of roving wiretaps, secret record searches, detention and deportation of noncitizens, monitoring of religious institutions and the requirement that airport baggage screeners be U.S. citizens.
_	Disadvantages of a gasoline-powered string trimmer include its greater weight and the significant vibration that carries throughout the device, both of which interfere with its maneuverability and contribute to muscle fatigue, as well as the requirement that motor oil be added to its fuel (if it is equipped with a two-stroke engine).
_	Noteworthy features of criminal law in China include the requirement that crimes and criminal sanctions may only be governed by national laws (as opposed to provincial laws or ministerial regulations).
_	Symbols have a corresponding alternation, replacing "rings" with "holes" in a Coxeter diagram and "h" prefix standing for "half", construction limited by the requirement that neighboring branches must be even-ordered and cuts the symmetry order in half.
_	This continues with subsequent functions with the requirement that the new function not be correlated with any of the previous functions.
_	A signature characteristic of the AGS-sponsored exploration was the requirement that its expeditions produce tangible scientific results.
_	Congress passed the 'Reclamation Reform Act of 1982', which increased allowable irrigated land to 960 acres (3.9 km²) and struck the requirement that west side landowners remain near their lands.
_	A significant aspect of the "Keith v. Volpe" Consent Decree was the requirement that the housing removed to construct the freeway be replaced, leading to the creation of the Century Freeway Housing Program within the California Department of Housing and Community Development.
_	Shul accepts non-Jews as voting members, with the requirement that members of the Leadership Team be Jewish (by birth or conversion).
_	The theorem was proved by , and showed that the requirement that formula_2 be strongly continuous can be relaxed to say that it is merely weakly measurable, at least when the Hilbert space is separable.
_	The insertion of the leap month mentioned above is based on the requirement that Passover—the festival celebrating the Exodus from Egypt, which took place in the spring—always occurs in the [northern hemisphere's] spring season.
_	Due to the requirement that the by-election must be held with at least 33 days' notice, the date set for polling day was the earliest possible day for holding it: 19 September.
_	The Ministry of Supply made clear in the requirement that the plane and missiles should be treated as a "weapon system" i.e., a cohesive whole.
_	The situation is complicated by the requirement that players play Failure cards in clockwise order, with each player having only one opportunity to play cards.
_	She voted against the requirement that companies must give public notice of proposed hydraulic fracking.
_	With respect to the requirement that Catholics practice abstinence on certain days, that is, refrain from eating meat, Arns told the poor that on such a day "if they can find meat to eat, which is rare, they should eat it, and do some good work to mark the day, because not eating meat is not the point."
_	She took the case to federal court pro se, and Judge Eugene Nickerson ruled the requirement that the petitioner live in the district was irrational.
_	A unitary representation of such a Lie algebra is a Z graded Hilbert space which is a representation of a Lie superalgebra as above together with the requirement that self-adjoint elements of the Lie superalgebra are represented by Hermitian transformations.
_	In addition, senior officials determined that the operation would be conducted consistent with applicable law of war principles, including the cardinal principles of (1) necessity – the requirement that the target have definite military value; (2) distinction – the idea that only military objectives may be intentionally targeted and that civilians are protected from being intentionally targeted; (3) proportionality – the notion that the anticipated collateral damage of an action cannot be excessive in relation to the anticipated concrete and direct military advantage; and (4) humanity – a principle that requires us to use weapons that will not inflict unnecessary suffering.
_	This can be translated into the requirement that the length scale formula_13 in the formula_10 direction satisfies:
_	Following complaints about the requirement that dancers qualify for the Championships, An Coimisiún decided to open the 1984 Worlds in Cork City to all dancers, with no qualification required.
_	In 1918 Roman Catholic schools were brought into the state system, but retained their distinct religious character, access to schools by priests and the requirement that school staff be acceptable to the Church.
_	Similar boilers and engines were proposed by him and accepted for a corvette for the British navy, but owing to the impossibility of complying with the requirement that the tops of the boilers should be at least one foot below the load-line, the adoption of the water-tube boiler was deferred.
_	This removes the requirement that the runner already on first must advance to second base; he cannot be forced out by a defensive player holding the ball while touching second base, and the runner can try to escape from a rundown by returning to first base.
_	Like the two differing genealogies, the infancy narratives appear only in Matthew and Luke and take different approaches to reconciling the requirement that the Messiah be born in Bethlehem with the tradition that Jesus in fact came from Nazareth.
_	In particular, the requirement that the EPA determine that the chemical "may present an unreasonable risk" creates a regulatory Catch-22 as such a determination requires much of the very data that the EPA cannot access or cause to be generated without first making the determination.
_	[When it was finally accepted for performances at the Teatro San Carlo in Naples on 30 September 1838, it was with the requirement that Pia not die.]
_	Multiple exchanges of cash by the same person were avoided by the requirement that currency would only be exchanged to anybody also handing in a specified ration stamp, previously issued in a different context, which had not yet been authorized for use.
_	One roadblock that the Lake Chelan AVA petition encountered (which also affected the Calistoga AVA petition) was the requirement that any winery with a name similar to or containing that of the AVA must source at least 85% of their grapes from that AVA.
_	The McGovern Commission, which had set out to reform the Presidential nomination process in order to avoid a repeat of the 1968 Convention, eventually issued its recommendations, including the requirement that all delegates be directly elected by the people, eviscerating the power of political bosses to control the nomination process.
_	During the Meiji period an edict was passed in 1871 abolishing the requirement that "daishō" be worn by samurai, and in 1876 wearing swords in public by most of Japan's population was banned; thus ended the use of the "daishō" as the symbol of the samurai.
_	The Bakers sold the Baker Ranch to Occidental Petroleum in 1969 for $11 million with the requirement that the new owners donate the Serrano Adobe to a public agency for preservation.
_	Digital must-carry (also incorrectly called "dual must-carry") is the requirement that cable companies carry either the analog (over a hybrid analog/digital cable system) or digital (over a digital-only pay television system like AT&T U-verse or Verizon FiOS) signal.
_	The teachers union sued the school district challenging the requirement that teachers must reapply for their jobs.
_	A referendum law was passed on 27 November 2003 and signed by President Chen Shui-bian on 31 December 2003, but the law sets high standards for referendums such as the requirement that they can only be called by the President in times of imminent attack.
_	Some of the items passed by the advisory commission included the requirement that lobbyists register with the city of Dallas, a limit to the amount of campaign contributions that came from developers, the disclosure of gifts to council members over $50, and two city council members were now required to “second” major zoning cases certifying they had reviewed the details of the case before the matter could be voted on.
_	This in turn allows to define the "thermodynamic state" of a multi-dimensional ergodic mechanical system, without the requirement that the system be composed of a large number of degrees of freedom.
_	A third generalization is the semigroupoid, in which the requirement that the binary relation be total is lifted.
_	The crisis over the 'madness' of King George III produced a major strain in Anglo-Irish relations, as of the King's parliaments in both of his kingdoms possessed the theoretical right to nominate a regent, without the requirement that they choose the same person.
_	At least one more criterion is needed to uniquely specify the analogy, such as the requirement that impedance is equivalent in all domains as is done in the impedance analogy.
_	Notaries must be United States citizens (though the requirement that a notary public must be a United States citizen is unconstitutional; see "Bernal v. Fainter"), or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence; be able to read and write the English language; be residents of (or employed within) the State of Illinois for at least 30 days; be at least 18 years old; not be convicted of a felony; and not had a notary commission revoked or suspended during the past 10 years.
_	This theorem schema is itself a restricted form of comprehension, which avoids Russell's paradox because of the requirement that "C" be a set.
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	In November 2011, Federal judge Richard Leon of the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia temporarily halted the new labels, likely delaying the requirement that tobacco companies display the labels.
_	A recent controversy surrounding the LSAT was the requirement that examinees submit to fingerprinting on the day of testing.
_	Because of time limitations, the king ordered that the requirement that each should show proof of being an Old Christian be waived.
_	Adding to the problem is the requirement that any constitutional amendment must be submitted for a statewide vote if it is not unanimously approved by the legislature.
_	The Electronic Frontier Foundation has stated that the requirement that any site must self-police user generated content would impose significant liability costs and explains "why venture capitalists have said en masse they won't invest in online startups if PIPA and SOPA pass".
_	When the role changed from one battalion to another, within each regiment, a small nucleus of specialized instructor-planners and riggers generally transferred over to the new battalion; however, the rest of the unit quickly undertook the requisite parachutist qualifications, generally with much enthusiasm; the requirement that parachutists be "volunteers" was rarely an issue in converting these tightly-knit infantry units.
_	The Appropriations Bill of 2001 provided an exception to the requirement that the owner plant vegetative cover when excessive rainfall or flooding made planting impossible and the Appropriations Bill of 2002 created a new pilot program for enrollment of wetland and buffer acreage in CRP [7].
_	Even though voluntary testing was available, people were discouraged from utilizing these services because of the requirement that those who tested positive be identified and reported to the MOHP.
_	The issues before the Supreme Court were whether the Dairy Plant could justify the termination on the basis the requirement that Christie work on Mondays is a "bona fide" occupational requirement under section 7(3) of the Act and, if not, whether it still open to the respondent to demonstrate it had accommodated the complainant's religious beliefs up to the point of undue hardship and if so, whether the Dairy Plant reasonably accommodated Christie's religious beliefs.
_	In 2005 finally, the application/mbox media type was standardized as RFC 4155, and hints that mbox stores mailbox messages in their original Internet Message (RFC 2822) format, except for the used newline character, seven-bit clean data storage, and the requirement that each newly added message is terminated with a completely empty line within the mbox database.
_	The SCA's order was referred to the Constitutional Court for confirmation, in compliance with the requirement that any court order declaring an Act of Parliament to be unconstitutional be confirmed by the Constitutional Court before it has effect.
_	It would also codifying the requirement that analysts have a “reasonable articulable suspicion” that a phone number is associated with terrorism to query the NSA phone records database; requiring that the FISA court promptly review each such determination; and limiting the retention period for phone records.
_	Representations of a finite group "G" are also linked directly to algebra representations via the group algebra F["G"], which is a vector space over F with the elements of "G" as a basis, equipped with the multiplication operation defined by the group operation, linearity, and the requirement that the group operation and scalar multiplication commute.
_	In 2005 the requirement that villages that wish to classify themselves as town must have a social and technical infrastructure, as well as a population of no fewer than 3500 people.
_	The "Local Government Act, 1993" removed the requirement that the administrative head of a council be a "Town or Shire Clerk" and specified that the head was to be known as the "General Manager".
_	If the requirement for the countable chain condition is replaced with the requirement that "R" contains a countable dense subset (i.e., "R" is a separable space) then the answer is indeed yes: any such set "R" is necessarily order-isomorphic to R (proved by Cantor).
_	Besides the requirement that all data be able to survive a 30 MPH barrier crash and be measured with defined precision, NHTSA also required that all manufacturers make their EDR data publicly available.
_	During the late 1950s, Nylint’s construction toys, while high-quality and realistic, moved away slightly from the requirement that the toy be a replica of real-world equipment.
_	That initiative was soon followed by the requirement that all Jewish children over the age of twelve wear white armbands with a blue Star of David imprinted for visual identification.
_	It is also possible to relax the requirement that the coordinates be integers, and assign coordinates in such a way that the "x"-coordinates of the vertices are distinct integers in the range [0,2"n" − 4] and the other two coordinates are real numbers in the range [0,1], so that each edge has length at least one while the overall polyhedron has volume O("n").
_	These are characterized by the requirement that all forces entering the observer's physical laws originate from identifiable sources caused by fields, such as electro-static field (caused by static electrical charges), electro-magnetic field (caused by moving charges), gravitational field (caused by mass), and so forth.
_	Most saliently, the requirement that trains be able to split within the tunnel and each part of the train be driven out to opposite ends has been removed.
_	The ability to vary the amount of electricity generated is often limited by the requirement that minimum or maximum flows downstream are satisfied.
_	Methodological individualism is the requirement that causal accounts of social phenomena explain how they result from the motivations and actions of individual agents, at least in principle.
_	Following the idea of expressing visual operation in terms of differential invariants computed at multiple scales using Gaussian derivative operators, we can express an edge detector from the set of points that satisfy the requirement that the gradient magnitude
_	Queensland's government also introduced stiffer regulations, among which was the requirement that captains and dive masters independently confirm each head count.
_	The line connecting C and C is fixed by the requirement that the formula_2 function be equal to the luminance function.
_	The requirement that the equal energy point be defined by puts a restriction on the line joining C and C, and finally, the requirement that the gamut fill the space puts a second restriction on this line to be very close to the gamut in the green region, which specifies the location of C and C.
_	McCrory then called a special legislative session for the purpose of repealing HB2; however, the NC Senate ultimately defeated the proposal after lawmakers learned Charlotte had not repealed the entire ordinance, even though Charlotte City Council voted again December 21 to correct the situation, also removing the requirement that the legislature also act.
_	Practical problems associated with uninformative priors include the requirement that the posterior distribution be proper.
_	However, consistency—the requirement that the finite difference method approximate the correct partial differential equation—is straightforward to verify, and stability is typically much easier to show than convergence (and would be needed in any event to show that round-off error will not destroy the computation).
_	The Faculty was established in 1947 to meet the requirement that the training of dental specialists involves the same academic discipline as that demanded for medicine and surgery.
_	The date came to be stamped on coins that were struck during the vacancies of the Holy See, occasionally at first, and later as a rule; it rarely appears on other coins before 1550; the practice became general in the seventeenth century, the year of the Christian era or that of the pontificate being used; and Gregory XVI established it by law, as also the requirement that each coin should bear upon it an expression of its value.
_	The dictator passed a law (the "Lex Hortensia"), which ended the requirement that the patrician senators must agree before any bill could be considered by the Plebeian Council.
_	One common law is the requirement that death and life rituals be separated.
_	However, the smaller primary pseudoperfect numbers 2, 6, 42, and 1806 do not correspond to solutions to Znám's problem in this way, as their sets of prime factors violate the requirement that no number in the set can equal one plus the product of the other numbers.
_	Brunnermeier and Pedersen model margin requirement and show how volatility of asset prices tightens the requirement that lead to asset sales.
_	For a continuous-time system, formula_78 is replaced by the flow formula_86, with "g" being the continuous parameter, with the requirement that a non-empty intersection hold for all formula_87.
_	There was a flurry of licence applications in 1836 when squatting was legalised and individual runs were set at a maximum of 16,000 acres with the requirement that licence fees be paid.
_	He then appealed to the Nevada Supreme Court, arguing that the requirement that he identify himself to any police officer upon request violated the Fourth Amendment prohibition on unreasonable searches and seizures and his Fifth Amendment rights against self-incrimination.
_	In Catalonia, the text "Princeps namque"' established the requirement that every man participate in the national defense in the event of external threat.
_	It also added the requirement that operators ensure that any third parties to whom a child's information is disclosed have reasonable procedures in place to protect the information.
_	While performing arrests in these clubs, police officers have seen girls text their pimps in order to beg for permission to leave the club, and the pimps respond stating the requirement that each girl must make $1,000 every night.
_	In "Lopez II", the Court reiterated its reasoning in "Katzenbach" and "Rome", and it upheld as constitutional the requirement that covered local governments obtain preclearance before implementing voting changes that their parent state required them to implement, even if the parent state was not itself a covered jurisdiction.
_	After an initially frosty meeting, Chris' conditions are agreed on, but with the requirement that he stay in place at Shorn through the end of the current conflict in Cambodia, in which Shorn is backing a rebel leader.
_	By April 2016, lawmakers appeared ready to "remove the requirement that certain F-117 aircraft be maintained in a condition that would allow recall of those aircraft to future service," which would move them from storage to the aerospace maintenance and regeneration yard in Arizona to be scavenged for hard-to-find parts, or completely disassembled.
_	Abandoning the requirement that rates be autocorrelated on a given DNA or RNA molecule allows extension of substitution matrix methods to the covarion model.
_	(The doctrine that reflects this is the requirement that an injunction can be given only when there is "no adequate remedy at law.")
_	If the requirement that the number of seminorms be countable is dropped, the algebra becomes locally convex (LC) or locally multiplicatively convex (LMC) .
_	In the administrative law context in the United States, the requirement that mandamus can be used only to compel a ministerial act has largely been abandoned.
_	On May 17, 2017 senators voted to remove the requirement that a caucus must be formed by senators who are members of a political party, making the ISG equal under the rules of the senate with the two partisan caucuses.
_	In 2014, Burns co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	Disadvantages of this design include the requirement that rotor tips seal very tightly on the outer housing wall and the mechanical losses suffered through friction between rapidly oscillating parts of irregular shape.
_	As the states codified the common laws of crimes [wrote specific criminal laws], even if enactments were silent on the subject" of intention, and omitted to include it in the code, the state courts assumed the omission did not mean the legislature meant to exclude the requirement that a jury find criminal intent.
_	That the cross-covariance and cross-correlation are independent of "t" is precisely the additional information (beyond being individually wide-sense stationary) conveyed by the requirement that formula_31 are "jointly" wide-sense stationary.
_	The site had originally been owned by the Croft family, who sold it to the parish councils of Stanstead Abbotts, Great Amwell and St Margarets with the requirement that it be used for sport and recreation.
_	Thus the test would be a subjective one, with the requirement that the beliefs be held reasonably.
_	In addition, Senator Nicholson added the requirement that Duke Power pay all costs of repairs during the lease as well as pay all costs of re-licensing with FERC in 1985.
_	However, on May 23, Federal District Judge Matthew Leitman issued an injunction placing Conyers back on the ballot, ruling that the requirement that circulators be registered voters was similar to an Ohio law previously found unconstitutional by a Federal appeals court in 2008.
_	Since "U" is unobserved, the requirement that "Z" be independent of "U" cannot be inferred from data and must instead be determined from the model structure, i.e., the data-generating process.
_	In 2014, Landry voted for the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; only five House members opposed the measure.
_	Hardy & Wright include in their definition the requirement that an arithmetical function "expresses some arithmetical property of "n"".
_	In calculus terms, the requirement that the optimal output have higher profit than adjacent output levels is that:
_	The sixty-ninth Legislature was the first Minnesota Legislature to sit after the repeal of the requirement that Minnesota legislators be chosen in legally nonpartisan elections.
_	The one concession to safety was the requirement that all competitors must start between 1 June and 31 October, in order to pass through the Southern Ocean in summer.
_	The majority of coursework was offered online, allowing students from across the U.S. to enroll with the requirement that they were present in-person for one week of the 11-week term.
_	The return speed of drilling fluid should reach the requirement that can wash away the debris and rock powder cut by the drill from the bottom of the hole in a timely manner, and reliably carry them to the earth surface.
_	Puritans were further dismayed when they learned that the bishops had decided to merge the vestarian controversy into the requirement that clergy subscribe to the Thirty-Nine Articles: at the time they swore their allegiance to the Thirty-Nine Articles, the bishops also required all clergymen to swear that the use of the Book of Common Prayer and the wearing of vestments are not contrary to Scripture.
_	According to one theorist, the requirement that individual citizen-soldiers provide their own equipment for fighting helped to explain why Western cities evolved the concept of citizenship, while Eastern ones generally did not.
_	In practice, other clauses take precedence, including the requirement that citizens follow a socialist way of life.
_	However, the requirement that students pass either the Keystone exams in Literature, Biology and Algebra or an equivalent project-based assessment has now been delayed until the 2018-2019 school year.
_	The Keating model is the result of a general method proposed to ensure that the elastic strain energy satisfies the requirement that it is invariant under a simple rotation of the crystal, without deformation.
_	As of December the European Court of Human Rights had not ruled on a 2003 complaint by the Jehovah's Witnesses challenging the legality of the requirement that a group must exist for 10 years in the country before it can be recognized by the government.
_	The Yaphank option was rejected because of the high cost of electrification and the requirement that station between Ronkonkoma and Yaphank receive upgrades.
_	This "de facto" adoption foregoes the requirement that a child be a minor because of the assumption that the adoptee was not adopted while he / she was a minor simply because the adopter failed to do so.
_	The rules do not constrain how the defence may arrange itself (other than the requirement that they must remain one yard behind the line of scrimmage until the play starts).
_	A staunch critic of the Reid technique of interrogation, and a vocal advocate for the requirement that all interrogations be videotaped, Kassin is best known for pioneering the scientific study of false confessions.
_	In 2014, Guillory supported the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics.
_	In the House of Lords in 2000 on the subject of the Britain's National Health Service, remarking that "We are all trapped in a marvellously pure ideology, the ideal socialist dream", she advocated removing the requirement that the NHS be free at the point of use, replacing it with "an NHS insurance premium", and that "allowances could be made for those with private insurance and private expertise could be used".
_	In linear algebra, the nonnegative rank of a nonnegative matrix is a concept similar to the usual linear rank of a real matrix, but adding the requirement that certain coefficients and entries of vectors/matrices have to be nonnegative.
_	According to India's Ministry of Environment & Forests, the Teesta river dam projects have been approved with the requirement that they adopt suitable seismic coefficient in the design for the dam, tunnel, surge shaft and power house.
_	Some effects of the law have been softened by equity, for example the requirement that all contracts for sale of land be evidenced in writing can be circumvented by reliance on the doctrine of part performance.
_	A mariner turned planter, Durant was one of the ablest and most influential men in the county and a leader of the 1677 Culpeper's Rebellion, an uprising over the requirement that all colonial goods be transported in British ships.
_	The creation of paper currency subsequent to the 1854 contract did not alleviate Willard of the requirement that the down payment be made in "cash" (e.g., gold coin), Field held.
_	Residential housing, influenced by the requirement that homes provide housing for students, added to the charm of this typical southern community.
_	Relaxing the requirement that every formula be either true or false yields the weaker paraconsistent logic commonly known as first-degree entailment (FDE).
_	The concept stipulated for a vehicle fulfilling several requirements, like maximum speed over , weight below , fuel consumption not exceeding at the average speed of on a level road, but also notably the requirement that the car would not break down or require significant repairs for at least .
_	However some differences are necessitated by the much larger size of the transparencies used (generally the size of a printed page), and the requirement that the transparency be placed face up (and readable to the presenter).
_	Then, in 1978, the requirement that privately owned buildings contain at least six dwelling units was removed.
_	In a finite probability model, for objective probabilities formula_7 and risk-neutral probabilities formula_8 then one must minimise the Kullback–Leibler divergence formula_9 subject to the requirement that the expected return is formula_10, where formula_10 is the risk-free rate.
_	In August 1992, Greyhound canceled its bus terminal license (BTL) agreements with other carriers at 200 terminals, and imposed the requirement that Greyhound be the sole-seller of the tenant's bus tickets within a 25-mile radius of such a Greyhound terminal.
_	Hewitt argued against adding the requirement that messages must arrive in the order in which they are sent to the Actor.
_	When Modest Tchaikovsky died in 1916, he willed the house to the Moscow Department of the Russian Musical Society, with the requirement that it strictly follow the rules of the Mozart Museum in Salzburg and the Beethoven Museum in Bonn.
_	The list includes ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that incumbent members recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	This appears to be done to circumvent the requirement that the consent of the FEBC has to be obtained if Life B-P Church is to allow third parties the use of the Gilstead Road premises under the Scheme set up by the High Court to regulate the use and maintenance of the premises between FEBC and Life B-P Church.
_	One of Arpaio's public relations actions was the requirement that inmates wear pink underwear in order to prevent its theft by the released inmates.
_	In more axiomatic definitions one can find the requirement that formula_13
_	First, the requirement that formula_14 be a primitive element of formula_15 can be relaxed.
_	The Osgoode Hall Law School moved from a downtown location to the York campus in 1969, following the requirement that every law school affiliate with a university.
_	In 1918 Roman Catholic schools were brought into the system, but retained their distinct religious character, access to schools by priests and the requirement that school staff be acceptable to the Church.
_	He said that the requirement that people be removed "as soon as reasonably practicable" was directed at limiting the duration of detention to as little as necessary, but it did "not mean that the detention... is limited to a maximum period expiring when it is impracticable to remove or deport the person."
_	To admit Worcester to the National League, the league's board of directors waived the requirement that league cities have a population of at least 75,000 (Worcester's population was 58,000).
_	The Postal Service report supports the requirement that the PRC is to consult with and solicit written comments from the Postal Service.
_	This is in addition to the requirement that all sellers from the United Kingdom have to offer PayPal.
_	Second, the requirement that the taxpayer must sleep away from home in order to qualify for a § 162(a)(2) deduction is a bright-line, easy to administer rule that avoids unnecessary litigation.
_	Proximate cause includes the requirement that the dram shop must have been able to foresee that its actions could cause injuries to third parties, but this is true for any establishment that serves (sells) alcohol.
_	Nominally-typed languages typically enforce the requirement that declared subtypes be structurally compatible (though Eiffel allows non-compatible subtypes to be declared).
_	In 2014, Morris supported the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	The Parliament Act 1911 introduced the requirement that elections in all parliamentary constituencies be held on the same day.
_	In 2014, Carmody co-sponsored the requirement that abortion providers have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; the bill was approved by the full House, 88-5.
_	He opposed the requirement that companies must give notice when they engage in hydraulic fracking.
_	Valence wavefunctions tend to have rapid oscillations near ion cores due to the requirement that they be orthogonal to core states; this situation is problematic because it requires many Fourier components (or in the case of grid-based methods, a very fine mesh) to describe the wavefunctions accurately.
_	In 2007 the High Court held in Roach v Electoral Commissioner that the requirement that members be ""directly chosen by the people"" conferred a limited "right to vote".
_	The list includes Ministerial by-elections which occurred due to the requirement that Members of Parliament recontest their seats upon being appointed to Cabinet.
_	After its reactivation in 1999, the NJNM was integrated into the New Jersey State Guard in a way which would allow the state allow large numbers of civilian volunteers into its naval militia while still technically meeting the requirement that 95% of a naval militia be composed of navy, marine, and coast guard reservists in order to receive federal aid.
_	Building the Flatiron was made feasible by a change to New York City's building codes in 1892, which eliminated the requirement that masonry be used for fireproofing considerations.
_	Previously courts have held that statements made under statutory compulsion do not fall foul of the requirement that statements be free of undue influence.
_	In 2016 the requirement that grocery stores not sell beer nor wine was disbanded through a vote, and in 2017, the prohibition against alcohol in restaurants and on sales of other alcohol was disbanded though the complete dissolution of the 1912 ordinance; the latter was by a vote with 60% in favor.
_	When MMORPG rules address the subject, the most common regulation provides that a player can only have one account from an IP address logged on at once; in the text-based early years of online role-playing gaming, some multi-user dungeons (MUDs) would set slightly looser limits, such as permitting a maximum of two simultaneously active accounts per human user ("e.g.", a fighter/"tank" and a healer) subject to the requirement that both be actively controlled by the human as opposed to by a script.
_	The Branch Davidians differed from the original Davidians in several areas, such as the requirement that the Feast days must be kept and that the Holy Spirit is a female being.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give public notice of proposed hydraulic fracking.
_	The Suspending the Individual Mandate Penalty Law Equals Fairness Act () is a bill that would delay for one year the imposition of penalties associated with the requirement that most residents of the United States have health insurance coverage beginning in 2014.
_	The last assumption recognized the requirement that if a wave was to maintain a fixed direction of propagation and a fixed direction of vibration, the reaction must not be outside the plane of those two directions.
_	Section 1461, Harlan noted, did not require scienter (knowledge of wrongdoing), and to impose the requirement that publisher investigate every advertiser in their pages would impose an unconstitutional chilling effect on free speech.
_	TDK became an independent body in 1951, with the lifting of the requirement that it should be presided over by the Minister of Education.
_	17 months later, over 110,000 signatures were collected, exceeding the requirement that 100,000 signatures must be collected within 18 months for an initiative to be valid.
_	They often face high tuition fees, due to the requirement that students have been employed and paying taxes in three out of the five preceding years to qualify for reduced European Union tuition rates.
_	Notaries must be United States citizens (though the requirement that a notary public must be a United States citizen is unconstitutional; see "Bernal v. Fainter"), or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence; be able to read and write the English language; be residents of (or employed within) the State of Illinois for at least 30 days; be at least 18 years old; not be convicted of a felony; and not had a notary commission revoked or suspended during the past 10 years.
_	In the United Kingdom, the Renewable Transport Fuel Obligation (RTFO) (announced 2005) is the requirement that by 2010 5% of all road vehicle fuel is renewable.
_	Writing from Paris on 24 June 1935, she acceded to the requirement that she renounce sedetionist activities.
_	In computer science, mutual exclusion is a property of concurrency control, which is instituted for the purpose of preventing race conditions; it is the requirement that one thread of execution never enter its critical section at the same time that another concurrent thread of execution enters its own critical section.
_	Furthermore, due to the lengthwise installation of the five-cylinder engine, and the requirement that the overall length of the car comply with Japanese government regulations concerning cars classified as "compact", compromises were made with regards to rear passenger accommodations, and sales suffered as a result.
_	This amounts to saying that between formula_14 and formula_15 the control formula_1 is determined by the requirement that the singularity condition continues to hold.
_	Hortensius, a Plebeian, passed a law called the "Hortensian Law" ("Lex Hortensia"), which ended the requirement that an "auctoritas patrum" be passed before any bill could be considered by either the Plebeian Council or the Tribal Assembly.
_	To meet the requirement that design strength be higher than maximum loads, building codes prescribe that, for structural design, loads are increased by load factors.
_	In the language of differential geometry, the requirement that the components of a vector transform according to the same matrix of the coordinate transition is equivalent to defining a "contravariant vector" to be a tensor of contravariant rank one.
_	It found that Reynolds had failed to meet the requirement that he, as challenger of a juror's objectivity, demonstrate that a juror had developed a real and strong opinion.
_	He was convicted in this trial on 26 October 2007, and given a life sentence, with the requirement that he serve at least twenty-two years.
_	In 1996, the Republican-controlled Ohio General Assembly passed a law that struck the requirement that the Ohio state government invest solely in bonds.
_	The Orléanist stand is that the laws of succession could be altered, and that among those customs and precedents is the requirement that the heir must be French.
_	This led to the requirement that the TSR-2 must be able to carry four WE.177As, two internally and two on external underwing stores pylons—the width of the TSR-2 bomb bay (originally designed to accommodate a single Red Beard weapon) necessitating the reduction in diameter of the WE.177A to , the bomb's width and fin span being constrained by the need to fit two WE.177 bombs side-by-side in the aircraft's bomb bay.
_	Because of the traditional hostility to reservation, apart from the requirement that the Communion continues to be celebrated 'regularly' in each parish church, the instruction is that "the consecrated bread and wine to be brought to the church from the celebration of Holy Communion in a seemly and dignified manner" implying that the service will have taken place in another church but on the same day.
_	The same day, he decertified all government employee unions by executive order, removing the requirement that state employees pay union dues by rescinding a mandate created by Governor Evan Bayh in a 1989 executive order.
_	Although her birth was registered as 'Cherie', owing to her maternal grandmother's influence she was christened 'Theresa Cara' in deference to the requirement that she be given a saint's name.
_	When the California State College System was established following the development of the Master Plan for Higher Education in California in 1961, both the requirement that all students complete a core general education program firmly based in the liberal arts and the principle of collegial governance in the development of academic policies that were pioneered by Langsdorf at Fullerton became system-wide cornerstones.
_	However, their efforts were stymied in late December 1993 when the United States Olympic Committee denied a request for a waiver to the requirement that athletes be citizens by the national championships.
_	Restrictions on closed shops include the requirement that workers are not compelled to be trade union members before obtaining employment, and that dues collected from employees are only used to "advance or protect the socio-economic interests of workers."
_	Thirty years later, an elderly Dulce is released from jail—under the requirement that she serve the rest of her sentence under house arrest in the very house where the murders took place.
_	If "P" also has a greatest element Î (so that it is a bounded poset), then the previous condition can be simplified to the requirement that all maximal chains in "P" have the same (finite) length.
_	Semi-automatic versions (of which very few were made) have a silver-brazed flash hider to comply with the requirement that Title I firearms have a 16" barrel.
_	For the range , different design decisions have been proposed to the IETF, trading the non-uniqueness for the requirement that the range be managed by a central allocation authority.
_	In 19th century Britain, treason had its own special rules of evidence and procedure, which made it difficult to prosecute traitors successfully, such as the requirement that the prosecution produce two witnesses to the same overt act, or that three judges preside at the trial.
_	Recently on February 1, 2011, the EPA/DOE added the requirement that all products registered under the Energy Star service mark, must be tested by an AB (Accredited Body) or CB (Certification Body) Laboratory.
_	Finally, he stated that the requirement that state regulatory plans be submitted for approval does not indicate that an area is preempted.
_	Alan Hartman solves a problem of this type with the requirement that no trio walks in a row of four more than once using Steiner quadruple systems.
_	Disputes in negotiations have included the cost of the channel and the requirement that SportsNet LA be carried with other mainstream premium channels rather than in a separate sports tier or on an "a la carte" basis.
_	Paul granted a dispensation from the requirement that all cardinals be bishops to Henri de Lubac, the first such dispensation since Pope John XXIII established the rule in 1962.
_	The same Act introduced the requirement that a person selling airguns or ammunition for airguns by way of trade or business be a Registered Firearms Dealer.
_	He supported the requirement that crimes based on sexual orientation should be prosecuted as federal hate crimes.
_	Some clauses, particularly the requirement that all MP's hold bachelor's degrees, the party list system, the Constitutional Court, and decentralisation provoked strong criticism, particularly from smaller parties.
_	However, this power was itself balanced with the requirement that the Court could only invalidate legislation if it was "unconstitutional".
_	In 2014, Smith did not vote on the requirement that abortion providers to have hospital admitting privileges near their clinics; only five House members opposed the measure.
_	Of secondary concern, especially to the USA and other countries outside the EU, was the requirement that certification can only be conducted by European certifiers.
_	Ticker created an alternate definition for a hold, removing the requirement that a pitcher needs to make an out in order to record a hold.
_	In addition in 1988 it established the requirement that facilities must report any materials that had leakages, even of unconfirmed substances, as hazardous materials until testing could further distinguish, and thus should be treated as such.
_	Early negotiations for subsidy came with the requirement that former union employees be made an offer for work at their current salary and benefit levels.
_	The quantity of the public good satisfies the requirement that the aggregate marginal benefit equals the marginal cost of providing the good.
_	An additional restriction on car ownership is the requirement that motor vehicles more than ten years old, known as 'time expired' vehicles, must be either renew the COE for either 5 or 10 years or de-register the vehicle for scrapping or exporting from Singapore, usually to neighbouring countries.
_	This technology overcomes the requirement that online broadcasters transmit a duplicate copy of each video stream to every viewer.
_	The method combined widespread testing and treatment with door-to-door education in hygiene and an emphasis on public health efforts such as the building of hygienic privies at schools and churches and the requirement that children wear shoes to school.
_	Public school teachers in Detroit had sought to overturn the requirement that they pay fees equivalent to union dues on the grounds that they opposed public sector collective bargaining and objected to the ideological activities of the union.
_	Aikin's case for epistemic infinitism, developed in Epistemology and the Regress Problem, holds that given the requirement that all reasons must have backing, the only options for rational belief are either skepticism or infinite, non-repeating chains of justifying reasons.
_	Since formula_82 is generated by elements of formula_1, the map formula_84 must be uniquely determined by the requirement that
_	Many people who espouse Catholicism reject certain orthodox tenets such as the requirement that clergy be male-only and the prohibition of divorce while strict Catholics question how a person can claim to be Roman Catholic while ignoring or denying aspects of Catholic dogma and praxis.
_	Subsequent to the accident, the Federal Aviation Agency (FAA) discontinued the requirement that Boeing 707 aircraft make actual landings with simulated failure of 50 percent of the power units concentrated on one side of the aircraft during training flights, type ratings, and proficiency checks.
_	A policy was adopted regarding the extent of the requirement that arose in wars that the Muslims had to fight.
_	The assembly also repealed the requirement that new cities must be at least from existing cities, because the new city limits border both Roswell and Atlanta.
_	He signed a two-and-a-half year contract for an undisclosed fee, believed to be around £30,000 plus add-ons, including the requirement that Derby play a pre-season friendly with Nuneaton in the summer.
_	For four or more points on the same circle (e.g., the vertices of a rectangle) the Delaunay triangulation is not unique: each of the two possible triangulations that split the quadrangle into two triangles satisfies the "Delaunay condition", i.e., the requirement that the circumcircles of all triangles have empty interiors.
_	However, the requirement that taxa be monophyletic – rather than paraphyletic as in the case of the Corvida – is itself part of the cladistic view of Taxonomy, not necessarily followed to an absolute degree by other schools.
_	During her term at the university, Massaquoi succeeded in overcoming the requirement that students should adopt foreign names rather than keeping those of their indigenous families.
_	By contrast, in an inquisitiorial system, the fact that the defendant has confessed is merely one more fact that is entered into evidence, and a confession by the defendant does not remove the requirement that the prosecution present a full case.
_	The most important change was the requirement that all new drug applications demonstrate "substantial evidence" of the drug's efficacy for a marketed indication, in addition to the existing requirement for pre-marketing demonstration of safety.
_	Other important provisions of the 1962 amendments included the requirement that drug companies use the "established" or "generic" name of a drug along with the trade name, the restriction of drug advertising to FDA-approved indications, and expansion of FDA powers to inspect drug manufacturing facilities.
_	Havens must satisfy a consistency property (corresponding to the requirement that the robber cannot move through vertices on which police have already landed): if "X" is a subset of "Y", and both "X" and "Y" are valid sets of locations for the given set of police, then β("X") must be a superset of β("Y").
_	The effect that a vote for a party might result in the loss of a seat is contrary to the requirement that every vote in a democratic election should have the same weight.
_	It also violates the requirement that the vote may not explicitly run counter to the intention of the voter.
_	Amongst other stipulations, he demanded the right to choose his own subject, his own librettist, and also to pay him directly, as well as refusing to accept the requirement that a full orchestral score be available in advance.
_	On September 29, 2006, Governor Schwarzenegger signed the State Income Tax Equity Act, a bill that establishes the requirement that couples registered as California domestic partners file their state income taxes as married couples.
_	The court held further, with respect to the requirement that the possession upon which reliance was placed had to have been lawfully acquired, that this caused a further problem for the insurance company:
_	Here, the admonition not to "add apples and oranges" refers to the requirement that two quantities with different units may not be combined by addition, although they may always be combined in ratio form by multiplication, so that multiplying ratios of apples and oranges is allowed.
_	He also had doubts about the requirement that complaints reach the office through members of parliament and considered the viability of a mechanism where complainants could contact the Office directly if they were dissatisfied with the progress made by the Member of Parliament in attending to the grievance.
_	In addition to these changes, WIA enacted changes that included universal access to services (i.e., available to any individual regardless of age or employment status), a demand driven workforce system responsive to the demands of local area employers (e.g., the requirement that a majority of WIB members must be representatives of business), a work-first approach to workforce development (i.e., placement in employment was the first goal of the services provided under Title I of WIA as embodied in the "sequence of services" provisions), and the establishment of consumer choice for participants who were provided with Individual Training Accounts (ITAs) to choose a type of training and the particular provider from which to receive training.
_	In 1981, Spain abolished the requirement that married women must have their husbands’ permission to initiate judicial proceedings the Netherlands, and France in the 1980s.
_	In February 2016, Robertson travelled to Canberra to meet with politicians, urging them to change the law surrounding the requirement that transgender kids should have to go to court to access cross-sex hormones.
_	New crew members were brought in with the requirement that they were fans of the series and have ambition, so that they can understand "Spooks".
_	These apps are inspected for compliance with certain guidelines (such as those for quality control and censorship), including the requirement that a commission be collected on each sale of a paid app.
_	This approach is limited by availability of a suitable screen and the requirement that the desired trait be expressed in the host cell.
_	Some U.S. cases have removed the requirement that the fetus actually be born.
_	Donoghue gave his winnings from that match to Flores' family, and New York instituted the requirement that boxers take a 30-day break from the ring after being knocked out.
_	After succeeding Florida Governor Jeb Bush, Governor Charlie Crist granted Paey a waiver of the requirement that a minimum period of the sentence be served on his clemency petition, permitting his petition to be heard by the clemency board immediately.
_	The commission also stated that Israel is complying with its humanitarian obligations as the blockading party, including the prohibition against starving the civilian population or preventing the supply of objects essential for the survival of the civilian population and medical supplies, and the requirement that the damage to the civilian population is not excessive in relation to the real and direct military advantage anticipated from the blockade.
_	Eventually, in 2003, under the direction of Wilfrido Blanco Mora, the Ministry of Public Education dropped the requirement that "Cocorí" be read in public schools.
_	The number of bits needed for the exponent of the extended precision format follows from the requirement that the product of two double precision numbers should not overflow when computed using the extended format.
_	"The observed values of all physical and cosmological quantities are not equally probable but they take on values restricted by the requirement that there exist sites where carbon-based life can evolve and by the requirements that the universe be old enough for it to have already done so."<br>Unlike Carter they restrict the principle to carbon-based life, rather than just "observers".
_	Another reform was the requirement that any holder of a benefice must reside there.
_	A 1660 addition to the Code of 1656 added the requirement that all boys—not girls—were to be taught “‘to write a ledgible hand, so soone as they are capable of it.’”
_	However, the administration withdrew the requirement that such program started serving children for a longer day and school year due to insufficient funding.
_	Remey never addressed the requirement that Guardians should be male-descendants of Bahá'u'lláh, of whom Remey was not.
_	Pacific Gas & Electric v. Public Utilities Commission, , was a United States Supreme Court case involving the requirement that San Francisco-based public utility Pacific Gas and Electric Company carry a message supplied by a public interest group in rebuttal to the messages the utility supplied in its newsletter which it placed in its billing envelope.
_	This is equivalent to the requirement that formula_55 be a joint probability distribution with marginals formula_7 and formula_15.
_	Allowing Student A access to the girls' locker room with the requirement that she change in private was not an acceptable solution to OCR.
_	Many countries now dispense with the requirement that a physical stock certificate be produced, and have adopted electronic settlement systems.
_	Several of the amendments were to surveillance provisions and included an amendment that added to the list of terrorist crimes that could be used for obtaining electronic surveillance, the requirement that the Director of the FBI must personally approve any library or bookstore requests by the FBI under section 215, making law enforcement report back to a court within 15 days of using the a roving wiretap and the narrowing of the scope for "sneak-and-peek" delayed notification search warrants.
_	Part of the reason for the demand underforecast was the requirement that no demand from regeneration of the former steelworks area should be assumed.
_	The Papal States ceased to exist on 20 September 1870 when they were incorporated in the Kingdom of Italy, but the requirement that Jews live in the ghetto was only formally abolished by the Italian state in 1882.
_	If C has products, the sheaf axioms are equivalent to the requirement that, for any open covering "U", the first arrow in the following diagram is an equalizer:
_	In the wake of the march, Sabonjian backpedalled from the limit on crowds to less than 100 people, but he maintained the requirement that names of participants be submitted to the police department beforehand, ostensibly to prevent felons from involvement.
_	The last impediment to national firms practicing public accounting in Florida was the requirement that all partners be CPAs, limiting the ability for firms with Tax and Consulting partners who were not licensed CPAs. in 1997, the Board of Accountancy Act was amended to require only a majority of partners be licensed CPAs.
_	The IASB amended the statement again in 2011, adding the requirement that items in other comprehensive income be grouped based on their potential reclassifiability to profit and loss, among several other changes.
_	Many parent and teacher groups have protested against the WASL, claiming unreasonable expectations while also disputing the requirement that students with severe learning disabilities must take the test.
_	The "Resident" referred to the requirement that the magistrate live in the county to which he was assigned.
_	The magnetic Aharonov–Bohm effect can be seen as a result of the requirement that quantum physics be invariant with respect to the gauge choice for the electromagnetic potential, of which the magnetic vector potential formula_1 forms part.
_	This experience would re-introduce the requirement that future fighters would need to be able to mix with MiGs on more equal terms and not just shoot missiles from a distance.
_	Note that, by applying the result to "a"•"h"("rz"), the criterion applies on any disc |"z"| < r with only the requirement that "f"(0) = 0 and "f"'(0) ≠ 0.
_	An amendment to the Colorado constitution concerning the manner in which the state funds public education from preschool through the twelfth grade, and, in connection therewith, requiring that any revenue that the state would otherwise be required to refund pursuant to the constitutional limit on state fiscal year spending (Taxpayer’s Bill of Rights) be transferred instead to the state education fund; eliminating the requirement that, for the 2011-12 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the statewide base per pupil funding for public education from preschool through the twelfth grade and the total state funding for all categorical programs increase annually by at least the rate of inflation; for the 2010-11 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, creating a state education fund savings account in the state education fund; requiring that a portion of the state income tax revenue that is deposited in the state education fund be credited to the savings account in certain circumstances; requiring a bill to be passed by either a two-thirds majority vote of each house of the general assembly or, in any state fiscal year in which Colorado personal income grows less than six percent between the two previous calendar years, by a simple majority vote of the general assembly to use the moneys in the savings account; establishing the purposes for which moneys in the savings account may be spent; establishing a maximum amount that may be in the savings account in any state fiscal year; and allowing the general assembly to transfer moneys from the general fund to the state education fund, notwithstanding any limitations on annual general fund appropriations, so long as certain obligations for transportation funding are met.
_	In 2011, the government enforced the requirement that senior officials, including the President, file a declaration of their personal assets at the beginning and end of their service.
_	However, she dropped out months before graduation due to the requirement that she spend eight weeks as a student-teacher.
_	These annexes indicate content deviations that include the requirement for risks to be reduced "as far as possible", and the requirement that risks be mitigated by design and not by labeling on the medical device (i.e., labeling can no longer be used to mitigate risk).
_	Bribery was perceived as a problem; but despite this, major reforms were ultimately passed, in particular the requirement that all votes be by secret ballot—a measure that made bribery more effective, as the "elders" of a tribe no longer would hear how the members of the tribe were voting, and the entire process of voting became more personalized.
_	On July 2, 1980, President Jimmy Carter issued Presidential Proclamation 4771 and re-instated the requirement that young men register with the Selective Service System.
_	The characters of Baldassare Castiglione's The Book of the Courtier (1528) discuss the requirement that a "cortegiano" be noble (I.XIV-XVI).
_	Important to this definition is the requirement that during the C–H cleavage event, the hydrocarbyl species remains associated in the inner-sphere and under the influence of "M".
_	Taking a slightly different take on the definition of "community" in the case of multidimensional networks allows for reliable identification of communities without the requirement that nodes be in direct contact with each other.
_	Unfair preferences and uncommercial transactions are collectively referred to as "insolvent transactions" because of the requirement that the company must have been insolvent and the time they were entered into, or caused the company to become insolvent.
_	Beginning in March 2008, ICAO set out the requirement that all pilots flying international routes and air traffic control serving international airports and routes must be a Level 4 or above and will be continually reassessed every three years.
_	In a 1994 survey of wargames "Computer Gaming World" gave "Power Politics" two-plus stars out of five, criticizing the requirement that all historical candidates run in 1992 ("Quemoy and Matsu do not translate well into contemporary economic issues").
_	(Many councils today have removed the requirement that Advocacies must be completed to the Camp Fire program, citing that opportunities don't always exist for members enrolled in all areas of the country.)
_	In 1918 Roman Catholic schools were brought into the system, but retained their distinct religious character, access to schools by priests and the requirement that school staff be acceptable to the Church.
_	A similar play is allowed from a kicking formation, where the requirement that all five linemen wear 50-79 is waived.
_	More precisely, the quantity is the bivector associated with the plane specified by and , and has magnitude , where is the angle between the vectors; hence the requirement that the vectors be nonzero and nonparallel.
_	The district is one of 31 former Abbott districts statewide, which are now referred to as "SDA Districts" based on the requirement that the state cover all costs for school building and renovation projects in these districts under the supervision of the New Jersey Schools Development Authority.
_	The Constitutional Council, however, invalidate the bid on the grounds that it does not meet the requirement that a candidate must be elected leader of his training for at least two years.
_	In 2007, the AFL Commission laid down the requirement that all clubs must produce an alternative jumper for use in matches where jumpers are considered to clash.
_	In 1999, the activists authored a ballot initiative to overturn the ban on private rooms in gay sex clubs and eliminate the requirement that club staff monitor consensual behavior among club patrons.
_	The Coptic Orthodox Church of Alexandria, for example, has the requirement that at least 50 years must pass following a prospective saint's death before the Coptic Orthodox Church's pope can canonize the saint.
_	Despite the extreme topography, the requirement that the road be used for transporting heavy artillery and supplies meant that the grade could not exceed 12%.
_	In 1971, Babuška provided the following generalization of Lax and Milgram's earlier result, which begins by dispensing with the requirement that "U" and "V" be the same space.
_	For a weak (resp. strong) limit cardinal κ the requirement that cf(κ) = κ (i.e. κ be regular) so that κ cannot be expressed as a sum (union) of fewer than κ smaller cardinals.
_	It might also be worth pointing out that a relaxation of the requirement that "X" be connected leads to an interesting exploration of open subsets of the plane with connected extended complement.
_	Batters such as Babe Ruth and Rogers Hornsby took full advantage of rules changes that were instituted during the 1920s, particularly prohibition of the spitball, and the requirement that balls be replaced when worn or dirty.
_	The sole limitation is the requirement that Cabinet ministers must be sworn members of the Privy Council, since the Cabinet itself is a sub committee of the Privy Council.
_	She has also filed legislation requiring that pipelines use public right-of-way instead of private property and legislation strengthening the requirement that oil and gas companies disclose the well logs used by the Railroad Commission to protect Texas natural resources.
_	The bill would amend the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 to terminate on September 30, 2013, reporting requirements relating to the use of funds under such Act, oversight functions of the Board, and the requirement that the Board maintain a public website.
_	In physics, the principle of relativity is the requirement that the equations describing the laws of physics have the same form in all admissible frames of reference.
_	This law removed the requirement that a second term of copyright protection is contingent on a renewal registration.
_	However, according to Gretchen Morgenson of "The New York Times", such clawbacks have actually been rare, due in part to the requirement that the misconduct must be either deliberate or reckless.
_	Bill Johnson compared "Dragon Warrior" to modern RPGs and noted the game's complete lack of replay value, which is due as much to the requirement that almost everything in the game must be done to beat it as to its difficulty.
_	Alternatively, one can relax this definition by dropping the requirement that the surface be properly embedded.
_	Electoral officials noted that 52,500 was only a fraction of the overseas voters actually eligible to vote (one million Dominicans are estimated to live in the United States alone), but that the take-up rate was hampered by a lack of information regarding the necessary formalities and by bureaucratic hurdles (particularly, the requirement that up-to-date national ID cards be presented).
_	Ports are usually pairs of terminals with the requirement that the current into one terminal is equal to the current leaving the other.
_	A logical result of the requirement that the debtor must own sufficient property to meet the costs of sequestration is that a debtor who has no assets, only liabilities, cannot surrender his estate.
_	Disadvantages include the need for a single protein for analysis and the requirement that the protein sequence is located, at least with significant homology, in a database.
_	These two acts however were deeply controversial in that they placed in statute law the requirement that many women would face mandatory retirement on marriage (the requirement was previously a regulation since 1924).
_	In the case of general linear regression, the above statement is equivalent to the requirement that the matrix formula_46 is invertible.
_	In 1966, the U.S. Supreme Court decision in "Miranda v. Arizona" (384 U.S. 436) created the requirement that a citizen must be informed of their legal rights upon their arrest and before they are interrogated, which came to be known as Miranda warnings.
_	The issue before the court was whether the imposition by the CCC of the requirement that the Nollans convey a public easement as a condition for granting a land-use permit constituted a taking.
_	He voted against the requirement that companies must give public notice of proposed hydraulic fracking.
_	The Privy Council replaced the direct consequence test with the requirement that, in order to be recoverable, damage must be foreseeable in all the circumstances, thus, although pollution was a foreseeable consequence of the spillage, an outbreak of fire was not.
_	He discovered that quantized algebra of functions "Fun(GL)" can be defined by the requirement that "T" and "T" are simultaneously q-Manin matrices.
_	According to the Mishnah and Talmud, the men of the Great Assembly instituted the requirement that Jews both in Judea and in the diaspora pray three times a day (morning, afternoon and evening), and include in their prayers a recitation of these passages in the morning ("Shacharit") and evening ("Ma'ariv") prayers.
_	One of the major elements that separates Mid-South Pride from other pride organizations is the requirement that all events must be paid in full, so that the organization never takes on more than it can actually pay for.
_	On 7 March 2018, the "Births, Deaths and Marriages Registration Amendment Bill 2018" was introduced to the Queensland Parliament to repeal the requirement that one must be "unmarried" for a change of sex to be registered on one’s birth certificate.
_	The technique is limited to computers in close physical proximity (about ), and is also limited by the requirement that both the transmitting and receiving machines be infected with the proper malware to form the communication link.
_	The 1832 state constitution was in effect until 1868, and removed the requirement that voters must own property to cast ballots.
_	California's budget was frequently passed after the constitutionally-mandated deadline, as the Legislature and Governors negotiated to close multibillion-dollar deficits under the requirement that budget votes have a two-thirds majority to pass.
_	Its very limited powers were further eroded by constant German interference in its operations, and the requirement that all laws drafted by the commissioners could only be implemented after their approval by the Germans.
_	The Yaphank option was rejected because of the high cost of electrification and the requirement that stations between Ronkonkoma and Yaphank receive upgrades.
_	This link was maintained by the requirement that for every Cyprus pound issued by the Currency Board in Cyprus, one pound sterling issued by the Bank of England had to be deposited by the Government of Cyprus with the Crown Agents in London.
_	In appeal, the defense claimed that the make-up of the jury, all white based on the requirement that the jury be based on those who were eligible to vote, was based on unconstitutional racism in election laws stemming from the 1895 South Carolina constitution.
_	In 2009, Ireland amended its domestic EAW legislation to bring it into line with the EAW framework decision by removing the requirement that, in conviction cases, a person the subject of a EAW had "fled" the issuing country.
_	The amendment failed, as did every other attempt to change the legislation, including Dickinson's plea, in the Senate, to restore the requirement that the new coin be used to retire some of the Spanish silver.
_	To fulfil the requirement that Mr Edgington relied on the statement, it is not necessary to show the misstatement was the sole cause of acting, so long as there was an influence.
_	To find the mutation matrix for the PAM matrix, the requirement that 99% of the amino acids in a sequence are conserved is imposed.
_	However, if the action is replaced by the effective action, the equations of motion for the vacuum expectation values of the fields can be derived from the requirement that the effective action be stationary.
_	The CDL2 compiler is able to flag the possible violations thanks to the requirement that the direction of parameters (input,output,input-output) and the type of rules (can fail: test, predicate; cannot fail: function, action; can have side effect: predicate, action; cannot have side effect: test, function) must be specified by the programmer.
_	The quality of the iron ore was so mixed that there were court proceedings, resulting in the requirement that two knowledgeable miners should control the quality of the iron ore.
